Lily: You want some aspirin, baby?
Lily: Marshall used to think he was indestructible.
Lily: This tracking thing is amazing. When we get married, you're getting one of these.
Lily: Hey! That's mine. Yeah, you'd better run!
Lily: I'm not sure anyone in that story is a winner.
Lily: Oh, that's okay. I love that cute little belly.
Lily: What?
Lily: "It is important to load up on carbohydrates two to four hours before a big run. Try a breakfast of a bagel, a banana, oatmeal, strawberries and some orange juice." Here you go, Marshmallow. Just like the book said.
Lily: "Don't forget to give yourself plenty of positive reinforcement."
Lily: "Chafing or blisters can occur in a number of areas, including the feet, armpits, or even the nipples. Try using some petroleum jelly on the affected areas."
Lily: We have to camp out.
Lily: You don't understand. This is an amazing sale. I've heard about it before, but I never knew where it was. We'll have a wedding dress campout. It'll be fun.
Lily: What thing?
Lily: Oh, wow. Badgley Mischka! Melissa Sweet! Vera Wang! Oh, Robin, do you have any idea what you guys stumbled onto here?
Lily: Oh, this reminds me of the ticket line to Lilith Fair, 1998. Only fewer mullets.
Lily: Ooh, this is comfy. We might actually be able to sleep.
Lily: Well, I'm sure somebody will be out here to turn it off any minute. (5 hours later) I don't think I can take this. Every time it turns off, I think, oh, maybe it won't turn on again, but then it does. Why does it, Robin? Why does it keep turning on?
Lily: If we get through this, I swear I'm gonna live my life differently.
Lily: It's him. It's the car guy!
Lily: Isn't it hard for you guys to be on opposite sides of something like this?
Lily: You guys are in screaming matches all the time.
Lily: Your relationship sounds exhausting.
Lily: Marshall and I have been together 15 years, and the only debate we've had about Tommy Boy is whether it's awesome or super awesome. That's love, bitch.
Lily: Baby, you have my full support.
Lily: The guy who was basically a dog?
Lily: Baby, more than ever, you have my full support. (Lily and Marshall kisses)
Lily: I'm starting to feel bad for Ted and Zoey.
Lily: Oh, good for you, sweetie.
Lily: Baby, if this is what you need to do, we'll figure it out. How's Barney handling you leaving?
Lily: Why don't you admit that your girlfriend challenging your every move is getting you a little murder-suicidey?
Lily: It's not.
Lily: Okay, Ted, the downside to having a woman's mouth is, your feminine pout gives away your true feelings. And yours is saying, "Oh, Zoey, why can't I be on top just this once?"
Lily: Well, I'm glad you like your new co-worker.
Lily: Oh, and I'm loving seeing you this happy.
Lily: Baby, you have my full support.
Lily: Okay, look, Ted, I need a favor. Would you mind driving out to Kennedy with me to pick up this famous ecologist for Marshall's fund-raiser? Apparently, he only speaks Spanish. And you speak Spanish, right? (Ted says something in spanish) Perfect. Let's go.
Lily: You're right. I-If you and Zoey are happy, then who am I to judge? I'm so sorry.
Lily: But I thought you liked being challenged.
Lily: Well, in her defense, hamburger pizza, Ted? What are you, 12?
Lily: Yeah, I-I know.
Lily: So you can drive him to the fund-raiser. Supporting Marshall this much is driving me crazy. I'm going to Spain-- my flight leaves in 45 minutes. Adios, muchacho.
Lily: You were right. If I hear myself say "Baby, you have my full support" one more time, I swear I'm gonna murder someone!
Lily: I honestly haven't thought it all the way through, and I don't intend to. All I know is that I'm a ticking time bomb, and if I don't do something for me right away, I swear I'm gonna explode!
Lily: Marshall's been asking a lot lately.
Lily: I've never been good at that. And now, ever since his dad died, I-I feel like it's my job to just be fine with everything. But I'm not. I'm not fine that he volunteers our apartment for a giant fund-raiser and that he's not thinking about how we're gonna pay any of our bills and that, apparently, we've given up on trying to have kids.
Lily: Look, I'm sorry, Ted, I just, I gotta do this. (Lily leaves)
Lily: Marshall, hey. Sorry, I, uh, I had to park and-and grab some ice. Sorry.
Lily: Yeah. Listen, Marshall, I-I need to talk to you about something.
Lily: Baby, you have my full support.
Lily: You're too young. This isn't fair.
Lily: When listening to this joke of peanut butter and jam, I was completely disgusted. But this morning in the shower, I thought about it and it made me laugh. Peanut butter. So I think I could win. According to Marshall.
Lily: Thank you. So what's new?
Lily: OK, that's enough for tonight. I'll go slowly.
Lily: Please stop!
Lily: I thought you were shaving your face!
Lily: Oh yeah, but that one's not for rent. It's for sale!
Lily: what?
Lily: Hy! My name is Lily and I'm a shopaholic.
Lily: I buy designer clothes and accessories that i can't afford. I have 15 creditcards and they're all maxed out. And no one outside of this room, not even my husband, knows. And i feel terrible because all i want to do right now is ask you (to a girl of the meeting) where you got those shoes? They're adorable.
Lily: we can't buy, we have debt.
Lily: I forgive you.
Lily: Well... I'm just saying as your wife, you know i'm cool that you spent tens of thousands of dollars on a brand name law school because i know it make you feel good and pretty.
Lily: Where is it?
Lily: Dowisetrepla?
Lily: O right Dowisetrepla! No, i'm from New york. I know this neighborhood. I'm down in the D-town.
Lily: Sounds great boys! Who wants chocolate pancakes?
Lily: I know. It's... Isn't it amazing?
Lily: Waddington?
Lily: meters?
Lily: I know, i know, i know, i know! But what do i tell him?
Lily: You really don't know Marshall at all.
Lily: Oh Marshall, can i talk to you? Marshall, i just... I don't know if now is the right time to buy."
Lily: oh persephone! oh daphne! these'll be perfect additions to our upcoming mother-daughter exhibit at the Met.
Lily: I love it, but Marshall, i should have told you this long time ago. We can't afford to buy an apartment because i have too much credit card debt. I am so sorry.
Lily: What? Why? I mean, you already have Marshall's.
Lily: Well, can we just go ahead and do it in my husband's name? He's the head of the household. He earns the big bucks. I mean, can women even own property?
Lily: Okay my... my social is, uh... 1glmmdhgj2.
Lily: Let's get out of here, Marshall.
Lily: We have an annoucement.
Lily: Ow, I should explain. We got in a pretty big fight.
Lily: Marshall stormed out.
Lily: Still drinking that?
Lily: Listen, i've been thinking about this, and i know there's no way to undo what i've done, but, well, I made an appointment with a divorce lawyer.
Lily: Oh no no! no, no, no
Lily: No! I just mean on papers, so that you can buy the apartment without my bad credit dragging us down.
Lily: I'm sorry, i shouldn't have led with the divorce lawyer part.
Lily: I love you too, and i want us to have our dream home. And well, i don't know, it seems like this is a way to do it. So Marshall Eriksen, will you divorce me?
Lily: So is that a yes? You can't sleep with other women though.
Lily: No!
Lily: We're home on earth!
Lily: Yeah! There it is! Our new home!
Lily: We shall.
Lily: Oh! what a horrible smell.
Lily: Wh-what plant? What are you talking about?
Lily: So you and Ted had your first fight. It obviously ended well. I mean, you're here with me.
Lily: Ooh, two tragedies in one day.
Lily: Robin!
Lily: You should work at a suicide hotline.
Lily: Robin, he's upset because you wouldn't listen to him, not because you didn't like some movie.
Lily: Listening is the foundation of a relationship. And if he's really droning on, you can always practice saying the alphabet backwards. You know, in case you get pulled over for a DUI.
Lily: Yeah, it's really hard, even when you're sober. That's what I tried to explain to the cop.
Lily: What the hell comes before "Q"?
Lily: Yes.
Lily: Carl, do you really want to be with a woman who would trade s*x for beer?
Lily: Thanks.
Lily: He asked her to a party. Oh, my God, are you okay?
Lily: What is wrong with you? God, I feel like I'm teaching love as a second language here. Okay, you know how when he tells you boring work stories you're supposed to listen? Well, when he picks up some random girl at a bar, you're supposed to freak out.
Lily: Okay, where are the guys and the hooker?
Lily: See? Marshall's still hung up on our breakup. Why? Because I listened to him. It was a strong and nurturing relationship that I threw away like old gum.
Lily: Did you grow up in that Footloose town?
Lily: Yeah, think of another way to phrase that and you'll be fine.
Lily: Okay, fella. Baby knows how this game's played. How's a $20 help your memory?
Lily: Then can I have the...? That's cool. You keep that.
Lily: Well, I'm out of money.
Lily: You should tell her that looks really good with a chocolate boot.
Lily: Oh, my God, Robin, are you going to kick this girl's ass?
Lily: 3-C, let's do this. You ready?
Lily: Those are really nice heels and you already lost the purse. Let's see if it's unlocked. It's unlocked. Okay, get in there and kick some spankable ass. Robin?
Lily: What?
Lily: Well, don't stand out here and beat yourself up. Get in there and beat Ted up. I'll handle the slutty kickboxer. Actually, I'll take Ted.
Lily: Bring it. (They come in)
Lily: Oh, this is great. It wasn't Ted. Everything's okay.
Lily: This is how people act in relationships.
Lily: Well, guess what, I haven't been crazy or jealous or paranoid in months, and I really miss it.
Lily: He's out printing out a whole new batch of résumés because he misspelled the phrase "detail-oriented." And when he gets back home, he is going to find his favorite soup there waiting for him.
Lily: Three times. But they're really nice about it. Their policy is, "Get sick, get a free gallon of soup".
Lily: This is Mr. Buttons 2. Now, after what happened to Mr. Buttons 1, we have to be very gentle with... (Lily throws up onto Mr. Buttons 2. She leaves the shool, running to her apartment in order to stop Marshall from eating the soup) Marshall! Don't eat the soup! Oh, thank God.
Lily: Oh, baby, can you just hold me, please?
Lily: Mm. Thanks. Wait, you didn't tell them I had food poisoning, did you?
Lily: Marshall, when it's stomach stuff, you just say "under the weather," or people start picturing you doing unspeakable things.
Lily: Oh, but, baby, what if you hit the jackpot early?
Lily: Yeah, I wasn't listening, either. Ted really can go on about a bitch.
Lily: Hey, wait. Ted left a message. I could hear it 'cause I was in the bathroom... blowing my nose... I have the sniffles.
Lily: Damn it, Marshall.
Lily: Wait, wait, wait. That's was a subway announcement in the background. I speak conductor.
Lily: Got it. Ted's at... (Lily runs to the bathroom and throws up) Oh... Ted's at Smith and Ninth Street.
Lily: When it's stomach stuff, you just say "under the weather" or people start picturing you doing unspeakable things.
Lily: Nailed it.
Lily: Hey, baby, how'd it go?
Lily: Baby, come here.
Lily: I know, baby. I'm pregnant.
Lily: Best man? You're being summoned.
Lily: I was pissed 3 times this morning. I can not say.
Lily: Marshall, no.
Lily: Honey, come down here, please.
Lily: For the last time, I'm not Linda Knievel! I will never be Linda Knievel!
Lily: Marshall, do not do that. Do not jump, please.
Lily: You can not.
Lily: You want a reason? You're going to have one. I am pregnant.
Lily: I was lying, b*st*rd! Go ahead, jump! I hope u gonna die!
Lily: This is Ted. Everyone! Ted, are you?
Lily: What?
Lily: You said what?
Lily: What?
Lily: You were in love with her, throughout the year and when she feels the same, you love him more.
Lily: Honey, you're there. You're really there.
Lily: Damn.
Lily: Everyone always says, "Do not tell Lily. Lily can not keep a secret. "And, usually, they are right. But this time I kept the secret. And here you come with that crap and you force me to become the Lily will spill the beans!
Lily: There was a song.
Lily: He said that? My God! What an incredible surprise!
Lily: I know. Are you gonna do?
Lily: Boy, you're going to break her... The thing that this black mud pump through his veins.
Lily: No, she can not mosbyser.
Lily: That's it. It worked well. You are back to normal.
Lily: No.
Lily: Marshall, you can pick up Ted?
Lily: I'm sorry. Go ahead and jump.
Lily: What has happened?
Lily: This is the sweetest and adorable goat in the world.
Lily: Mr. Goat? It's a girl. Her name is Missy.
Lily: OK, I'm just asking. You really want to recover?
Lily: Architecture is killing you and it kills us to see her kill you.You're like the goat with the mop. You want it so much, and whenever the world try to get the resume, it hooks you. But you know what? This is only a wimp. Why do you want?
Lily: In the crapper, the plan. I wanted to be a famous artist.Marshall wanted to be environmental lawyer. Robin wanted to be a TV reporter.
Lily: It continues? Bravo.
Lily: Barney wanted to be a violinist. Need not tell me. You can not draw your life as a building. It does not work like that. You must live it and draw it to itself.
Lily: Look what the world tells you to do and took the leap.
Lily: A metaphorical leap. A metaphorical leap!
Lily: Honey, you did it!
Lily: It's true!
Lily: No, not at all!
Lily: Wow.
Lily: Hey, Marshall, you got to see this.
Lily: Oh, can she? Can she get a dog, please Dad?
Lily: Oh, Barney's got feeling for a girl.
Lily: Then why are you going out with Nora again?
Lily: Wow, she nursed you back to health?
Lily: Aw, and you want me to go with you 'cause you're a little scared?
Lily: Do you want me to go with you because you're a lot scared?
Lily: Okay, fine. On one condition. You have to promise me you won't lie to Nora. She seems like something special.
Lily: Ow! Nails, nails!
Lily: You have to promise me you won't lie to Nora!
Lily: Yeah, guys, cut it out. Scooby, sit.
Lily: How did you meet?
Lily: Did you send her an e-mail, or did you "collar"?
Lily: We're just trying to make sure he's not a heel.
Lily: Oh, I bet it was an "Incredible Journey""
Lily: This isn't happening.
Lily: I had no idea he had a deep down.
Lily: Barney, you promised you wouldn't lie.
Lily: I'm not going to let you do this. When Nora gets back here, I'm blowing the whistle.
Lily: Barney, you can't blackmail us into lying to Nora.
Lily: Mr. Buttons? Oh, you son of a bitch. Fine. I'll be nice.
Lily: Oh, I don't know how we know Barney. How does anyone know how they know anyone? I like your pretty hair, help me.
Lily: I don't recall.
Lily: Scooby, we're in our 30s. We don't smoke sandwiches anymore.
Lily: Guys, I found this on the floor.
Lily: Scooby got out!
Lily: Oh, my God! I found Scooby's wallet.
Lily: Me neither. He must've figured out how to open it himself.
Lily: Okay. If you were new in town and had just ingested an eighth of sandwich, where would you go?
Lily: Day's not over.
Lily: No, that wasn't the lie. The lie was when you told Nora you were lying. Because you weren't. You want that stuff, Barney, I know you do.
Lily: What time was your dinner reservation?
Lily: Your heart's talking to you, Barney. Do you have the guts to listen to it.
Lily: Hi. How are you?
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Ted, in high school, his marriage was you, right?
Lily: No "You not married, Ted?" No "You're making a big mistake, Ted?" Have you stopped the fight against marriage?
Lily: So you come back to Robin.
Lily: You'll never there. Too many opportunities. The first bridesmaid drunk, you'll have your head under the dress as a photographer of yesteryear.
Lily: It's not really the place I imagined for the wedding of Ted.
Lily: Honey, will see the dirty hippie to the reservation there, we, we'll take to drink.
Lily: There's no alcohol.
Lily: I do not care, why do such.
Lily: OK, this would be weird without Robin. But not contradict the bride.
Lily: You should be more delicate with Stella about Robin.
Lily: The brides are very stressed before a wedding. Well, of course, I was under control.
Lily: The florist told me that roses are medium pink pale pink that means. Medium pink pale! All're done. Our wedding hall uses a boiler instead of a forced air heating. This is the thing that concerned me. Why are we still married?
Lily: Poor Stella must be the crazy one month in three days.
Lily: You wait for the next crisis, the rules you, you're a hero.After, you dealt with on about Robin, but this time she will say yes.
Lily: This is a bride. There will be another crisis.
Lily: Great! What is it?
Lily: You'll never get there.
Lily: No chance.
Lily: Barney, Marshall didn't quit his last soul-sucking corporate job just to go work at a bank. He's gonna be an environmental lawyer.
Lily: We had sushi last night.
Lily: My God. This burger is so good. It's like Christmas in my mouth, meat Christmas.
Lily: Probably tucked between her legs.
Lily: Honey, I'm so excited for you. After all these interviews, after all these disappointments, you deserve a triumphant mouth full of meat.
Lily: Barney, I hate to break this to you, but working for a bank's kind of lame.
Lily: I think I just had my first burg-asm.
Lily: And you got our wedding vows off the Internet.
Lily: Marshall's not doing so well, guys. He really needs to get a job.
Lily: It started a couple of weeks ago.
Lily: Hey, baby.
Lily: Did you put on pants today?
Lily: It was funny at first, but then it became a daily thing. I thought, "Okay, well, at least he's not leaving the house like that." Then, one day, he opened the door to get the paper. Day after that, went downstairs to get the mail.
Lily: We've got to find Marshall that burger.
Lily: No, if Marshall says this isn't the burger, this isn't it.
Lily: Excuse me. Did you guys change cooks or something? Because my husband was here 5 years ago, he's sure he had a different burger. Robin is trying to take the plate.
Lily: This is your fault, you and your stupid bank. You did this.
Lily: I will never use a Goliath ATM ever again. Goliath National Bank sucks. It's the worst bank on the face of the earth. Attention, New Yorkers, this bank sucks! They suck!
Lily: They suck, suck!
Lily: Tell me what? Tell me what?
Lily: What? Where?
Lily: But you want to be an environmental lawyer.
Lily: You've got great pants.
Lily: I love you.
Lily: I'm sorry you didn't get your burger.
Lily: I paid for the cab.
Lily: I want to get tiny fitted sheets for this burger, and just... crawl into this bun, get all cosy, and die there.
Lily: For Ted's sake, I hate to say this,
Lily: oh, but Ted, if you get rid of the butterfly, how's everyone gonna know you're a stripper fron reno with daddy issues?
Lily: Stella?
Lily: and in this case, you're paying them... then yes, it counts.
Lily: We love brunch!
Lily: Robin, it's a mistake. Remember what happened with me and Marshall? The Gerards across the hall?
Lily: Michael and LAura. They're awesome. We're gonna invite them over for dinner.
Lily: we're not gonna date them. We're just gonna be friends with them.
Lily: I don't know. I'd expect you to have one already.
Lily: Want to have dinner with us tonight?
Lily: That's what we thought.
Lily: And it's so conveniant. They're right across the hall. Say it's sunday and we want to have a brunch double date with someone.
Lily: And say we want to have a dinner party exploring the wine and cuisine of France's Loire Valley.
Lily: Say we want to play a game of charades...
Lily: Come on people, get excited for us! We've got a great thing going here.
Lily: You're killing the bar.
Lily: um, well, we actually have tickets...
Lily: Every time we step out the door, they're out there waiting for us. Sometimes, we'll send Ted out first as a scout. Nobody's there. Then we'll go out one second later, and there they are.
Lily: "Hey neighbor!" "Hey, neighbor""Hey neighbor."
Lily: Well, we love this bar. You can't dump her. Marry her if you have to.
Lily: We're getting a little sick of charades.
Lily: Do you see anything?
Lily: ok go go go. (They go out but the door of the Gerards opens, they gets in quickly)
Lily: Too close. (Someone knocks on the door) You've got to be kidding me. What do we do?
Lily: It's just Ted!
Lily: Okay, hurry! (They come down to the rescue ladder) Michael and Laura are probably...
Lily: Oh, sorry Ted.
Lily: So what do you guys have going on tonight?
Lily: Do you know what plays a huge role in helping a woman conceive? Cervical mucus.
Lily: Oh, change of plans. I thought violent images wouldn't be good for my future fetus, so instead, I rented this video of a live water birth.
Lily: Look at this crib.
Lily: Hey, Robin, do you want to go get a Korean massage on Saturday?
Lily: Yeah, I figured I should get one now because once I get pregnant, no more massages. Just so annoying.
Lily: Yeah. Come on, Barney. It's just a cute little story about... What exactly is this about?
Lily: Oh. Oh. I have to say, as much as I hate to agree with Barney, this does seem to be a veritable pornucopia.
Lily: Hey, if you and Jessica are BFFs, how come we've never met her?
Lily: But BFFs are forever.
Lily: I don't get it. How can you and Glitter just stop being friends? Best friends don't do that.
Lily: Whoa. What do you think came between Robin and Jessica?
Lily: Four years, three months.
Lily: Robin's gonna dump me!
Lily: Where are you going? We just got here.
Lily: By yourself?
Lily: Guys, did you see that? She's going to a Korean massage without me. That's our thing. I'm telling you, she's gonna dump me, just like she dumped Glitter.
Lily: I don't.
Lily: 384 months.
Lily: Crib...
Lily: Rattled? I want to talk about babies.
Lily: Look, I know you don't care about this stuff, but I'm about to become a mother. And as a future mother, I'm gonna need the support...
Lily: What's that supposed to mean?
Lily: Well, guess what? I've got some good news. When that baby comes, you don't have to see it. In fact, you don't have to see me. This whole friendship thing? Done.
Lily: Great.
Lily: I had to. We were growing apart, and we're better off without each other.
Lily: No!
Lily: I can't. The damage is done. Can you just hold me?
Lily: Okay.
Lily: What are we doing in Madison Square Garden?
Lily: How did you find Glitter?
Lily: More like ex-best friends. Just like you.
Lily: Yeah, well, Marshall and I are about to get pregnant, and I know she stopped being friends with you when you had a baby, so...
Lily: What? Why?
Lily: Wow. You dumped her just because you had a baby? That's cold.
Lily: Oh, God. I gotta go. I gotta go apologize to Robin. I- I need to tell her I love her, and that she'll always be a priority.
Lily: Oh, there you are. Robin, I owe you a huge apology.
Lily: I know. I know all about it. It's not gonna happen with you and me. And I'm sorry I've been going crazy with this baby stuff. I know you hate babies.
Lily: You expect us to spend a whole day packing up your mom's house?
Lily: You may be able to talk the brain surgeons you pick up into doing whatever you want, but it's not gonna work on us.
Lily: How did he do that?
Lily: Oh, it gives us a rare insight into the makings of Barney Stinson. Like, look at this. Who was a cute little basketball player before he became the biggest pervert in the world?
Lily: Well, she's not alone. Whenever Marshall was acting too hyper, his mom would suddenly decide he was "sick" and give him cough medicine until he passed out.
Lily: And then there's the most popular parental lie in history. Santa.
Lily: Santa's still a lie, and I'm not lying to our kids.
Lily: Milk and lutefisk? Santa doesn't get cookies in Minnesota?
Lily: I'm not lying to our kids.
Lily: Not now.
Lily: Oh, what's done is done.
Lily: God, this must be so hard for Barney.
Lily: Don't worry. We'll... We'll snap Barney out of this when he gets back.
Lily: Are you kidding?
Lily: Hey, where the hell did you disappear to last night?
Lily: Yeah, I know. My stomach was like, girlfriend, we don't always get along but that cake...
Lily: Oh right. Most amazing night ever, and go.
Lily: Oh, what is wrong with you?
Lily: So, what happened next?
Lily: So, that's what happened to the bouquet. You know, good for Victoria. It's such an evil tradition.
Lily: Oh, yeah, I'm gonna take that flower grenade and chuck it into the crowd and scream, crawl for it, bitches. It's just what girls do.
Lily: Oh, Ted, you're such a doof. I mean, this girl sounds amazing.
Lily: Well, Claudia's on her honeymoon. She'll be back in two weeks. Call her then.
Lily: No, Ted, you don't mess with a honeymoon.
Lily: Maybe she used a second fake name. Oh, she's good, she's very good.
Lily: Great. How do we get in touch with the bridesmaids?
Lily: Oh, come on, Barney. It's for a good cause.
Lily: OK, let's not lose hope. We'll call the hotel, maybe she was staying there. We'll have them check the registry for anyone named Victoria. Or maybe she goes by Vicky or Tori...
Lily: Hey, there's the anchor lady! How was it?
Lily: Congrats, that's so cool.
Lily: Oh, don't even worry about it. In fact...
Lily: What?
Lily: You know who she is? But, you weren't even at the wedding.
Lily: What?
Lily: Because you have feelings for Ted.
Lily: OK, what is wrong with the two of you?! Seriously. He likes you and you like him, just, just, just be together. Geez, Louise, happiness is not that difficult.
Lily: Yes you do. Seeing him with someone else and crying about it. Guess what? That's how you feel. That is nothing but how you feel.
Lily: Or you could tell him you're into him and then you could both be happy.
Lily: Well, wait. Which one are you gonna tell him?
Lily: No, no, don't do it.
Lily: Well, I just think that maybe she's not that into you and that's why she didn't give you her number. Robin, care to chime in with anything? Robin: Yes. Ted. Go get her.
Lily: Buttercup Bakery. This is it.
Lily: You slept together?
Lily: No. It could ruin your friendship. When two former try the "right opportunity", someone always ends in pain.
Lily: Are you okay?
Lily: For one thing, you cry openly.
Lily: Barney, admit it. You always have feelings for Robin and it tortures you.
Lily: You must learn to express your feelings. Perhaps you should see a psychiatrist.
Lily: I entered.
Lily: It was always like that. You remember, in law?
Lily: The bank statement arrived today. You have booked a hotel two blocks from your school, a Tuesday.
Lily: It's that, Marshall? What's her name?
Lily: Barney, it's crazy.
Lily: No, it's wrong. You must learn to get it out. As we did in my kindergarten class. "The time for emotions", every Tuesday morning.
Lily: That's not how it is written.
Lily: I warned you. When ex relapse, ultimately, it hurts someone. But nobody is listening. This is the story of my life.My nice face that prevents people listen to my message.
Lily: What is your problem?
Lily: Get out of here.
Lily: Barney, you're not at your therapist. These children also have their problems, you know. Ben's parents divorced.
Lily: Who wants to do the coloring?
Lily: Why?
Lily:  I heard you.
Lily: It's time, baby.
Lily: No,Marshall, you must. And after an appropriate number of years, you should find someone else. Someone like that busty delivery girl from that one time. And plow her like a cornfield.
Lily: Oh!
Lily: So you went to a strip club?
Lily: And there was a stripper who looked exactly like me?
Lily: Awesome! I bet the guys were going crazy. Oh, I bet they wanted to touch her so bad. But all you can do is look, unless you go into the back room, but honey, you got to pay for that.
Lily: Was there a shower on stage? Sometimes there's a shower on stage. I bet stripper me would get in there with another girl and just go bananas.
Lily: Trouble? What trouble?
Lily: You kill me off?! I mean, fantasize about other girls all you want, but could you maybe not murder me?!
Lily: Oh, let's not forget the menu typo gold mine. Keep pannin' that river, buddy.
Lily: What about Cat Woman?
Lily: Baby... You should be able to fantasize about another woman without feeling guilty, or you know, killing me off.
Lily: All right, we got to fix this.
Lily: Okay, when Stripper Lily gets out here, you have my permission to fantasize about her. And since she's basically me, maybe you won't feel guilty.
Lily: Bring out Stripper Lily!
Lily: I am hot! Oh, crawl for it, stripper me.I is awesome. Baby, can I get another hundred?
Lily: Wow, she crawls fast.
Lily: (smoking and looking weird) What did you say, buddy?
Lily: Who? Oh, yes... I am this Lily. We married long time. May I have monies for shopping?
Lily: Check.
Lily: Check.
Lily: Check.
Lily: Okay, so, here's what happened. I was at home, waiting for Marshall.
Lily: Marshall, whoa! Wait. A big package just arrived.
Lily: No, no. It's a real package from your dad.
Lily: Marshall, look!
Lily: You told your dad we're trying to have a baby?
Lily: I have read 11 books on conception. I have cut out alcohol, caffeine and sugar. I take my temperature every hour. But good for you for not playing with yourself.
Lily: Who else did you tell? Did you tell anyone at the office?
Lily: Your dad is the last person you should tell! The man is too involved in our lives! It's like, every time the phone rings...
Lily: Hello.
Lily: Hello.
Lily: Hello.
Lily: The man has no boundaries. And I just can't procreate under these conditions!
Lily: So, call him and tell him we decided not to have a baby.
Lily: Only if you want to give this a stroke.
Lily: We'll tell him about the baby when there's a baby to tell him about.
Lily: Out for three months?
Lily: No, we didn't.
Lily: You know what, Marshall? Why don't you have a baby with your dad?
Lily: What?
Lily: Barney, am I crazy? Marshall talks to his dad way too much, right?
Lily: Why not?
Lily: That was really...
Lily: Brief.
Lily: Marshall?
Lily: Here's the thing.
Lily: You. You're like that. You and your dad both care so much. It's... it's why women fall in love with the Eriksen men to begin with. But right now, it's a lot of pressure.
Lily: What if I can't have a baby? That could happen. I could totally let you down. Has that thought not occurred to you?
Lily: Best man? You're being summoned.
Lily: I'll go put it in the oven.
Lily: The slaps are transferable.
Lily: And how!
Lily: Awesome.
Lily: We expect someone else?
Lily: Dad?
Lily: What has happened with your apartment?
Lily: What has happened?
Lily: You should pay rent to live in the basement of your parents.
Lily: Working? You are retired.
Lily: You not only prevented them from moving to Florida but you obliged to rework grandfather?
Lily: What is he doing here?
Lily: I want to see him! Returns it!
Lily: The equity in my life brings me nothing but stress. It's easier that he is dead to me.
Lily: This is our journal.
Lily: Thank you, girls.
Lily: A coffee, please. But only if it is decaf. I want to sleep tonight.
Lily: I'm sorry. Are you sure mine is decaf? You used the same coffee.
Lily: OK (She leaves the grocery store, coffee in hand. In his bed while sleeping Marshall)... You dirty b*st*rd! (It returns in pajamas to the grocery store) It was not decaf!
Lily: No.
Lily: You did not ask. Tell him it's just important that it is here. In less than two, it will be a games convention in Toledo, to give money to your dental apparatus in a so-called Milton Bradley.
Lily: No, that's what mom was doing with his two jobs. This man broke my heart every day for 20 years.
Lily: It's easy for you to say that, you come to the family the most ridiculously close to the world.
Lily: Really? And the Eriksen family dinner every Sunday?
Lily: I'm sorry but it's weird.
Lily: I can not believe you take her part. Let me be clear. This man will never set foot in this house, ever!
Lily: Wait, how you know all this?
Lily: You've invited?!
Lily: I do not believe you. What gives you the right to do that?
Lily: Marshall, I came here because I was cold and it was the only place that was open. I would not even look at Mr. Park in the eye. And then I discovered that... Mr. Park's death. He really died for me. And if I feel so bad to have never forgiven Mr. Park, a guy who literally did not mean anything to me? We have to get my father.
Lily: Less talking shop, more slaps.
Lily: The Commissioner of the bet-Baffe says it's good.
Lily: Close your eyes. It will soon be over.
Lily: I can not do it. Why I can not do it?
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: All right, and party number one that's where we get to meet Mary Beth?
Lily: By who? Who asks you that?
Lily: It's working.
Lily: Bye.
Lily: Well, this kind of sucks.
Lily: We didn't really get a chance to meet. I'm Lily, and this is my fiance, Marshall.
Lily: You're, you're friendly.
Lily: Oh, no.
Lily: So, where are you from, Natalya?
Lily: Okay, I love these shoes, but the pain-to-hotness ratio is pretty steep. Can we swing by the apartment, so I can change?
Lily: Okay, Ted, but these dogs are really barking.
Lily: Barney, none of us really liked her.
Lily: Sorry.
Lily: What happened?
Lily: Which is exactly how much time I need. Ranjit, stop the car.
Lily: I'm going home.
Lily: I can't stay in these heels any longer, I just can't. There's a cab over there. I'll just run back to the apartment and change shoes.
Lily: Well, I know, baby, I'd love to go, but it's two against one.
Lily: No, baby. Baby, you go with them and I'll meet you at, at... party number three.
Lily: If I don't see you, happy new year.
Lily: I know we will. (Lily leaves the limo)
Lily: Oh, Marshall, thank God I got through.
Lily: Barney, where's Marshall?
Lily: What? Where?
Lily: Well, I'm here at party number three and... Oh, my God! Guess who just walked in... Moby!
Lily: Uh, no, I know Moby and that's Mo... Does he have a gun?
Lily: Who was that guy?!
Lily: No, but I was just at party number three.
Lily: I wish Marshall would call. I guess the circuits are jammed.
Lily: I can't believe Mary Beth left before midnight.
Lily: Okay, wow, it's getting weird in here. I'm going to call Marshall.
Lily: Marshall! Marshall!
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Baby, baby, I was so worried about you. Why didn't you call me?
Lily: Natalya?
Lily: Move, you stupid taxi!
Lily: Well, I just ralphed.
Lily: He hasn't been back home to Minnesota since Christmas. He's a little excited.
Lily: Yeah, no, it'll be fun.
Lily: Did I? No, I, I love Marshall's family.
Lily: But, yeah, no, it'll be great.
Lily: Yeah, no, shut up.
Lily: Oh, Barney.
Lily: Did you check your suitcase?
Lily: Wow, I forgot how tall you guys are.
Lily: Here I am. (Lily raises her hand)
Lily: You're gonna go play hockey?
Lily: With a basketball?
Lily: Baskiceball? Not iceketball?
Lily: Oh, well maybe that's just 'cause you haven't seen me play.
Lily: Well, that's funny because your brother throws like a girl.
Lily: Thank you. It'll go great with my...I just love it.
Lily: Oh, I make this great frisee and endive salad with a coriander lime vinaigrette.
Lily: Seven-layer salad?
Lily: Six cups of mayonnaise? That can't be right.
Lily: Go.
Lily: OK, I finished the gummy bear layer of the salad. What's next?
Lily: Potato chips.
Lily: Baby? Uh, you know, I hadn't really thought about it at all.
Lily: Well, I just ralphed.
Lily: Yeah, I mean, I'm way too young to have a baby, right?
Lily: (staring at turkey) Oh my.
Lily: That's a big baby, Judy.
Lily: (laughs nervously) Twins. Twins!
Lily: Three months! Three months?
Lily: And she's already pregnant again.
Lily: Yeah, well, well, not literally because, you know, I'm keeping my name.
Lily: No, I've decided and I'm keeping my own name.
Lily: Oh, sure, in St. Cloud but our kids aren't gonna be growing up in St. Cloud. Right, baby?
Lily: Oh, so is New York.
Lily: What? It is. And we grew up just fine. And we grew to the proper size and then we stopped.
Lily: But, Marshall, you love New York.
Lily: Yeah, to Brooklyn.
Lily: I need to go to the restroom.
Lily: Happy Thanksgiving. As in check out the chick buying the knock-up test everybody, wonder what must be going through her head. Yeah, well, since you asked, a family of mayonnaise-guzzling giants is trying to suck me into their suburban nightmare. And there's a solid chance that I have an Ericksen the size of a 15-pound turkey growing inside of me.
Lily: Fantastic.
Lily: I'm sorry I just yelled at you. You mind if I use your bathroom?
Lily: So what do you do when you have to...?
Lily: OK, I'll tell you but before I do, promise me that we are not gonna move to St. Cloud, Minnesota, promise.
Lily: Just promise.
Lily: Because I don't fit in here. I'm not eight feet tall and I don't think you can call it a salad if it has Funyuns in it.
Lily: Pete arrested me before I could look at it.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Yeah, what are the rules to that game, anyway? Marshall: There are no rules, we just wail on each other.
Lily: Great, now I'm crying. Look, we may have some really big decisions to make in about 10 seconds but right now, I don't care where our kids grow up as long as they have you for a father.
Lily: Gosh, I hope you're the father. Just a little joke to lighten up the mood.
Lily: Thank God.
Lily: (to Pete) And hey!
Lily: Is there a wrong way to pee on a stick?
Lily: Um, can boys aim? 'Cause it seems to me like I'm taking a mop to that bathroom floor every two days.
Lily: It's been two minutes.
Lily: It's positive.
Lily: I'm pregnant.
Lily: I'm pregnant.
Lily: What?
Lily: I'm pregnant.
Lily: I'm pregnant.
Lily: I can. And I'm freaking out, too! There's an alien growing in my stomach that's gonna explode out of my v*g1n*!
Lily: Just keep smiling, maybe wave. No, don't wave! That makes no sense!
Lily: Let's leave, then the waving will make sense.
Lily: Let's do it! Uh-huh, got it. Okay, that seems easy.
Lily: Blue? What if it's a girl?
Lily: Oh, God, it's 8:00! We're supposed to meet the gang at the bar to celebrate.
Lily: No, I can't keep it together!
Lily: The iPod was on shuffle! (Rock music stops) The Jerky Boys! Our baby heard the Jerky Boys!
Lily: The Jerky Boys aren't funny, they are awful.
Lily: Marshall, I don't like this.
Lily: So disappointing.
Lily: Huh? Yeah. Why wouldn't we be? Oh, the baby thing.
Lily: Don't reach into the living room!
Lily: Yeah, this whole thing got us thinking. Maybe we're not ready for kids yet after all.
Lily: This kid doesn't stand a chance.
Lily: We're ready for this.
Lily: Positive.
Lily: All right, let's hit the road.
Lily: Road trip! So you guys want to talk about bitches? I'm kidding. They're called women.
Lily: I have to pee.
Lily: I did. I just pee a lot. You'll see.
Lily: Sugar snap pea? Pea... That reminds me, I have to pee.
Lily: Yellow, that reminds me, I have to pee.
Lily: Great. Oh, hey, Ted...
Lily: No, I was just going to say maybe we should listen to something.
Lily: It's an audio book about a boy and his dog. It made Elisabeth Hasselbeck cry.
Lily: That reminds me, I have to pee.
Lily: Ah, I do.
Lily: Besides, they have a spa. What kind of treatments do you offer?
Lily: We'd love a cornmeal body scrub!
Lily: Hmm? Yeah?
Lily: Did you go somewhere, sweetie?
Lily: Mmm... Oh, oh, oh... Yeah...
Lily: So, I had a great time, too.
Lily: Oh, that's okay.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: I saw you at orientation and I needed an excuse to meet you, so...
Lily: Urgh. I'm exhausted. It was finger painting day at school, and a five year old boy (takes coat off revealing a purple hand print on her right breast) got to second base with me. Wow, you're cooking?
Lily: Aww-(They kiss) Are you sure that's a good idea after last time? You looked really creepy without eyebrows.
Lily: So there's more surprises? Like what?
Lily: Aw-honey. Champagne! (hands it to Marshall)
Lily: (realizing) No, you are too old to be scared to open a bottle of champagne!
Lily: Then open it!
Lily: You are unbelievable, Marshall. No-(Scene splits in half and shows both Lily and Marshall on top arguing and Ted and Yasmine on the bottom mingling)
Lily: Of course, you idiot! (hugs him and they fall back)
Lily: Did you know there's a pop tart under your fridge?
Lily: aww (claps. They kiss)
Lily: (YELLS)
Lily: Hit me? Please, this guy could barely even spank me in bed for fun. He's all like, (hits ice in bag using to cover eye) "Oh, did that hurt?" and I'm like, "Come on, let me have it you pansy!" (realizes) Wow, complete stranger.
Lily: How long have you been sitting there!? Stupid eye patch.
Lily: The olive theory.
Lily: wait, it's only the break of ten-thirty. What happened?
Lily: Aww, Ted that's so sweet. So you chickened out like the little bitch.
Lily: Ted, anyone who's single would tell you the same thing. Even the dumbest single person alive, and if you don't believe me...call him.
Lily: Ooo. She's cute! (To Carl) Hey Carl, turn it up!
Lily: Let's go (pulls Marshall up)
Lily: We're coming with you.
Lily: Kiss her, Ted. Kiss her good.
Lily: No!
Lily: Okay-that's my Barney Limit. (Starts to leave the cab) I'm goanna see if that Bodega has a bathroom. (Leaves)
Lily: We'll make it work. (They kiss.)
Lily: Okay, eye patch gone-(takes eye patch off and throws it at Barney) And we can't just abandon Ted. If it doesn't go well up there he's gonna need some support.
Lily: Okay, we can go to the bar, just stop talking.
Lily: That long lingering handshake-you should've kissed her!
Lily: I am so turned on right now.
Lily: (smiles) to the future!
Lily: Sorry, I'm, uh, I... I- I don't know, washing my hair.
Lily: Oh, wait. Just the two of you? Tread lightly, Mosby. Any time a single guy hangs out with a married woman, there are rules that must be followed. Rule number one...
Lily: Rule number one: don't go anywhere that has candles.
Lily: Rule number two: No sharing food. In fact, anything involving saliva is off-limits. Toothbrushes, thermometers, lipstick.
Lily: And the most important rule of all...
Lily: No lying to the spouse about anything you do.
Lily: You two never hang out alone. You just made up those nicknames right now.
Lily: Oh! Sweet. No candles.
Lily: Nah.
Lily: You're a big... stupid octopus head!
Lily: Ew! Ew! She lied to her husband? Uh-oh. So, what did you do?
Lily: It's not okay! I didn't really think it was okay! Pur-leez! You lie to your husband all the time. "Uh, uh, that shirt looks great on you""I love your mom""I never fantasize about Barney when we're doing it"" Sound familiar, Pinocchio?
Lily: No, you just need to spend time with her and The Captain together. If you're friends with the both of them, then there's not a problem.
Lily: Great. So go make nice with Captain Creepy, and problem solved.
Lily: Barney.
Lily: Look, I'm sorry I hurt your feelings. But let's be honest. You've been super sensitive lately.
Lily: Watch out!
Lily: Watch out!
Lily: I think I probably didn't.
Lily: Wait. I still can't resist getting one last shot in.
Lily: Seriously? I step away for five seconds, and you eat all my onion rings? No surprise there.
Lily: Want to hang?
Lily: Wow... thanks, Barney. You saved me. You saved us.
Lily: If there's one thing you never do, it's call a woman fat right to her face!
Lily: You're a jerk.
Lily: Well, you're a big... stupid octopus face!
Lily: Wow. Thanks, Barney. You saved me. You saved us. If there's one thing you never do, it's call a woman "fat" right to her face!
Lily: Oh... You're a jerk.
Lily:What's that?
Lily: Really?
Lily: That's so sweet!
Lily: Baby, you can wash it?
Lily: Barney, you came home!
Lily: Honey, you're going to wash it?
Lily: No. Of course not.
Lily: Thank you explained that. I get confused easily.
Lily: I do not even know why we laugh!
Lily: You're right. I'll do the dishes. Just after doing this.
Lily: Baby, you can do the dishes?
Lily: Baby, you can do the dishes?
Lily: Excuse me?
Lily: So you're saying you should not do the dishes because you work harder than me.
Lily: I teach kindergarten. I shape the leaders of tomorrow.
Lily: If you need to go there at night, or you turn on the light or toilet you sit.
Lily: Danny is not here, Mrs. Torrance.
Lily: Super. So I do not care if you have an orgasm. If you do not give a damn, do it yourself.
Lily: You will perhaps have to do it again.
Lily: Marshall, dinner is ready.
Lily: No, but what is your favorite.
Lily: I do not care when you take out. But if it is made of cheese as a good ziti, do soak.
Lily: I love you.
Lily: And keep in mind that the love you have for that other person is more important than winning.
Lily: The honeymoon phase may be over, but now you can get down to business. And honestly, it's the best part.
Lily: We won!
Lily: You're dirty. It is you who should be in the sink.
Lily: I don't know.
Lily: Just a bunch of drunk, sloppy idiots, fresh off a night of partying in the city, just desperate to hook up with anything that moves.
Lily: Yeah, like how Barney's holding these three hours over Ted's head.
Lily: And my dress. And your dress. You put a dress at one point.
Lily: What happened to your leg?
Lily: Let us be clear... this woman is angry against you because you lied to him. So your solution is to claim that you broke your leg?
Lily: That's great, Ted.
Lily: Wait a minute. You're going to handle two girls at once? You do not think you should pick one before it gets too serious?
Lily: Well, it's complicated. I think it would be when you have expectations, emotional involvement...
Lily: Well, it could be anyone. And thin, I had forgotten this story Biercules.Who made this site first?
Lily: I knew it. Ted, left or right?
Lily: Well, it looks like Jessica wins in the first four categories.
Lily: Oh, dear. You're still drunk. I can not believe that I made the bet.
Lily: What does it therefore reference?
Lily: Well... it could be anyone...
Lily: Pete, it's Lily Aldrin. I'll be brief. You're going out this video of Marshall. You know why? Because I am friends with three girls with whom you came to school, and girls say it all together. Every small detail.Huh. So... tick, tick... Pete so goes the clock in the little dick.
Lily: I have no idea. Well, what do you take?
Lily: But if he did, you would love all the same. And to be honest, you do not love to come across a video of him running down the street naked shouting, "Hey, Marshall, look at me! I have a stalactite on the head! "
Lily: Yes, the stupid thing that makes us turn the head, pretty cool.
Lily: Yes!
Lily: Saw what? Maybe the video is not so bad after all.
Lily: Yes. Even the side where you route the East Village naked.
Lily: It's a good idea.
Lily: Stop fighting!
Lily: It's stupid and childish.
Lily: There's a girl there in a sweater wrap. He does not listen to a word they say. Hein, Barney?
Lily: Barney, you wanna go and get my stuff does not Marshall?
Lily: Damn, there goes.
Lily: I can not believe that we have this discussion. Ted, you're 30, you're too old to act like that.
Lily: No!
Lily: Ted, do not do that, you're a good guy. This is your greatest quality.
Lily: I'm sorry.
Lily: It's the guys the most virile of the universe?
Lily: Yeah, it's you.
Lily: You're the man every boy should be and every girl should marry. You know what? I have two boys under way that will not stop fighting. If you come to school tomorrow to tell them your story of choice of the path of nonviolence, it could put them right. And avoid me getting up early to prepare lessons.
Lily: Robin, I'm afraid.
Lily: You visit? You really should.
Lily: And what did you learn?
Lily: Questions?
Lily: S *****, do not even think about.
Lily: Red! Honey, be careful.
Lily: Me. Or maybe we should make the hot sauce on Barney, now that's a sissy.
Lily: Cannibal.
Lily: Baby, no one can tell anyone. Not before three months. I do not want you to have bad luck.
Lily: Whenever you take a plane, you lick.
Lily: Do not say a word until we know that all is well. Ok?
Lily: How can you guarantee that?
Lily: Relax. It will be easy.
Lily: Four beer, plus a non-alcoholic.
Lily: Oh, no, thank you.
Lily: Let's be crazy! You're going to drink for two tonight, baby.
Lily: That's all you, baby.
Lily: In nine months I would push a baby Eriksen with a pumpkin head out of my hoo-haa. I think Dad can handle a few cocktails and more.
Lily: Hakuna Matata!
Lily: Wait a minute. It's your voice of truth.
Lily: Whenever you try to pretend that you're kidding but in fact it is profoundly true, you are using that voice.
Lily: Oh, my God. You always have feelings for Barney. Admit it, you still have feelings for Barney.
Lily: It does not make sense. It's chemistry. Listen, I always them a sixth sense for these things. And now that I'm pregnant... deep in me in my uterus, I see things more clearly. You and Barney have that kind of chemistry that is still there.
Lily: You're the reason why he never called Nora. You're the reason why he only tests tonight. And you're the reason why he continues to try to impress. Chemistry.
Lily: Oh really? Prove it. Go talk to him.
Lily: Because in the depths of himself, even if he does not know yet, Barney wants to be with you. And if it does not happen, he deserves to know.
Lily: Eriksen, be strong. Keep it a secret.
Lily: Marshall, stop that. Remains strong. Can not you let me hold a little baby with his little cheeks... so cute... and little arms and little legs... This little b*st*rd has dimples. We will tell everyone I'm pregnant.
Lily: We're having a baby.
Lily: For real.
Lily: Ted, the bride wants to see you. Seriously? Will you be wearing this tie?
Lily: Oh, oh, oh, you want us to say your name and un-jinx you?
Lily: Ooh!
Lily: (On Phone) Let's go to MacLaren's.
Lily: I'm so glad we finally get to hang out just the two of us!
Lily: You sure you're okay giving up your Friday night to hang with an old almost-married lady?
Lily: Unless it's the end of the night, then you get on anything.
Lily: Really? Sweet.
Lily: I guess that's one drawback to being engaged. I'm sure that's why he didn't...
Lily: (peeking over his shoulder) Oh. Oh, hello!
Lily: So I grew up in Park Slope.
Lily: (Laughs) Heyow.
Lily: Oh, believe me I've been there. I have this line that I use when guys come (Guy#3 walks by) Check it out.
Lily: You take this one, I'll save it for the next one.
Lily: (On Phone) You're going to Philly? Why...
Lily: (On Phone) Well it sounds like you're having a lot more fun than I am. I'm just talking to guys' backs while they hit on Robin.
Lily: (On Phone) Don't you bet I get that a lot?
Lily: (On Phone) Oh, of course, that's it the ring! I guess I'm not used to it yet.
Lily: (On Phone) I'm not going to take off my ring! Wouldn't you be jealous of guys swarming all over my beeswax?
Lily: (On Phone) Bye.
Lily: Robin! Robin. (Waves her left hand ridiculously to show that she has no ring. Robin walks over) Hey, I'm over here.
Lily: (Unbuttoning sweater) No, this place is great (positions mouth in an inviting kiss position)
Lily: What?
Lily: My lips are always like this (drinks martini and drops it all over her blouse)
Lily: Really.
Lily: Yeah, yeah...booth (throws purse to Robin, spots a man. Robin leaves to booth. Man walks up to Robin.)
Lily: (Smiling) Hey. (Silence) I'm engaged, sorry. (Puts ring on) I took my ring off! It's very, very sweet of you to come over and talk to me, but I... just...
Lily: Oh, damn it! (Takes ring off and places it in her pocket, upset)
Lily: Just fending up the advances of that totally hot guy.
Lily: (Gives in) Oh, I know that guy is gay. Just Marshall and I have been together for nine years. I haven't been single since high school.
Lily: I guess I wanted to throw this net back into the ocean and see how many fish I could catch. So far, one. One gay dolphin. (Smiles)
Lily: You're right I know. Hey do you wanna get some coffee and have an actual conversation?
Lily: Oh, thank you so much.
Lily: Marshall, no.
Lily: Marshall, he's gay!
Lily: Hey!
Lily: That does happen, like Ted.
Lily: You suck!
Lily: Our apartment is so crowded these days, I don't get a minute to myself!
Lily: Why does my stomach hurt?
Lily: Oh, baby, you know we're lactose-intolerant.
Lily: No, we're not.
Lily: Oh, I need to get some eggs.
Lily: Logistics. Wedding logistics.
Lily: It would make our wedding night more special.
Lily: Done.
Lily: I'll come with you. No. I'll stay.
Lily: Okay, I know. You know? I got to go. Good-bye. My mom's driving me cra....
Lily: Marshmallow, don't forget to pack my night-night tape.
Lily: He doesn't say it. He sings it.
Lily: Damn it. Nobody's bought us anything cool yet off our registry.
Lily: Ooh, lots of stuff. Kitchen Aide Artisan Series tilt-head stand mixer...
Lily: Um, the Dyson DC17 Animal vacuum.
Lily: I'm ready! Lily comes into the livingroom with her wedding dress while Robin singins.)
Lily: I know! I'm beautiful! I'm a fairy princess! (she raises her arms and the dress falls.) I'm too skinny for my dress!
Lily: Oh, crap.
Lily: It's $300 just to take the bust in? Oh, please, you have to have some sympathy for me. I'm getting married next Saturday, and I'm too skinny for my dress. I lost all this weight without even trying. Hello?
Lily: She called me a bitch and hung up. Oh, I don't know what to do. I guess I'll just have to pay the $300.
Lily: Ooh, a Valrhona chocolate soufflée with a raspberry brandy sauce topped with caramelized bananas and hazelnut gelato.
Lily: Done!
Lily: I love you, too. I know it's soon to say it, but I'm so glad you did.
Lily: Hey.
Lily: The host of The Price Is Right, Bob Barker?
Lily: This is the best wedding diet ever.
Lily: I lost a pound.
Lily: I knew that Super Size Me guy was full of it.
Lily: I can't.
Lily: I'm trying.
Lily: Okay!
Lily: Are you just going to talk about holding my hand or are you going to hold it?
Lily: I give up, too. I don't care if my dress doesn't fit. I can't eat anymore. I-I feel like my stomach's going to explode.
Lily: God, I missed you.
Lily: Sure, baby.
Lily: Ugh, terribly. I'm too stressed out without you around.
Lily: So are you two back together?
Lily: Yeah! She had just as much s*x with Barney as Barney had with her.
Lily: I will tell you why he is not mad. Because he is so happy with Stella.
Lily: You guys haven't had s*x yet!!?? When Marshall and I were two months, we were doing it 24/7.
Lily: So what you guys waiting for?
Lily: Oh baby, do you remember Martin Luther King day?
Lily: Five years! God, if I even went one year, I would be out on the street selling it for a nickel.
Lily: So what does this mean for you? Is she ever wanna want to get intimate?
Lily: You know what? It's not. This woman needs it bad. Anything you do is going to be fireworks. I remember my longest drought...
Lily: (V.O.) It was that summer I lived in San Francisco. I hadn't had been with Marshall since two months and 19 days. (There is a shock. And Lily likes the sensation which that gets her.)
Lily: Oh, San Francisco!
Lily: Hey.
Lily: Yeah. We heard. I would explode if it had been that long since I had a "night out".
Lily: Nothing. Pizza. What are you talking about?
Lily: No way.
Lily: Good night!
Lily: Hey, baby.
Lily: Are you okay?
Lily: Oh, baby, I'm so sorry.
Lily: Oh, baby, it's just not fair. You've been working so hard. Late nights, weekends. I never see you. We've barely made love in weeks. It's bad, guys, mama needs her sugar.
Lily: God, you're hot right now.
Lily: And I don't scream at my kids, none of whom have parents who work at marshall's firm.
Lily: Well, what I teach my kids in kindergarten...
Lily:...When dealing with a bully, the most important thing is to be constructive and positive.
Lily: Hello, Arthur.
Lily: I have the ninja report right here. But Arthur, in the future, if you want someone to do their best work, try to motivate them, not with fear and intimidation, but through encouragement, inspiration and respect.
Lily: Oh, you're damn right. You know what I'm gonna do when I get home?
Lily: I'm gonna rip that girl's clothes off...
Lily:...just throw her on the bed...
Lily:...and drive her home like a pack of sled dogs!
Lily: It's bad, guys. Mama needs it bad.
Lily: I'm gonna drive her home like a pack of...
Lily: I have the ninja report right here, but...
Lily: Which of these carpets would look better in the new apartment? I like the color of this one, but this one's so soft. It would feel great on your bare feet......or your bare back, a bead of eager sweat rolling down your trembling bosom.
Lily: Wow, you two are already saying the "l" word, huh?
Lily: You hitting that?
Lily: No, you're not.
Lily: Marshall, our future isn't money or an apartment. And it's definitely not you being miserable at that horrible job. I'm just happy to have my husband back. We'll figure the rest out.
Lily: I love you, too.
Lily: What do you mean "could"?
Lily: A... LAME-A?
Lily: What?
Lily: Oh, yeah, sorry. I'm just exhausted from work. The stupid school board took away nap time in all kindergarten classes and now the kids are just going crazy by the end of the day. It's much harder to deal with because, well, I don't get my nap.
Lily: Well, they're only five. What are they gonna do to me?
Lily: Yep.
Lily: Look at you, Scherbotsky, blatantly trying to make Ted jealous.
Lily: No, it's not going to be weird at all. (Lily's on the phone with Marshall) Robin's bringing a date.
Lily: I know.
Lily: Hey.
Lily: I'm Lily.
Lily: Who has s*x for money?
Lily: No, not really. We just chitchatted and I borrowed her lipstick. Why is Vampire Lou the host of a Saturday Afternoon Kung Fu Movie? You know, it just makes no sense. God, that pisses me off.
Lily: Oh, yeah, I'm just tired. And when I get tired, I get cranky.
Lily: "Really? I couldn't imagine you cranky."
Lily: Well, I teach kindergarten and the school board took away my nap time, the kids' nap time.
Lily: Well, guess what, Barney? I don't base all my life decisions on how much money I'm going to make, unlike you and, sadly, my fiance.
Lily: Yeah, because if I did sacrifice all my values just for an easy buck, what would that make me?
Lily: Exactly. Thank you, Mary.
Lily: Oh, what firm?
Lily: Marshall, what is up with you and Ted?
Lily: Is that true?
Lily: You know, Barney, for anyone else, this would be a new low, but sadly, for you, it's just a new middle. Oh, my God, I used her lipstick! Ah!
Lily: No!
Lily: Falafel?
Lily: Instead of telling Ted you love him, you said "falafel"?
Lily: I just don't get it. Why can't you tell Ted you love him?
Lily: Oh, God, you'd think you never said it to a guy before. No.
Lily: Don't tell me you're actually buying into Barney's freeway theory.
Lily: Yeah, been there. I once dated a guy who could only go to the bathroom when classical music was playing. Okay, it was Marshall.
Lily: Relax, it'll happen when it happens. Which is also the advice I gave Marshall to get him over the classical music thing.
Lily: Aw, your sister's so cute.
Lily: Hello, Kitty.
Lily: It's 2:00 and you've already had three scotch and sodas.
Lily: Marshall and I have never been to the Empire State Building either. But I'm so glad I waited to do something so important with my fiancee.
Lily: Oh, remember cloves?
Lily: Barney, you okay?
Lily: That's Dirty Dancing.
Lily: Do you remember our first time?
Lily: Oh, wait, wait. Look... I really want to do this, but... we should make it special, you know? Do this right.
Lily: Yeah, New Year's Eve.
Lily: Oh, and we'll light candles and maybe put on some classical music.
Lily: Why not?
Lily: Oh, yeah, that sounds so good. Oh, I love you, Marshall. I'm so glad we're waiting. (12 minutes later): Oops. End of flashback.
Lily: Yeah. Want to do it again?
Lily: The point is no matter what, it's never gonna be as perfect as you want it to be.
Lily: Wait, I've never heard your story.
Lily: I'm so sorry.
Lily: What do you mean just barely?
Lily:  Then you didn't lose your virginity to him. Just barely doesn't count.
Lily: No, it doesn't.
Lily: No, it doesn't. It doesn't count. End of story.
Lily: My high school boyfriend, who I did not have s*x with.
Lily: Marshall, why is this such a big deal?
Lily: Okay, Marshall, I get it.
Lily: No, it doesn't. Look, have you been to the Empire State Building? No. You've only been in the lobby. People don't buy tickets to get in the lobby. They buy tickets to get to the top. Scooter only got in the lobby, and the lobby doesn't count.
Lily: Exactly! So yesterday doesn't count as having gone to the Empire State Building. So I lost it to you, Marshall. And I rode that elevator to the top, and I saw that view, and I basked in the awesomeness. And that's our story.
Lily: We've only had s*x with each other.
Lily: Speaking of first times, we never got to hear your virginity story.
Lily: Robin!
Lily: What do you mean "Win the breakup", old timey inventor.
Lily: It's not a competition. Now, your 80-day ballon race around the world, that was a competition.
Lily: How do you know?
Lily: To get that last one, you'd have to break into the Smithsonian.
Lily: Oh, for the hundredth time, I'm sorry, there was a lull.
Lily: Do you want to have diner with me? Uh, us?
Lily: No, I don't!...Not incredibly. It's a little hard to believe how hot is he. But I mean, she isn't serious about him. The girl never marries the hot guy.
Lily: I'm one of the lucky few.
Lily: Hey, Robin. (Looks down) Gael.
Lily: I do not! Shut up! Oh, my God!
Lily: Oh, I forgive you, Mom.
Lily: Oh, yeah, that's what I was doing. I was building him up so few minutes later, I could totally cut him down.
Lily: Look.
Lily: We've gotta call Barney.
Lily: Hum. Really, never? Not even if, say, butterflies flew out of his ass?
Lily: He's gonna say it.
Lily: It meant nothing to us. It just felt really really really good.
Lily: He got a tramp stamp. (Everyone laughs)
Lily: I think that's great, Ted. You can do whatever you set your mind to. In fact, you've inspired me. I'm going to stop biting my nails.
Lily: I know, but I'm doing this for Ted. Hmm. God, this is really hard.
Lily: Barney...
Lily: We've talked about this. It's a fire code violation.
Lily: No, no, you are on a time-out. Go sit over there.
Lily: Go!
Lily: You know, you can do this, Ted. I said that I would stop biting my nails, and kablam-ey. It's just a challenge. It can't be easy to woo someone while you're sticking your naked butt in their face.
Lily: Ted. You just got to be yourself, no more gimmicks.
Lily: No, you have to. She likes you. She said so herself. (clearing throat) I mean...
Lily: I swear to you, I did not.
Lily: Ted, you were never a badass.
Lily: Those with a show at 5am?
Lily: What do you want? Sometimes it's like that. The same thing over and over again. One of my students ate glue.
Lily: Karen is here?
Lily: My God, it was a real idiot.
Lily: Of course, for you. You had it turned into a zombie of andouille.
Lily: You pass me the salt?
Lily: You can not get back with Karen.
Lily: My name is Lily and I approve this order. You know the story. Ted and Karen had a rocky relationship in college. It always happened like this. They were having fun, being obnoxious until one day...
Lily: They hated it!
Lily: Then Ted went up the noggin and took the bus to Providence to tell Karen's four truths.
Lily: And finally, all over again from scratch.
Lily: Are you kidding!
Lily: I can not believe that thou hast called. Why do not you invite him to lunch as you're at it?
Lily: You have to lunch?
Lily: As my high school boyfriend, Scooter.
Lily: The Lilium, not stupid. Sorry, I have no scooter for you.
Lily: It is this server?
Lily: Robin, I will have to borrow the butt of your gun.
Lily: How can you break bread with this chick?
Lily: What has happened?
Lily: Ted, darling. Go outside and bite the curb. I arrive in 1 minute.
Lily: What do you mean you forgot your pants?
Lily: And the spare.
Lily: Ted, you're not going out so easily. While the history of pants is fun...
Lily: That's nothing compared to this crazy thing with Karen.Ends.
Lily: Why do you say "the restaurant"? You've embraced elsewhere?
Lily: Marshall forgot his pants today, and yet you are the stupidest in this table.
Lily: Asshole.
Lily: February 5,... In 1998. I painted...
Lily: Ted Horn, critique my painting, anything, that's your business. But I catch you eyeing the mess of my guy and you lingered? You'll be received well.
Lily: He had eaten my fruit bowl. The fact is that Karen is a dirty pervert, you can not bring into our lives.
Lily: I just give something to Marshall.
Lily: But I'm in a hurry. I can give it to you?
Lily: And you give him?
Lily: What are you talking?
Lily: Marshall forgot his pants, so I brought him one.
Lily: Awesome. Thank you.
Lily: I'll finish for you. Ted left without saying anything, and Karen got exactly what she wanted.
Lily: You know, this is perhaps good that you called Karen.
Lily: Wait a minute. You said that you never reparlerais him?So how do you know she has followed your advice?
Lily: You got smoked!
Lily: You got smoked!
Lily: Damn Marshall. It has four lamps and Viking smoking kills.
Lily: I do not care about your reasons, you know what I think of smoking. Now give me the cigarettes! And the lighter. (Lily lights a cigarette) Aaah, that thing!
Lily: We saw.
Lily: Maybe that smoking is not so bad, at least it is outdoors.
Lily: Me too.
Lily: You stop my chick. (She removes the cigarette from his hands) I know I did not call you chick normally, but it does with that voice. Chick.
Lily: You can sleep with Marshall.
Lily: Sorry darling, that's for the team.
Lily: Give a cigarette!
Lily: Barney stops eating your fingers.
Lily: Yes sweetie, and you are very pretty.
Lily: Resists sweetie!
Lily: We will not smoke.
Lily: And this guy So what con.
Lily: When he got up, the forms were more revealing, you should go out with him.
Lily:... two...
Lily: Totally. What's the occasion?
Lily: Wait, wait. Did he break up with you and tell you he's just not that Inuit?
Lily: Louise Marsh?! That's a whore's name if I ever heard one.
Lily: Oh! I know why. You're gonna win, aren't you?
Lily: Point Robin.
Lily: So, Simon, Robin's a bit of a local celebrity here in New York. She's the lead anchor at Metro News One. Tell him, Robin.
Lily: Well, that's cool. You got to pay the bills somehow since your whole music thing didn't really pan out, did it?
Lily: What?
Lily: Oh, yeah. I'll give her a call, see if she wants to hang out.
Lily: What happened?
Lily: He asked you out?! Oh, step into my web, Simon.
Lily: Robin, this guy doesn't deserve a second chance. Not after the way he treated you.
Lily: Oh, hell, no!
Lily: That my girl Michelle?
Lily: How she livin'?
Lily: Oh, girl, you gots to get your drink on up in here.
Lily: For reals.
Lily: What's revertigo?
Lily: Oh. One example of that springs to mind. I think we all know what it is.
Lily: Yeah. Ted.
Lily: Whenever Ted's friend Punchy comes into town, it's like, all of a sudden, Ted's in high school again.
Lily: Why?
Lily: Oh, we know you do, honey, but we're worried about you.
Lily: I don't know. Is there any version where you don't sound like a 16-year-old?
Lily: No. If I was your mom, I woulsay, "We forbid you from seeing this boy."
Lily: No, I'm sorry, but it's for your own good.
Lily: You've been drinking, haven't you?
Lily: You're not going to that show tonight!
Lily: Young lady, get back here! Thanks for your help.
Lily: Oh, Robin, I'm gonna tell you for real. Simon's a dawg. You feel me, Chelle?
Lily: Mm. True dat. I'ma get me my champagne and grape soda on.
Lily: Okay,
Lily: Wait.
Lily: I hope not.
Lily: Well, the movers arrive in 14 hours. We have to go back to finish the boxes.
Lily: A half hour?
Lily: Oh, dear. That's what the guys know that after moving in with a woman. All your stuff are idiots.
Lily: Like everything else you bought the medieval festivals.
Lily: Give me the stick.
Lily: Let's go!
Lily: Yes, what a moment of incredible human sincerity.
Lily: Yes, it's been two weeks.
Lily: This is an intervention.
Lily: Oh my God. This is one of p'tain of pleasant surprise. This is about what?
Lily: P'tain.
Lily: We know, darling, you know. This is a brand new vest.
Lily: Specifically, those with fire.
Lily: It smells like hair!
Lily: Well, that was stupid. Yes, forget it.
Lily: Like I said, it was stupid.
Lily: This is ridiculous. It changed his mind.
Lily: "The capabilities of Gilbert reading have improved considerably... "This is a letter I had to give one of my students.
Lily: But concerns that a completely expelled.
Lily: It was sophisticated.
Lily: Ted, stop unpacking. You're in the process of pinball.
Lily: Ted going bonkers. The movers arrive in 10 hours. His bride awaits in New Jersey. We must do something.
Lily: This is the black hole where dreams go to die. I move it, either.
Lily: Guys, finish unpacking. I will bake cookies to fill R2-plump.
Lily: Oh, honey.
Lily: What?
Lily: So if we continued the evening up there?
Lily: Forget it.
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: When I was a kid, I had a dog named Bean. Whenever he made the face that you're making right now, you just knew he pooped somewhere in the house. Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: Where's the poop?
Lily: Good for you. Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: Give me your phone. We're deleting Don's number.
Lily: Prove it. Delete contact.
Lily: Barney, why can't you just take a girl out to dinner like a normal person?
Lily: But designing a building in New York City is your lifelong dream.
Lily: Don't "Hey, Lily" me. I smelled poop all the way from the hallway.
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: But that's impossible. You deleted his number.
Lily:Oh, sweetie, I totally understand. Delete it!
Lily: I know, sweetie. I know. Delete it!
Lily: My "plezh." If you can find a number in there that I don't call regularly, I'll gladly delete it.
Lily: No, not that one. That's my dojo.
Lily: I took an introductory karate class.
Lily: Ops, wrong room. Where do the grown-ups go for the real karate class?
Lily: Of you? Please. I'm a kindergarten teacher.
Lily: But I'm totally gonna sign up for more lessons.
Lily: I don't know. It was around the time when everyone was going, "Wassuuuuuuup!"
Lily: I might.
Lily: No, it's not. Okay, you know what? There, gone. Your move, Scherbatsky.
Lily: Oh, that sucks. Although I like you two together.
Lily: You're loving this.
Lily: You are. You're loving the attention.
Lily: Robin never deleted Don's number.
Lily: Probably not, baby.
Lily: Okay. Your turn.
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: I thought you deleted his number.
Lily: Well, you have to try. If you ever want to have closure...
Lily: Hey, punk! Bit of advice. Next time you step on a kindergarten teacher's neck, you better finish the job.
Lily: Voluntarily, you abandon your p0rn...? You're really serious.
Lily: He really is growing at a time.
Lily: My God, matte videos. The orgy of space? The surprise party of 23 students naughty?
Lily: You can get rid of it.
Lily: Are you sure? It's nothing. We can go around back and throw the box in the trash.
Lily: Because...
Lily: Let's go. A more.
Lily: I Tail-Dalle.
Lily: Yeah. It's called Tail-Dalle.
Lily: We're sure he had done?
Lily: No, of course. This is an old tape. Barney is pleased with Robin.
Lily: So what you did last night?
Lily: How do you go?
Lily: They love each other.
Lily: They are perfect together.
Lily: Of course, my heart.
Lily: It's a bad time. It takes time to get used to each other. They are... How do you say "selfish" nicely?
Lily: Independents. Every relationship goes through there.
Lily: It's a bad time. Let us do things.
Lily: Two against one, Ted. Let them.
Lily: Forget. I took my retirement. I no longer.
Lily: I swear, I gave up these shots there. I became legit. I am now matchmaker.
Lily: I just started.
Lily: I know, but I learned the lesson. I no longer interferes. I let things.
Lily: But the one that's me.
Lily: What did you do? I'm furious now. It will not?
Lily: Oh, my God! I'd love to!
Lily: You have lost your mind? You knew they were playing that first deflates, and what? You give them an engagement ring!Okay, that's good. I care. I return to the center stage for a final rupture.
Lily: They are up to their necks. A single argument will not suffice. We must revive the four largest arguments they've ever had, at one time. Number one, the battle of dirty dishes. Number two, the conflict of ex-girlfriends.
Lily: Number three, the altercation Star Wars.
Lily: And, of course, the biggest, the Canadian-American War.
Lily: Poor kid. This is how it will happen. They are the restau... (Lily imagines the scene) First, it rekindles debate US-Canada, when Alan Thicke, a native of Ontario, going to their table.
Lily: They are always in contact. I had his number on the mobile Robin. Seriously... amateurs. (She plunges into the scene) So, Alan Thicke stimulus battle USA / Canada. Just then, Meg-the-crazy happens. Then, a stormtrooper happening in the street.And just when they are tired, a diver passes with a basin full of what? Dirty dishes.
Lily: Get in the car.
Lily: They did not stormtrooper so I had to take another robot. It will work also.
Lily: Of course they are robots! "Must kill Luke Skywalker"
Lily: We need it here. It is in hiding.
Lily: Give a hand to the stormtrooper.
Lily: No, go up. Wait... When they blew the Death Star with thousands of stormtroopers it was human?
Lily: You know what? Everyone, stop! Alan thicke, close it!Marshall is a break. Put-in-t. Ted, stop talking about p0rn. And for God's sake, give the pizza stormtrooper!
Lily: Damn! They see us.
Lily: This is my masterpiece. And then they saw us? It will work anyway.
Lily: Alan Thicke, to you. Go ahead.
Lily: They kiss? They should not! Why it does not work?
Lily: What am I doing? All this was a mistake.
Lily: Where is Barney?
Lily: I love that you are always so many friends after this clip.
Lily: Hey, you guys should check out that song by the band Dishwalla.
Lily: Ted, that beret looks stupid.
Lily: And then you build to something else small, like a tasty snack.
Lily: And when Honeywell starts trusting your stamp again, he'll seek out your opinion on things.
Lily: We've been trying and trying, and still nothing's happened. I'm just worried we can't have children.
Lily: Six days.
Lily: Something must be wrong. W... we're doing it a lot.
Lily: Seriously, Doc, why isn't this happening?
Lily: Well, what's your plan, Marshall, just have unprotected s*x day after day after day in every position imaginable until...? Wait, it sounded worse in my head.
Lily: Well, I'm gonna call Dr. Stangel. It can't hurt.
Lily: Ooh! How did you do it?
Lily: What are you talking about?
Lily: My visit to a certain Dr. Stangel.
Lily: Just one, "Dr. Stangel". Where'd you get the beard?
Lily: Wait, so you weren't wearing a fake beard and examining girl parts all day?
Lily: Uh, Marshall?
Lily: No, we've made a binding covenant with the universe. We said we weren't going to try to have kids until we saw Barney's doppelganger. Oh, this is bad news. This is like a black cat walked through my uterus. Okay, that's it. I am going back to Dr. Stangel and getting thoroughly checked out.
Lily: I still kind of think it's Barney.
Lily: Uh-uh, no. Can't do it.
Lily: Okay. Convinced.
Lily: "Suit up"... not convinced. This whole thing stinks to high heaven.
Lily: He could have pulled some crazy switch. Remember when his Swedish cousin came to visit?
Lily: Yeah, I'm sorry, but unless I see Barney at the same time, I... I'll never be sure that Dr. Stangel isn't him.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: Can we leave him in here for a while?
Lily: Hi, honey. There's a couple messages on the machine. Your dad called. He wants to know if you have any sixes.
Lily: Dr. Stangel's office. I'm extremely fertile.
Lily: Okay, now you're being ridiculous. An hour ago, you didn't even think there was a problem.
Lily: What's wrong?
Lily: Already? Oh, honey.
Lily: Oh, yeah. Isn't it great? They just showed up. Your mom's already rearranged my kitchen, organized my closet... and she asked me if I lost height. Not weight. Height.
Lily: Oh, okay. Well, I'll go handle your parents. And you handle your, well... Wait, wait, wait. Marshall.
Lily: He's going to m*st*rb*t*.
Lily: Marshall, just tell them what's going on.
Lily: Marshall... Something's happened. Um... Your father, he had a heart attack. He... he didn't make it.
Lily: Well, a teacher at my school, Jillian, a birthday. What?
Lily: Do not be jealous. We hang out together all the time.
Lily: This is false.
Lily: Come with me and Jillian, then.
Lily: Pretentious.
Lily: No. Believe me, it's not his style. She must not know what kind of place this is.
Lily: Oh, my God. At school, she is so calm and normal. I thought it was not... a Woo.
Lily: I swear, at school, Jillian is not so Woo.
Lily: No thank you... drag ignorant.
Lily: You do not need a Woo. Nobody needs it.
Lily: None of this stuff...
Lily: Ted did not get the job. But this is not the biggest disappointment of the day.
Lily: You were seen to Woo.
Lily: You who did Woo?
Lily: Oh, yes.
Lily: Your nose is growing. You've become best friends with Jillian now?
Lily: Like what?
Lily: I can Woo.
Lily: But if.
Lily: Wooo!
Lily: The same things are funny as singles.
Lily: I had no cowboy hat, and it was the day of fire safety at school... My God, ***** s. This is our theme.
Lily: LL Cool J stuff always comes out?
Lily: You are a bunch of prostitutes. You must have STDs.
Lily: I get it. Because I am happily married, I'm a schmuck?
Lily: You say that to make me feel not like an old married.
Lily: The poor girls... and Ted. I want to give them a hug.
Lily: And you, mine. And I promise to dedicate ourselves more time. Marshall did not need to paste something from being done.
Lily: Where did you get that hat?
Lily: Aaaaaaaaaaaaah!
Lily: Welcome to my new home.
Lily: Yeah,I know it's small, but it's got character. Thank you. And I am learning Lithuanian from my neighbors. They're great. They're always out there in the hall, you know, cooking and gambling and giving each other haircuts. It's nice.
Lily: Oh, that's not just a stove. That's a stovenkerator: a combination of a stove, oven and sink and refrigerator. Stovenkerator. Isn't that futuristic?
Lily: It's kind of a mess. I didn't make my bed this morning, so...
Lily: That was "something, something, I am going to something you like a something donkey.
Lily: Hey, let's break out the fruit basket. Hey, who ate all the...? (Mouse squeaking) Aaaaaah!
Lily: Ted gave me your spare key.
Lily: I'm sorry,but you know I'd only come here if I had no other choice. But earlier today, I was getting ready to go to sleep and...
Lily: Wait, can I stay here maybe?
Lily: You live in a two-bedroom apartment. You have one room just for your suits.
Lily: Ewww!...Is something some lame, judgmental chick would say, but I say give me multiple high fives.
Lily: I really am.
Lily: Why would I change anything? This place is... Perfect. Except for the fact that you don't have a TV.
Lily: It hurts my eyes.
Lily: Thank you. There was no food in the fridge, so I picked up... (Barney puts the breakfast in the trash) What are you doing?
Lily: "Don't change anything"?
Lily: There was no second rule.
Lily: I bought groceries. That counts as changing something?
Lily: Marshall doesn't have p0rn.
Lily: And if that doesn't drive them away, there's always your life-sized storm-trooper.
Lily: Well, she'd have to with your spring-loaded toilet seat, wouldn't she?
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: I'll do it.
Lily: Barney,you've clearly got some serious mother issues that have left you the emotional equivalent of a scavenging sewer rat. But, in my other apartment, I would be living with an actual scavenging sewer rat, so you win.
Lily: How could you? In our own home? (She slaps him) You b*st*rd!
Lily: Just get out. This is what I get after I worked as a stripper for four years to put you through medical school? I got breast implants for you. I... (The girl is gone) I was just about to turn on the tears.
Lily: Yeah, that I just always wanted to do.
Lily: You know... Oh nah, never mind.
Lily: Well,if you really wanted to sell this ruse, we should try to make this place a little more... You know, homey. Like... Like a woman would actually live here.
Lily: Oh,I think we made the right decision going for the custom-made italian sheets.
Lily: Oh, I was just going to watch "Letterman" but, God this bed is so comfy. I wish you had a TV in here. (Barney turns on a another wall-size TV) Okay, seriously, what do you do for a living?
Lily: I thought you were going out.
Lily: Aaaaaaaaaaah!
Lily: Nothing. Nothing happened. We... We just went to sleep.
Lily: Hey,it takes two to cuddle.
Lily: That's what you think a relationship is?
Lily: Barney. I don't think you're mad at me. You're mad at yourself. You let down your guard, and let someone into your life, and... And it actually felt okay. And that terrifies you.
Lily: Hey, you can't just kick me out! I put a lot of work into this place, and I've grown accustomed to a certain standard of living.
Lily: This is a new lawyer in the office of Marshall, he is hilarious.
Lily: I'm in a hurry to meet him.
Lily: Hey baby, I go up there.
Lily: There was a problem at school, it was therefore the day. I thought to visit you, eat something with a nice little dessert.
Lily: Hello, I'm Lily, Marshall's wife.
Lily: You are Jenkins?
Lily: The famous Jenkins, gosh. I imagined a man, in short, we eat?
Lily: Honey, I do not have to worry about you and another woman.
Lily: Yes of course. Let's eat.
Lily: Let me see.
Lily: I think sometimes it's the case.
Lily: No, of course not.
Lily: I would say this is me, this is what is right.
Lily: No, no weak or strong.
Lily: And Oprah has tried everything?
Lily: I think if I had to really say, maybe I'm strong.
Lily: Hey baby, what do you do at home?
Lily: What?
Lily: Oh, I see what happens. That's about all that history of strong and weak.
Lily: You wanna make me jealous so you invent a story with Jenkins.
Lily: Of course it was.
Lily: I'm so jealous, I'll go see it and hit right on the nose... like an old sandwich. Come on baby, you want some soup?
Lily: Kissed my husband! MY HUSBAND! Nobody embraces the father of my future children besides me.
Lily: Yes.
Lily: Hey, look. Our old answering machine.
Lily: Thanks. Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
Lily: I'm... a what?
Lily: That was you, Ted.
Lily: Marshall left a message for Marshall?
Lily: Why would you call me that?
Lily: The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Lily: Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that message?
Lily: Why not?
Lily: Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Lily: Merry Christmas, assface.
Lily: At my apartment.
Lily: Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language? I would be on the phone with their parents.
Lily: Exactly. You know what that word means. You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily: Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Lily: Who is this?
Lily: Hey, you tricked me.
Lily: No, I knew it was you. I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Lily: No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Lily: Oh, shut up. You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby? Huh? You're clearly still mad at me.
Lily: Yes, you are.
Lily: I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it. Why can't you?
Lily: Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
Lily: How can you...
Lily: Happy? Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Lily: That's my super. He lives above me. Great. Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Lily: Merry Christmas! What's in the box?
Lily: I thought you were writing a paper.
Lily: Okay. Oh, my God. An Easy Bake Oven! I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl. In this exact model. I never told you that. How did you know?
Lily: When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven. I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Lily: I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Lily: Staten Island.
Lily: I came here to apologize. I'm so sorry, Ted.
Lily: Are you coming home?
Lily: Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Lily: Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Lily: That's okay. I was kind of a Grinch.
Lily: Isn't it sad? I mean in 2007, some countries actually still condone corporal punishment.
Lily: Peeing.
Lily: All right,we have a turkey.
Lily: Isn't this exciting? Our first Thanksgiving together as a group.
Lily: Bob? You've been on, like, three dates with that guy. We haven't even met him.
Lily: Yes. This is our first Thanksgiving. 30 years from now, we're going to look at the photos and say, "Oh, there's the four people I love most in the world... and Bob."
Lily: The hostess in me who's using her wedding china for the first time wants to say hell, no, but yeah, I 'm going to allow it.
Lily: What are you talking about? He's forty-one.he looks great.
Lily: Oh, by the way, we're all baking pies at robin's tomorrow. Marshall can't be trusted in the apartment with pies overnight.
Lily: 7:30.
Lily: Oh, marshall, are you working on the cranberry sauce?
Lily: Yeah, some people just can't take a hint. By the way, I'm really swamped in here.
Lily: Uh-huh. I'm not sure I have time to mash those potatoes, you're standing right next to.
Lily: Yep. masher's right there, next to the pot.
Lily: How do you respond to something like that?
Lily: No, Ted! What are you doing?
Lily: That is a terrible idea!
Lily: What the hell were you doing? Let's review: you and Ted broke up six months ago. You're dating another man...
Lily:...who's coming to my thanksgiving today...
Lily:...an event Ted is also attending.
Lily: Why are you trying to destroy American Thanksgiving?!
Lily: Well, did you guys at least talk about it?
Lily: You know what? That's it! This is Thanksgiving. Solve this right now. And if you have s*x again, neither of you gets dessert! Oh, what the hell kind of Thanksgiving is this anyway?
Lily: Thanks, baby. Ooh, some classical music, maybe.
Lily: No! It's not! It's Thanksgiving! Our first one as a married couple, as grownups and you're not even trying to be a part of it! None of you are! So... as slap bet commissioner, I'm issuing a ruling. Thanksgiving is a day of peace. There will be no slaps today!
Lily: The slap bet commissioner's word is final, so get in the kitchen and mash some potatoes, now. And for the rest of the day, we are going to enjoy a civilized, grownup holiday.
Lily: Nope. This sucks. Eat up and leave.
Lily: Oh, no...
Lily: Barney, put it away.
Lily: Barney, put it away.
Lily: You can slap him.
Lily: Well, guys have fun.
Lily: Half the time the relationship.
Lily: Sorry guys. I'll just make a fruit cup.
Lily: His thing arranged? A real disaster. She sent me text messages all night. She just let go to use the bathroom.
Lily: She'll beat him up, yes.
Lily: Barney, this guy has slept with Robin, you say that being in love. How it makes you excited?
Lily: What kind of gadgets you talking about?
Lily: Marshall, I love you, but there are plenty of reasons to lie.
Lily: I will quote 50.
Lily: Number one: last Thursday.
Lily: Marshall, you wanna do?
Lily: It was you who said, "This shadow on the ceiling, it looks an awful clown toothless. Good night, Lily. "
Lily: I'll give you 50. There's s*x reconciliation... breaking s*x, and s*x "a friend told you about a new position."
Lily: Oh, I have one. s*x "bugger all on TV."
Lily: 43.
Lily: 44.
Lily: 45. It gets a little tough.
Lily: Still 4. "You make a crisp fall on his knees and the when you picked up, he thinks it is an approach, and it happens."
Lily: You gave me some chips.
Lily: No, I have fun. But this thing of a "partner", it sucks sometimes. I always talk about you. I can not play "I never," because everyone knows all the quirks that I let you do.
Lily: I'm stuck. I find it the last 2.
Lily: Hey, it's 49! It worked?
Lily: I love you.
Lily: It's "I have breasts."
Lily: Marshall, you can't tell s*x stories about "this chick," because everyone knows it's me.
Lily: It's just that all I've ever done is teach kindergarten. I want to get out there and change the world. I want to find my passion.
Lily: I'm going to be a marine biologist... Slam poet... Beekeeper! Not a beekeeper.
Lily: Welcome to big Wave Luau. Can I tiki your drink order? Aw, crap.
Lily: What do you want?
Lily: Aloha, island visitors. The big wave brought you to our humble luau. For that, we thank you. Or in my native tongue, mahalo.
Lily: My name is Anuhea. It means cool and fragrant,much like any of our 12 specialty drinks.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: What would I be doing?
Lily: Oh, right, is that the...?
Lily: You weren't kidding. It really does look like a giant pen1s.
Lily: How can he not see it? I mean there's the...
Lily: And the way it...
Lily: And the two little...
Lily: It is just...
Lily: Nice to meet you.
Lily: Man, that guy is a total, well... (gestures to the building model)
Lily: I can't believe how Mr. Druthers treats people. And that building? Talk about overcompensating.
Lily: What design?
Lily: Ted, you should pitch your building to Druthers.
Lily: Mr. Druthers asked if you were making the trees or waiting for them to sprout on their own. Then he stared at me until I laughed.
Lily: Great. I'll put the paints away. You just go show him.
Lily: Hey.
Lily: That's easy. I took it.
Lily: It's simple.
Lily: Okay, I may have exaggerated that last one, but the point is, he was mean. And that's why I took away his ball.
Lily: Druthers has to be taught he can't behave like that. When I was teaching kindergarten,whenever a kid was mean, I would take away one of his toys. The kid would be upset at first,but then he'd learn to stop being mean.
Lily: Oh, that was a good one. This sales guy was rude to Robin, so I took a pair of khakis.
Lily: I prefer to call them "justice khakis."
Lily: So is being mean.
Lily: Well, that's why I left a note.
Lily: Yeah. When he finds it, he'll understand why his ball was taken away, he'll stop being mean, and the office will be a nicer place to work. Maybe he'll even be open to hearing your ideas.
Lily: I'm not sure I like your tone. You know what? Now you just lost the ball.
Lily: No.
Lily: I mean I stand by what I did, Ted.
Lily: "Who wants espresso?"
Lily: Interesting.
Lily: Wow. Looks like bye-bye, iPod.
Lily: No, they're not. It's just a tantrum, Ted. I saw this in kindergarten all the time.
Lily: All right, I'll give it back if you show him your plans.
Lily: I'm sorry, Ted. I just can't do that.
Lily: Fine. Here's the ball. At least you have one now.
Lily: Congrats, ted.
Lily: Oh. You know what, Ted? That was very nice. You have earned these screws back. Don't sit in your desk chair until you've put them back in.
Lily: No, thanks. I think I figured out what I want to be when I grow up.
Lily: Casey, that's not how we treat people. You'll get this back when you learn to be nice.
Lily: You got more fans than I thought.
Lily: How was the audition?
Lily: You do not let these bitches destabilize you, right?
Lily: Dr. X? You always talk to Dr. X?
Lily: It was Ted.
Lily: The show was zero.
Lily: How do you receive mail if someone knows where you are, moron?
Lily: What has he?
Lily: Yes, I'm sure I can find you something at school.
Lily: Until the injury.
Lily: Wow, it's scary.
Lily: The dancer's hip, Marshall's ax dancer.
Lily: Come on, guys. It did not hurt while dancing.
Lily: Obviously, the stirrups were too far apart during his last visit to the gynecologist.
Lily: Barney, I do not understand. You doing anything in these clips.
Lily: The possimpossible? Oh yeah?
Lily: Barney, it was ridiculous and foolish.
Lily: What?
Lily: Honey. You're always sorry for the joke of the dancer?They joked. We all know that this is a basketball injury.
Lily: What?
Lily: What?
Lily: I do not know how to answer that.
Lily: How many dances are we talking about?
Lily: Why do you dance much, and I do not know why?
Lily: You hurt the hip like that?
Lily: You know what? The two geniuses are going to remove that crap on their CV. You're not Dr. X, and you can not do the dunk. Forget.
Lily: What are you insinuating?
Lily: A species of b*st*rd.
Lily: It teaches kids... I can eat a lot of hot dogs very quickly.
Lily: You can dunk over, hip cardboard!
Lily: I think so.
Lily: You're not going to dance?
Lily: I hope it's not that you just won some sort of race here.
Lily: Wow.
Lily: Oh, let's go celebrate.
Lily: But you're still gonna go to your job interview today, right, baby?
Lily: Marshall, your dad went through a lot of trouble to set this up. You can't just pull out at the last second.
Lily: "This project was so demanding, I can't tell you how many nights I spent bent over a table."
Lily: Oh, hey, baby, how'd the interview go?
Lily: Oh, you should go. I mean, you're not gonna take the job, but you might as well get a great meal out of the deal.
Lily: Hmm. Wait, are you telling me that they actually have conventions for p0rn?
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: I shop the sales. There were in the closet when we moved in. I steal. I'm a criminal. I once shot a man just to watch him die.
Lily: Oh, okay.
Lily: So what's this big, beautiful romantic gesture?
Lily: Universe. So, this plan you speak of?
Lily: Hello.
Lily: Extra key? Do I have an extra key to your apartment?
Lily: Oh, right. That key. Yeah, I lost it.
Lily: No, wait, uh... Maybe you should just knock.
Lily: Uh, Robin, I-I gotta go. Just knock, okay?
Lily: Unpause?
Lily: I was never going to take it.
Lily: I was never going to take it.
Lily: So you're saying you would forbid me from going?
Lily: Yeah, but there's a lot of things I've always wanted, and I haven't done any of them. I'm sorry. I just need to do this before settling down forever.
Lily: Oh, maybe when you said you wouldn't let me do it.
Lily: Maybe not.
Lily: So, are you just, like, starving?
Lily: Oh, lobster, lobster, lobster, you are delicious!
Lily: I wouldn't dare. (Marshall starts crying) Marshall, no. We're on pause. There's no crying in Pauseland! Pauseland is a magical place, with... with popcorn shrimp mountains and butter sauce rivers! Damn it!
Lily: I think there's still one left.
Lily: Unpause?
Lily: Look... I know this sucks. It's just something I'm going through. I'm not asking you to understand it. I'm not asking you to be happy about it. I'm just asking you to support it.
Lily: Why not?
Lily: Marshall...
Lily: Marshall, I love you.
Lily: Pause.
Lily: Pause!
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: I know, I'm still shaking.
Lily: Something bad.
Lily: Oh, mucho sexy. You quiero Marshall.
Lily: Oh my God.
Lily: Mouse? Sweetie, that wasn't a mouse. That was a huge cockroach.
Lily: But those things coming out of his head, those were antennae
Lily: It was a cockroach.
Lily: Oh my God.
Lily: OK, it's back and this time we got a good look.
Lily: We were just upstairs watching TV.
Lily: OK, let's do this.
Lily: Yeah. It has six legs, a hard exoskeleton like a roach...
Lily: It's a cockamouse.
Lily: It's some sort of mutant combination of the two. It's as if a cockroach and a mouse...you know...
Lily: Oh, but it can.
Lily: And it's pissed.
Lily: Oh, just play it cool. Don't Ted out about it.
Lily: He's a whole new species. The cockamouse.
Lily: Obviously the whole thing is shrouded in mystery.
Lily: OK, we get it. You're skeptical. But Marshall and I, we're believers. We believe.
Lily: Oh, Ted, I'm so sorry.
Lily: Whoa whoa whoa, let's not skip over this. Raise your hand if earlier today you hit on an engaged woman.
Lily: Don't interfere. Some guy is expecting to marry this woman on Saturday.
Lily: Wait, where are you guys going? Don't you want to stay and see the cockamouse.
Lily: Holy crap. We got it! What do we do with it?
Lily: Wait, no no. They'll do lab experiments on it. That's so mean. Shouldn't we just beat it to death with a bat?
Lily: Robin.
Lily: Oh, is it? Do something.
Lily: What the hell was that? You trying to get it drunk?
Lily: Marshall, I'm sorry. I just... I just need to go to San Francisco and do this art program and figure out who I am outside of us. And the only way that I can do that is if we don't talk for a while.
Lily: Wow, Mario's bistro. What a perfect place to whore around.
Lily: Oh funk legend George Clinton, I am so glad you spotted me at your concert an drag me on stage to dance with you Courteney Cox style.
Lily: Oh you know, Marshall tried to get me to play tennis for nine years but I didn't do it because I never truly loved him.
Lily: Oh! A ferret. I'll buy it some food next door at the Pet Palace. I've always wanted one, but Marshall have this secret phobia of ferrets.
Lily: It was! Oh, I love you funk legend George Clinton.
Lily: Oh, this is so embarrassing. I could've sworn I have some change. I know, I know, I'm sorry. Oh, here we go. No that's, that's a button... It was a button. Do you take credit cards?
Lily: Hey, we're still those people. One of these days, Marshall's going to quit his job and go to work for the NRDC, and save the world, right, baby?
Lily: Well, yeah, but you wear it ironically, like Ted's fanny pack.
Lily: Ooh! I love this exhibit. One time when I was a kid, this room was closed for cleaning, so I snuck under the rope.
Lily: Wow. "The future of Goliath National Bank"?
Lily: Oh, well, don't turn him down here in public. I broke up with Scooter at the prom. Right before the picture, too.
Lily: So whatever you do, don't tell him here tonight, 'cause...
Lily: What do you mean, you're going to say yes?
Lily: But I thought that you...
Lily: But a five-year contract. I thought you hated GNB.
Lily: So what about becoming an environmental lawyer? What about saving the world?
Lily: What would College You say if he heard what you were saying right now?
Lily: So how long have you felt this way?
Lily: You've known about this for two and a half years? So every time you've talked about wanting to be an environmental lawyer since then, that was a lie.
Lily: What?
Lily: So, you'll probably quit GNB in a couple years, right?
Lily: And become an environmental lawyer?
Lily: Hey, by the way, do you like this scarf?
Lily: Okay, that's also a made-up word.
Lily: I want you.
Lily:No. I mean, I want you as opposed to who you've become. You've changed so much.
Lily: No.
Lily: Yes, but I'm okay with that.
Lily: Actually, you're way better now. You last, like, two, three times as long.
Lily: It's okay. College Lily thinks those are orgasms. No, it's... it's none of that. It's just this new Marshall... Corporate Marshall... he wears suits all the time. He doesn't care about saving the world. He's not you. I want you back.
Lily: Actually, Jane's Addiction got back together.
Lily: Yeah, they've done a few tours, they put out a new album.
Lily: Sure.
Lily: Hi.
Lily: We'll make it work.
Lily: When I was seven, I needed to have my tonsils out.
Lily: Look who I ran into!
Lily: What?
Lily: Fine!
Lily: So what do we think of Ted?
Lily: But that's part of his charm.
Lily: Are you kidding? This flapper-for knocks.
Lily: (shy) Oops...
Lily: Did you guys get high?
Lily: You waited five minutes to tell me that?
Lily: that's great, Ted. You'll be the most "Casual" stalker ever.
Lily: Hey, I'm just sitting here. Wearing my ring... my beautiful ring. Kind of makes wearing other stuff seem wrong. Like my shirt. Kind of don't wanna wear my shirt anymore. Or... my underwear. Oh-that's right-I'm not wearing any.
Lily: Not slightly.
Lily: Oh, the moon, the stars, the shimmering skyline. You can't not fall in love on that roof.
Lily: Man you're a dork.
Lily: No.
Lily: At least it was a great party.
Lily: Answer it!
Lily: Oh!
Lily: I'm the luckiest girl alive (runs into bedroom. Marshall strips.)
Lily: Hey little old books. Ready for a little fifteen minute recess?
Lily: Okay, buddy, time for the "tough-talk". Robin seems great. But let's look at the facts, you wanna get married and right now there's a million women in New York looking for exactly you, but Robin ain't one of them.
Lily: Stop the tape, rewind-play it again.
Lily: It's been 4 months since you broke up with Barney. It's time to get back on the market.
Lily: If you're not going to take her 17th hot date, you should give up.
Lily: That girl that Barney hunting, it seems a somewhat anti-Barney. I like the way the universe has decided to collect.
Lily: You told to go and see Anita Barney? How you know her?
Lily: I hope this was not the same nights.
Lily: You know her. She keeps her emotions for her. But yes, I saw her crying sometimes.
Lily: I know, but the song is rather catchy.
Lily: A problem?
Lily: Barney, sit down, there are two three things to tell you.
Lily: Of course she is upset. Look at you, poor trail.
Lily: Well, it was much better before you decide to go to your stupid super hot date with Anita. And now she broods, God knows where.
Lily: You said what?
Lily: It still seems fast.
Lily: Atrocious.
Lily: Twin beds? I can not sleep in separate beds. We should complain.
Lily: Yeah, I'll go with you in just a second......
Lily: We missed the full board.
Lily: Ted and Robin broke up there for years. This is not a problem.
Lily: It should have separate beds.
Lily: a deal!
Lily: I know. I love you, but I want this new bed is a sanctuary of my sleep and my sleep only.
Lily: A bed for s*x. For hot s*x and bestiality.
Lily: Right. There will be two beds for sleeping, one for s*x, and I thought an ottoman for birthdays.
Lily: And how.
Lily: From spicy tuna? My favorite.
Lily: We just had.
Lily: Wait. This "super" does not look great.
Lily: I'm worried. I do not want that divorce.
Lily: We can at least get closer?
Lily: Why?
Lily: You're not perfect either. Between the food and ants. But... I still want to be with you.
Lily: We're getting closer?
Lily: Nope.
Lily: What?
Lily: You throw me like that?
Lily: Robin has had the job of presenter.
Lily: I'm sorry, Ted. I am a New Yorker pure juice. I am programmed to despise and hate New Jersey and all it represents. Why I say that? You hate him more than anyone.
Lily: Ted, if you murdered me and bury me in New Jersey, I'll haunt thee for ever.
Lily: I'll leave you alone. I'm sure you had your reasons.
Lily: It's you who wrote, right?
Lily: With the next train, you can be in McClaren's to 23h.
Lily: No, I have to change. I'm not feeling in New Jersey.
Lily: Yeah, probably.
Lily: Not good enough.
Lily: Yes, why not.
Lily: I thought they came to live with you.
Lily: You hate that job.
Lily: How they made you call the Hurricane Hector when he was pouring with rain?
Lily: You can compete with anyone. You're Robin Scherbatsky. Confident, strong, great. With super long legs that look great in shorts.
Lily: Drop it, Barney. Your arm should make you suffer.
Lily: It's the tears?
Lily: Where is Robin?
Lily: If you hang up no...
Lily: You can never be in town in 30 minutes.
Lily: It is called Paxton.
Lily: Ok, this is crazy. You can not believe that New Jersey is better than New York. In New York, there was Broadway. No need to say more.
Lily: Look, Stella, I understand that coming from New Jersey, you think not to like New York, but believe me, Marshall did not believe it either, and now he would move for anything.
Lily: but, Marshall, you love New York.
Lily: It really stops.
Lily: I think so. Good job, Barney.
Lily: What's the matter?
Lily: I'm sorry.
Lily: Go. It's not like that.
Lily: Great news.
Lily: Since that time Heather happening in New York, Ted has never left the Barney show.
Lily: Do not tell me anything! You know I can not keep secrets if it's almost Christmas! Robin offers you an iPod!
Lily: It ripens, just as you see it yet.
Lily: Ted, many women have a period kleptomaniac. And yes, maybe sometimes they happen to mow a small object because it excites them in a strange way they are not explained. But... If it reassures you, I will accompany them to GNB, tomorrow. I will say that I'm going to lunch with Marshall, but in fact I espionnerai.
Lily: And I espionnerai. And sh1t!
Lily: Not enough!
Lily: I have a secret. No! It has not happened. It happened something.
Lily: Nothing. After the interview Heather, I went to see Marshall one time, when I came back...
Lily: My God!
Lily: What?
Lily: I'm really sorry.
Lily: You will say nothing. Ted, Heather begged me not to tell you. She hate me if she knows that I sneaked.
Lily: You see? She has not bought the briefcase! It is responsible! And no chance that she slept with someone here.She turns the page.
Lily: This is the new coasters?
Lily: I swear, these coasters are thicker.
Lily: You know what? It's a new batch of old coasters. I will confirm with the bartender.
Lily: My God!
Lily: It's just that all I've ever done is teach kindergarten. I want to get out there and change the world. I want to find my passion.
Lily: I'm going to be a marine biologist... Slam poet... Beekeeper! Not a beekeeper.
Lily: Welcome to big Wave Luau. Can I tiki your drink order? Aw, crap.
Lily: What do you want?
Lily: Aloha, island visitors. The big wave brought you to our humble luau. For that, we thank you. Or in my native tongue, mahalo.
Lily: My name is Anuhea. It means cool and fragrant,much like any of our 12 specialty drinks.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: What would I be doing?
Lily: Oh, right, is that the...?
Lily: You weren't kidding. It really does look like a giant pen1s.
Lily: How can he not see it? I mean there's the...
Lily: And the way it...
Lily: And the two little...
Lily: It is just...
Lily: Nice to meet you.
Lily: Man, that guy is a total, well... (gestures to the building model)
Lily: I can't believe how Mr. Druthers treats people. And that building? Talk about overcompensating.
Lily: What design?
Lily: Ted, you should pitch your building to Druthers.
Lily: Mr. Druthers asked if you were making the trees or waiting for them to sprout on their own. Then he stared at me until I laughed.
Lily: Great. I'll put the paints away. You just go show him.
Lily: Hey.
Lily: That's easy. I took it.
Lily: It's simple.
Lily: Okay, I may have exaggerated that last one, but the point is, he was mean. And that's why I took away his ball.
Lily: Druthers has to be taught he can't behave like that. When I was teaching kindergarten,whenever a kid was mean, I would take away one of his toys. The kid would be upset at first,but then he'd learn to stop being mean.
Lily: Oh, that was a good one. This sales guy was rude to Robin, so I took a pair of khakis.
Lily: I prefer to call them "justice khakis."
Lily: So is being mean.
Lily: Well, that's why I left a note.
Lily: Yeah. When he finds it, he'll understand why his ball was taken away, he'll stop being mean, and the office will be a nicer place to work. Maybe he'll even be open to hearing your ideas.
Lily: I'm not sure I like your tone. You know what? Now you just lost the ball.
Lily: No.
Lily: I mean I stand by what I did, Ted.
Lily: "Who wants espresso?"
Lily: Interesting.
Lily: Wow. Looks like bye-bye, iPod.
Lily: No, they're not. It's just a tantrum, Ted. I saw this in kindergarten all the time.
Lily: All right, I'll give it back if you show him your plans.
Lily: I'm sorry, Ted. I just can't do that.
Lily: Fine. Here's the ball. At least you have one now.
Lily: Congrats, ted.
Lily: Oh. You know what, Ted? That was very nice. You have earned these screws back. Don't sit in your desk chair until you've put them back in.
Lily: No, thanks. I think I figured out what I want to be when I grow up.
Lily: Casey, that's not how we treat people. You'll get this back when you learn to be nice.
Lily: We agree, it's insane to have a child before he saw the five doubles, right?
Lily: So when we finally see a dead ringer for Barney, this is the message of the universe to tell us to do. And at that time, we'll try. Deal?
Lily: I know, it's crazy. It's easier to let the universe decide. Why?
Lily: Wait 2 seconds! It could easily be Barney who tries to f*ck chicks.
Lily: Marshall Eriksen... put a baby in my belly.
Lily: We're going to say anything.
Lily: If you tell them, they are invited in at the most private and intimate of our lives.
Lily: We saw the fifth lookalike!
Lily: I know. Say what you want about him, but Barney is better blonde.
Lily: What?
Lily: Yeah, seriously, Ted, you not discolor hair.
Lily: The universe has spoken. Marshall Eriksen, make a baby.
Lily: But we have seen, which means that the universe in its infinite wisdom, tell me of planting, and apply yourself.
Lily: I know what's bothering you.
Lily: The taxi driver looked like enough to Barney.
Lily: It was smaller than Barney!
Lily: And you know what? I think he was Asian. Yeah, this guy was a little Asian with a graying goatee and belly.
Lily: What? Wait, you were aware? You lied to me?
Lily: Baby, you...
Lily: Finally.
Lily: I know. It's weird, huh?
Lily: What's your name?
Lily: how Kristof?
Lily: Barney, why are you doing this?
Lily: Let me talk about him. He keeps saying that nobody should have children before 45 years.
Lily: But I think I know what happens. Yesterday, Barney felt obliged to say goodbye to someone he really likes. And it made him think... A baby joining our group might not be the worst thing.
Lily: And one day he will be the best uncle in the world. Because it Barney, he is part of our family.
Lily: Yes! You're there! This is fantastic!
Lily: The friends, follow me! (They leave) Look! The fifth double.
Lily: Is not it?
Lily: Marshall Eriksen... put a baby in my belly.
Lily: For me it would be Hugh Jackman.
Lily: My God! Seriously?
Lily: No, not the end of history. I need to know who, what, when and where. Balance!
Lily: Who's who?
Lily: So the mystery celebrity who collects something mysterious asked you to do a mystery Canadian s*x act.
Lily: Tell us.
Lily: I do not even know of Canadian s*x act.
Lily: How do you know that?
Lily: In Canada, it's called a snow plow Vicious.
Lily: The poor. It's moved if I return to Canada on s*x?
Lily: What is a Zamboni with 2 hands?
Lily: Pack milk Manitoba?
Lily: A Lobster Trap of Newfoundland?
Lily: Well, I decided my first proposal.
Lily: Well, I'm starting. Bryan Adams. He collects baseball cards and he wanted to make you... an oily Kayak.
Lily: Alex Trebek, a Guardian Eventé, teddy bear!
Lily: Damn!
Lily: A Totem of Saskatoon. It's here.
Lily: Anyone of Rush, a Meat Pie from Montreal and a lunchbox superhero.
Lily: Rick Moranis, the Reverse Rich Moranis, of Jewish antiquities. I give up. It's been three days that I seek. I stop. If that means I could ever be.
Lily: Tell us about it!
Lily: My God. I am so excited. (Robin passes him a paper) I will read.
Lily: I will read it. Let's go. "The Frozen Snowshoe," "Old King Clancy", "The Plateaux of Harvey."
Lily: I do not understand any of these words.
Lily: So fame was...
Lily: So you say you Racket Jelly invited him home to show you trays of Harvey, and you've asked him to do an Old King Clancy?
Lily: My hiccups are gone. Perhaps forever.
Lily: What does that mean for your company? You're going to be fired?
Lily: It's exciting.
Lily: He's exactly like Barney.
Lily: Anyway, James, how have you been?
Lily: And then there was the time they scored the brother/sister combo.
Lily: - Jammies.
Lily: I miss my jammies. I can't believe I wore a bra for this.
Lily: Yeah, they're like a boobie zoo.
Lily: Oh, please go sweat on someone else.
Lily: Poor guy? Poor my boobs.
Lily: Oh, yeah, yeah. He looks all broken up inside.
Lily: You know, that was, like, the third hot guy that James blew off tonight.
Lily: This is gonna kill Barney.
Lily: Oh, sweetie! Did you make that for me?
Lily: You get your chest waxed?
Lily: No, it isn't.
Lily:  - And not be groped!
Lily: Looks like the boys learned their lesson. Do you totally miss being hit on?
Lily: It was perfect. You even made Tom's dad cry. Might have been doing that because he's a Republican.
Lily: Oh, stop calling me that. It makes me sound fat.
Lily: Tell it.
Lily: Why do not I decide? What is the difference between jam and Nutella?
Lily: Yeah, I can not hang out with you.
Lily: I can't believe I have to go back to work on Monday and we still haven't found a nanny.
Lily: Yay.
Lily: Then, why did I wake up
Lily: This is the pizza. Baby, you got the cash?
Lily: What!?
Lily: I even caught a pizza in the shower.
Lily: You...?
Lily: Did you get mugged?
Lily: Not a bit.
Lily: I do not think there's a gun to my Marshmallow. Now, I tremble. I think I will not sleep all night.
Lily: Baby, do not worry for me, I mean, yes, I'm a little scared, but I am New York. I will not let me change it.
Lily: I changed! I like the weapons now. Charger.
Lily: I said, "shipper".
Lily: No one who scares. A tiny Beretta pink that goes with these cute sandals I just bought. In fact, our new credit card works.
Lily: I have changed my mind.
Lily: I know, you're right, but every time I close my eyes, I see this guy pointing a gun at you. And... you're my world, Marshall. If something happened to you one day, I would...
Lily: He assaulted you naked?
Lily: Forget the weapon. It is on that now.
Lily: This monkey has our address. And if it belonged to a gang?I hope he will climb to see us.
Lily: I think naked in a tree, throwing his feces.
Lily: You've been mugged by a monkey!
Lily: It would be nice to see you on TV.
Lily: You've been mugged by a monkey.
Lily: Well done! I have too much sleep last night. Can you imagine that I almost buy a gun? I'm glad you assaulted by a monkey.
Lily: I bet he will love it.
Lily: You have not been attacked by a monkey?
Lily: It's good. I buy a gun.
Lily: Tell us just what happened.
Lily:  We have a confession. This wasn't really about seeing Ted's house. It's an intervention.
Lily:  You call the super for a screwdriver?
Lily:  "So, how 'bout those last 30 Super Bowls"?
Lily:  Why did you abandon me?
Lily:  Barney, we... we know you're psyched, but just... be careful.
Lily:  Yeah. That would make Jerry a real chamma-leeon.
Lily:  You got nothing on me.
Lily:  Sure, honey. (She throws the key toward the wall besides Marshall)
Lily:  That's not true.
Lily:  What do you mean, Barney won't return your calls? He said you two had an amazing night together.
Lily:  We think you should give him another chance. That's the real reason we're out here. He lives ten minutes away.
Lily:  Guess now we wait.
Lily:  What, baby?
Lily:  Robin, don't disagree with Marshall.
Lily:  I love him.
Lily:  But, baby, you just lost your dad. None of us wants to upset you.
Lily:  You can't swallow pills.
Lily:  You're too old to ask to see the cockpit.
Lily:  Aw, honey.
Lily:  Are you sure you don't want to talk about it?
Lily: Oh, my God. These pancakes are delicious!
Lily: Oh. Do you want to cook dinner tonight?
Lily: You may not have much range, but at least I'm marrying a guy who knows how to make pancakes.
Lily: I mean, uhm... Well, I... I realize that we haven't really discussed whether us getting back together means us getting married, but... I still wanna. Do you still wanna?
Lily: Of course, I love you.
Lily: What?!
Lily: Do you remember your proposal to me? (She puts her hand on her eye)
Lily: What do you want to hear?
Lily: Marshall... You are good-looking...
Lily: Funny...
Lily: Smart...
Lily: Okay, would you freakin' marry me already?
Lily: Yeah, right. (They kiss)
Lily: I can't even look Mrs. Butterworth in the eye. Oh, my God. We're getting married!
Lily: Man, I made a big mess by canceling this wedding, didn't I?
Lily: God, the idea of standing up there in front of all those people who hate my guts... Just makes me want to run off to Atlantic City and get married today.
Lily: We're going to Atlantic City to elope. You got to come with us.
Lily: I hope not because I plan on getting hammered.
Lily: Ted, for the rest of our lives, we are going to be telling the amazing story of how we went to Atlantic City and got married. Don't you want to be in that story?
Lily: We're going to Atlantic City to elope right now!
Lily: Well, actually, I mean... It is my wedding day, and since we're here...
Lily: Wow. Look at this place. I guess I'll have my pick of something old.
Lily: The wedding chapel... This is it. Are you ready to do this?
Lily: Oh, crap. I don't have a veil. I'm a bride, I can't get married without a veil. And a bouquet. I need a veil and a bouquet. Oh, my God, we're getting married.
Lily: Oh, Robin, that's a really cute outfit.
Lily: Yeah, it has to go. I'm the bride, you can't look better than me.
Lily: I'm going to get the bouquet. You guys get the veil. We'll meet in the chapel in 20 minutes. Ready? Break. (She leaves)
Lily: Oh, good. Did you get the veil?
Lily: Your last lap dance ever.
Lily: Hell, yeah, look at this. (She turns on her musical bouquet, playing the Wedding March)
Lily: Hi. We're here to get married.
Lily: No, no, no, it has to be today. That's the whole point.
Lily: Have you been outside?
Lily: Is there any way that we could get a license today?
Lily: Well, we're in love.
Lily: Oh, really?!
Lily: Oh. Well, so can we see a judge?
Lily: Really?!
Lily: Okay, this is a good plan B. Judges are people. People go to the bathroom. A judge is bound to come by eventually, and we'll get married. I'm sure we won't be waiting long.
Lily: Look, I know this is turning into a bit of a disaster, but believe me, it's better than the alternative.
Lily: Judge! Judge, come on. Come on, come on, come on!
Lily: Okay. May we please get married today?
Lily: What was what?
Lily: Yeah, I mean, all... yeah.
Lily: No, Marshall, we are gonna get married today.
Lily: Except international waters. So let's find a ship captain. A ship captain can marry us. There's boats all over this place.
Lily: This is a great idea. This is gonna work. Let's go. (To a woman) Excuse me. Are you a ship captain?
Lily: Well, I found a guy who said he'd be willing to put his boat in my slip, so we're getting closer.
Lily: Because... If we don't do it today, I just know we're gonna wind up having a huge wedding with a huge crowd full of huge Midwestern people looking all disapproving and judging me while sipping little cups of mayonnaise and cracking runaway bride jokes all night long.
Lily: No, they're not because I'm not gonna give them the chance. I'm gonna find a ship captain and we're gonna be married tonight.
Lily: What?
Lily: See? See, this is destiny. So, captain, can you take us out to international waters and marry us?
Lily: Deal. $5,000, okay, we can do that. Come on, everybody. Fork over your cash. Don't think. Just do it.
Lily: Do you understand what's happening?
Lily: Wow. It's beautiful.
Lily: Okay. Let's get this started.
Lily: We don't want to do this.
Lily: Yes. Because it's gonna be amazing. Look, before I was afraid to face Marshall's family and I didn't want to do all that work, but... Now that we're here... I realize that I have to face Marshall's family and I really want to do all that work.
Lily: I love you, Marshmallow.
Lily: What?!
Lily: Oh, whew... That was close.
Lily: Is Robin here?
Lily: I'm so excited Victoria's coming.
Lily: Ooh, I am smelling dirt. What is the story of the re-return?
Lily: Us? What would we do?
Lily: Fine.
Lily: I should go help Robin.
Lily: Hey. So, are you going to be okay hanging out with Victoria tonight?
Lily: You must really hate the bitch.
Lily: Oh, Barney, by the way, I went to a party in that new building on 82nd, and the host said she knew you. What is her name? Sharon? Shannon?
Lily: Really? Well, 'cause she gave me a videotape to give...
Lily: Fine. I'll go get it.
Lily: Barney, what was on that tape?
Lily: Oh, damn it! If only I'd given you a fake tape and hidden the real tape in my purse. Oh, wait. That's exactly what I did.
Lily: Yeah, you were acting so weird about it, I gave you Ted's graduation tape instead. So, should we pop it in?
Lily: Yeah, so sorry. But seriously, what was up with the tape? No, no, stay.
Lily: The kids still call him Funny Butt.
Lily: Wait... What if somebody else told their most humiliating story?
Lily: You brought the game to the bar?
Lily: Oh my God!
Lily: Okay, okay. Marshall's mom sent us cookies...
Lily: For the team, Marshall, for the team.
Lily: Hey, Mrs. Eriksen, it's Lily. Thank you so much for the delicious cookies. Mayonnaise. Really? Never would have guessed. Well, I will definitely give Marshall a kiss for you. Okay. Take care.
Lily: Yeah. I wish we had a dog, so they wouldn't go to waste.
Lily: I'm thinking floor s*x.
Lily: Ooh, floor's cold. Grab that afghan your mom made.
Lily: The... whole... time.
Lily: Oh, you poor thing.
Lily: You've got to tell us.
Lily: You ralphed and ran?
Lily: Hey. Come on. I mean, just because her life went one way and yours went another, it doesn't make your life any worse.
Lily: Nope.
Lily: Nope.
Lily: Sorry. Don't buy it. You're making it up. You're just trying to cover the fact that you actually had a profound moment of doubt about yourself and... Oh, my God.
Lily: Ew, gross. Just stop it.
Lily: Private Booty, reporting for duty.
Lily: It's called class, Ted.
Lily: Are you kidding? You're in the kitchen, it's getting hot, you start licking stuff off each others' fingers. Before you know it, she's bent over the marble island, and you're spanking her with a rubber spatula. And she's screaming, "Stop, Marshall, stop," but that's just code for "harder!"
Lily: So long! And now he's staying even longer. His mom has been having a really hard time since the funeral. He's waiting on her hand and foot. But... it's Valentine's Day. It's not going to be the same without the two of us watching Predator together.
Lily: I'm so glad none of those girls were right for you.
Lily: I am. Earlier today, I burst into tears...
Lily: I decided to go to Minnesota to see Marshall. He shouldn't have to help his mom through this rough time all by himself.
Lily: I'm getting weird!
Lily: See, it started off with me throwing Marshall's jersey on my body pillow. And, well, things kind of spiraled from there. I'm sorry I yelled like that before.
Lily: I call him "Marshpillow." And he calls me... nothing because he's a pillow.
Lily: You brought an overnight bag?
Lily: How are you holding up, Judy?
Lily: I wanted to surprise you.
Lily: I thought he was here helping you.
Lily: Uh, I'll talk to him.
Lily: Oh, God.
Lily: Um, Marshall, your mom asked me to carry this up. She turned her ankle on your Hot Wheels. Is my track okay? It's fine, but, Marshall, I thought you were here taking care of your mom. It seems like she's taking care of you.
Lily: Marshall, tomorrow's Valentine's. Don't you want to be at home on our couch, cuddling up under a warm blanket, watching the Predator use his heat vision to stalk helpless prey?
Lily: Marshall, your mom wants you out of here.
Lily: But, Judy, you said...
Lily: Ted... I thought you were going to talk to Marshall about coming back to New York.
Lily: Marshall, I'm going home.
Lily: I'm flying out tonight before the big storm, and I want you to come with me.
Lily: While I'm sure it's been really helpful for her to have you here playing Super Mario Kart for 14 hours a day...
Lily: But your mom doesn't need you. Your life in New York needs you. It needs you really bad.
Lily: Please come home soon.
Lily: Baby, you're back.
Lily: We both knew this would end eventually.
Lily: It's gonna be all night, and I think I want a clown there. I'm a little bit scared of clowns, but for you, I'm there.
Lily: And with a little luck, in a few days, Farmer Frank's cold will be all gone. And that's why Farmer Frank's breath smells like medicine. Right, Farmer Frank?
Lily: Any last questions for Farmer Frank? Yes.
Lily: I know, I know. I already called an animal rescue, and they're going to come get her on Monday.
Lily: I-I guess I'll keep her up on the roof.
Lily: Hey, where are you?
Lily: Great. Well, everyone's here. Stella just arrived and there is something here so awesome, I'm not going to tell you what it is, but you won't believe...
Lily: Damn it! Well, you still gotta see it. It's so much fun having a goat at a party!
Lily: Okay. Bye.
Lily: Okay, everyone, Ted's in the limo, five-minute warning! Everyone get ready! Oh, Missy, are you excit?? Yes, you are!
Lily: Marshall, can we keep the goat?
Lily: But she's so cute and furry and soft.
Lily: Why don't we just call Duluth Mental Hospital and say my Uncle Linus can live with us?
Lily: Oh, you should talk.You slept with Barney.
Lily: I can't believe you did that. That's so gross. Was it amazing?
Lily: I know but it's Barney. It's just hard not to be curious. Did he have like devices and stuff?
Lily: Hot wax?
Lily: Did he tie you to anything?
Lily: I'm sorry. Is he all smooth down there?
Lily: Marshall!
Lily: Meet us at the swim class you apparently signed Marvin up for.
Lily: Come on, Ted, what do you say?
Lily: Hey, Ted. Hey. Where's Marvin?
Lily: Look at those colors! Green and brown together at last!
Lily: City hall, Miss Thang!
Lily: Ooh, I don't know. It was here when we sat down.
Lily: That's not a bad idea. Let's think, Ted's greatest hits... what about that girl, Steph?
Lily: Say what you will about the p0rn industry... they are hard workers.
Lily: What about Natalie!
Lily: At least it's better than booger. (Laughs) Booger.
Lily: Seriously, who talks like that?
Lily: Eew. I'm just assuming.
Lily: Bye.
Lily: Hey, Ted. Nice shirt! Is it yesterday already?
Lily: Why would Natalie hang up on you?
Lily: Well, you must have done something. Why did you guys break up?
Lily: Uh-huh.
Lily: (angrier) Uh-huh...
Lily: So you dumped her right before her birthday?
Lily: (hitting Ted with every word) Never...break...up...with...a...girl...on...her...birthday!
Lily: Well, did she cry her eyes out?
Lily: How do you n...Oh, you didn't!
Lily: (Hitting with every word) On...her...answering...machine!? And...on...her... birthday? Oh... who... breaks... up... with... somebody... on... their... answering... machine... on... their... birthday?!
Lily: Not exactly the point I was trying to make, Marshall. That is a terrible way to break up with someone.
Lily: (On Phone) Hi, Marshall, it's Lily. We're not going have s*x for at least a month. But you're awesome. Okay bye-bye. (Hangs up)
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: Well guess what? She cried! You just didn't have the sack to face those tears.
Lily: Yeah, Ted, hold on to that one.
Lily: (Hitting with every syllable) Why... couldn't... you... leave... that... poor... girl... alone?
Lily: Oh, that's such a cliché.
Lily: Well, I think Natalie deserves better.
Lily: Ted, have you considered telling her the truth?
Lily: Ted, what is the truth? Why do you want to break up with her?
Lily: So, tell her that.
Lily: Why? What is so horrible about that?
Lily: Yeah, you have better chances of winning the lottery.
Lily: Yeah, and he's going to sit there and he's going to take it like a man.
Lily: Slow loves junk
Lily: Oh, boy, here we go.
Lily: What happened to you?
Lily: Oh, well you did the right thing. I'm proud of you.
Lily: Are you okay?
Lily: What...
Lily: Small?
Lily: What happened is horrible, it does not mean that is the case for everyone.
Lily: Issues mother.
Lily: It was on his way and Marshall wanted to stop to help guys to load their van.
Lily: And when the van is gone, which shows up if it is not the owner of the apartment, which had just been robbed help. And that was hard to explain to the police.
Lily: Do not change, baby. I find it pure. Pure. (Marshall gets up to the counter) Mashed mother of God is a moron sometimes. He lent them money to refuel.
Lily: Not given, lent. They said they would send a check, so Marshall gave our address. What prevents them from coming home one night, and maybe tie me? With Marshall, sometimes we pretend for real but it's terrifying.
Lily: What interest? He's from Minnesota. The mascot of his high school, it was a hug. Marshall is back with a beer while Ted joined them in turn.
Lily: The Future Bride talking about you?
Lily: Yes, nice and called Ted Mosby.
Lily: It was cute.
Lily: You're a good guy.
Lily: Word expert.
Lily: You must tell your story with Stella Royce. It will be released at one time or another.
Lily: He looks like zero.
Lily: You said "not altogether, doll?"
Lily: Maybe North Korea?
Lily: Sorry, Ted, you're screwed.
Lily: A rainbow! That's beautiful! What a beautiful rainbow! Another rainbow? It's beautiful!
Lily: You're kidding me. Seriously, aren't you sick of these things?
Lily: Today, I yelled at a little girl for painting a rainbow.
Lily: But we can barely afford that to begin with.
Lily: Whoa! Marshall, that's just a game we play in the bedroom.
Lily: What? Why just my clothes?
Lily: You made a Website?
Lily: No, you know what would be a better name for the site? Guy-forces-his-wife- to-dress-in-a-garbage-bag- for-the-next- three-years-dot-com. That's real.
Lily: Hmm, but, girlfriend, you cannot pull off a tall kitchen.
Lily: "The Magnificent Kevin."
Lily: I don't want to sell my clothes!
Lily: I'll sell my paintings!
Lily: Yeah, I'll sell my paintings. Good oil paintings go for like, $500.
Lily: What does that mean?
Lily: You don't believe in me.
Lily: Marshall, I am proud of my work as an artist. My paintings are good. I bet Robin would buy one. What now?
Lily: Well, how much money do we need for the contractor to finish the job?
Lily: Okay. So, if I can sell three of my paintings at 500 bucks a pop, then I get to keep all my clothes.
Lily: Well, give me a week.
Lily: Fine.
Lily: You do?
Lily: It's not for sale! My clothes are not for sale!
Lily: We've been sitting here for hours and nobody's even glanced at my painting. Come on. Let's start talking it up.
Lily: Painting for sale! $500! Lifelong dream hanging in the balance! It's like they don't even see us.
Lily: Oh, I'm trying to fix the hardwood floors in my new apartment. You?
Lily: Do you like heroin?
Lily: Thanks for your honesty, Crazy Sock Guy. Oh, I'm never gonna sell this...
Lily: 500 bucks! Who's a real painter now, Marshall?
Lily: Oh, I know, sweetie. And since I'm a professional artist now, I'm going to sketch you an Aldrin original, you know, to say thanks for being such a supportive husband. I'm thinking about calling it... "Suck It!"
Lily: Well, that's the best part. A gay couple without kids. A G-CWOK!
Lily: Yeah, that's right. They are the heart and soul of the art-buying community.
Lily: That's an amazing idea. I'm going to go call them. I can probably sell two more paintings with time to spare. Oh, wait, Marshall. There was something I had to tell you. What was it? Oh, that's right. Suck it.
Lily: Yes, Lily Aldrin. I sold you the painting earlier today.
Lily: You sound happy.
Lily: Well, I just wanted to offer you an exclusive chance to view some of my other paintings.
Lily: What?
Lily: So... y-you didn't like my painting?
Lily: Okay. Well, if you didn't want the painting, can I... can I at least get it back?
Lily: Where is it? I see. H-He threw out my painting.
Lily: This is great. My dream of becoming an artist is dead, and now I'm watching my wardrobe disappear piece by piece. There goes my favorite dress. This dress meant a lot to me.
Lily: Yeah. It was spring of 2004 and I had been having a hard few months.
Lily: I got a two-syllable "damn" in this dress.
Lily: Yeah. Now she belongs to... CanadaGirl(a)MetroNewsOne.com.
Lily: What?
Lily: Really? Why?
Lily: Well, what happened?
Lily: Yeah, we get it. Gay guys like you.
Lily: The painting!
Lily: Dr. Greer? Who's Dr. Greer a-and why did he take my painting?
Lily: Ooh, we don't need the details.
Lily: Really? Dogs like my paintings?
Lily: Really?
Lily: That's two grand. That's more than we need for the contractor.
Lily: In what?
Lily: Well, it's not exactly the clientele I had in mind, but... thank you for believing in me.
Lily: We're having an auction to rise money for the children's hospital of Los Angeles
Lily: 100! We only got to 82 on our honeymoon.
Lily: So, Robin, I've got a guy for you. He's cute, he's funny, he's smart.
Lily: What do you mean? Ted: When someone wants to set you up they always tell you the good qualities first but then they leave out their huge flaw.
Lily: She's so cute and she's so smart.
Lily: (to herself) But her last boyfriend had to get a restraining order against her and then his cat and new vacuum cleaner both went missing.
Lily: Well, there's nothing wrong with this guy. He's really nice and he's really cute.
Lily: But the guy is really great. And his kid's sweet, he's in my class.
Lily: OK, that's awesome.
Lily: (to herself) But she's a gun nut.
Lily: But?
Lily: Well, you knew you'd meet him sooner or later.
Lily: Robin, What's the big deal? He's just a kid. He's not gonna bite. He may bite. We're working on biting.
Lily: A good one. He won full custody.
Lily: Hey, what's up?
Lily: Just talk to him. You can do this, Robin.
Lily: Really, that's great. You and George, all thanks to me.
Lily: What?
Lily: I hate to tell you this but, too late.
Lily: He drew it in class today.
Lily: You are so in denial right now. And you're doing what you always do in relationships.
Lily: Honey, it's you. And if you're gonna break up with George, you have to break up with his kid too.
Lily: Yeah, you can't just abandon him. You have to talk to him. Come on, Robin, you know it's the right thing to do.
Lily: I can't believe you got dumped by a 6-year-old.
Lily: Did it hurt?
Lily: Getting that kid's nose surgically removed from your ass.
Lily: Robin has another party to go to.
Lily: But she might stop by later.
Lily: So, who's the lucky patient?
Lily: Just tell me who you slept with!
Lily: Aha, it's someone we know. If it was some ding dong we didn't know, you'd just give me his name.
Lily: Bill Pepper? Mm-hmm. Kind of a coincidence there happens to be a bill and a pepper shaker here on the table. Any chance you and Bill had a three-way with Fork Napkin? It's someone we know!
Lily: Look, you're new at teaching. In my kindergarten class, I have had plenty of troublesome students. Like Johnny Marley...
Lily: Johnny? Johnny!
Lily: He and that little stuffed horsey raised all kinds of hell. But I have a simple method for shutting down troublemakers. You know that '98 Taurus that's always parked outside? The one with the really annoying alarm?
Lily: Well, when a kid like Johnny acts up in my class...
Lily: Shuts them right up.
Lily: Oh, baby, what's wrong?
Lily: You slept with Randy!
Lily: Why, it's elementary, my dear Scherbatson.
Lily: Your co-host is getting super-popular because of her stupid commercial, "Boats! Boats! Boats!" So, when you arrived at the GNB party after we left, you were feeling vulnerable and drunk. Then, from across the not-so-crowded conference room, your eyes met. And as we all remember... Randy has a unique condition.
Lily: It's okay, baby.
Lily: And did it work?
Lily: No. I know why Randy is smiling. You're smiling because of Robin.
Lily: No. Because you slept with her on Halloween.
Lily: You didn't sleep with her?
Lily: So why are you smiling?
Lily: Hello.
Lily: You don't. Ted, you're their teacher. The only people that like their teachers...
Lily:...are dorks. Except for you, Miles. Ted, you just have to learn to embrace their hatred. Because behind that hatred lies fear. And you can use use that fear, like I did with Johnny Marley.
Lily: A little bit.
Lily: A little bit. Oh, a panda!
Lily: You said that?
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Robin, who'd you sleep with?
Lily: Where's the poop, Robin?
Lily: This sucks.
Lily: That's because he met her in high school. This is his first girlfriend.
Lily: How can they call it a "daily"? 4h, it's still the middle of the night. You impressed me.
Lily: We want to encourage you.
Lily: I just want to sleep!
Lily: How did that happen?
Lily: Wait. That's your pajamas? You sleep in pajamas suit?
Lily: This is not "a" skin flick, it's the scene... Forget it.
Lily: Ted, it will start!
Lily: Wait! Marshall did nothing. It's me. I made you break.
Lily: I did it for your own good. You do not see how it was horrible. She failed the test of the porch.
Lily: You, Me and Marshall are friends since college. Imagine how they account for one another. So when I look to the future, I see us all together. (Lily imagines the scene) When will retirees, sipping tea on the porch of our house, playing bridge all day.
Lily: It will take over.
Lily: So whenever you go out with someone for a while, I take the test of the porch. How that person will fit over the years?And when I think of Karen...
Lily: Karen has failed the test of the porch. She had to leave.
Lily: Do you like is great, you, me and Marshall. Really, think about it.
Lily: It is really great! So for that you will marry, one that will join the Team Géniale, the bar is very high. I say that I did well, but...
Lily: I confirm. You can uncross your legs?
Lily: So you're really angry?
Lily: I'm really sorry. I hated to do it again, but Karen had to leave.
Lily: Never! Six.
Lily: No one! Angie. In the second year. She used you to get revenge on her ex, and you will not see it, so...
Lily:... one day she was taking a nap...
Lily: Do you remember this strange girl who wanted you to marry him after two months? You loved him in trouble, but you thought there anyway, so...
Lily: Ted, I did it to help you. You're addicted to the commitment. You fell in love with these women, even if they do not deserve you.
Lily: If there was any chance, I swear, I would have done anything. As Victoria or Stella.
Lily: Stop talking to me as if I were your enemy! You know these women cry, but you have the luxury of not knowing what I know: you have these breaks tragic surely avoided a first marriage crap and very expensive.
Lily: You do not want the truth, because deep down, you want me to watch over you. And basically, you know that none of these women would have been the mother of your children.
Lily: I did what I had to do.
Lily: Just as I did!
Lily: No, it's not...
Lily: I did it because I care about you!
Lily: Robin was different. I did not mean that you break, but you wanted different things and you refused to settle it. I could imagine the porch.
Lily: I was just trying to make you talk about your problems. I did not know it would lead to your break.
Lily: I have a funny joke. Where you see yourself in five years?(Later that night, Lily is with Robin at McClaren's) You know what's funny? Funny questions. Where you see yourself in five years?
Lily: Not that I want to make you say, but surely you want to get married.
Lily: You would surely be in Tokyo or Paris.
Lily: I was not...
Lily: Or you'd been together too long, and would have had an incredibly bitter break without even remain friends, and we would never become best friends.
Lily: It is what happened to your jacket?
Lily: Ted, I'm sorry. No matter who you marry. I know it will be great because she will think you are. To prove my sincerity, I have prepared a surprise for you and Karen at the top. Kisses, Lily.
Lily: Okay. See, that's so weird to me. One second you're defending Zoey, and the next, you're talking about her going down.
Lily: Isn't it tough dating the woman that's trying to prevent your building from being built?
Lily: So, every time The Arcadian comes up, you guys just awkwardly change the subject?
Lily: That was on purpose!
Lily: Babe, can I get you a drink?
Lily: I know.
Lily: Can you believe this one? Wants our booth. Keeps giving us the walk-by.
Lily: The walk-by with the stink eye.
Lily: Oh, boy. Look who's back.
Lily: Excuse me waitress, I'll have a mojito! And you'll have a no-seat-ho.
Lily: This stupid feud isn't going to end until Marshall and Barney finally talk about their feelings, cry, and then hug it out like they do on Oprah.
Lily: Oh...
Lily: Yes, but the right kind of drunk. Uh... we should go with something mellow. Maybe red wine?
Lily: Oh... last time Marshall got gin-drunk was at that douchey bar Barney likes to go to. Marshall almost got in a fight that night.
Lily: How about martinis?
Lily: Why not?
Lily: Ooh... You know what would be stupid? If we made out. That would be so stupid. Hey, I dare you guys to dare us to make out.
Lily: I only say that because it would be so stupid if we did. So stupid...
Lily: Oh, yeah? Well... what about you and absinthe?
Lily: I keep telling you, that didn't happen.
Lily: Maybe. When Marshall has daiquiris... he gets really into how beautiful he is.
Lily: Peppermint schnapps?
Lily: Who?
Lily: Oh, wait, Ted. Do you have a specific reaction to any kind of alcohol?
Lily: Yeah, Ted, I hate to tell you, but the bourbon only makes it sound good to you.
Lily: Barney and Marshall's feud got us banned from the bar. We lost our booth.
Lily: We've cross-referenced every alcohol with Marshall and Barney's reaction. What's the right drink for this situation?
Lily: I-I guess. That... seems like a whole other thing. We need a drink that will start a fight.
Lily: Yeah, we need a drink that, that takes subtext and turns it into text. Yeah.
Lily: Yeah. We need to get them up and having fun.
Lily: Now do you see why I'm always interfering in other people's lives?
Lily: Okay. Final round. What simple act will get the boys to finally forgive each other?
Lily: Again, just a whole other thing, sweetie. Where'd they go? Oh, no. They did shots.
Lily: What's the worst thing they could possibly drink right now?
Lily: Be well, my friends! Aw, just how we left them.
Lily: I thought they made up last night.
Lily: Carl, a round of champagne.
Lily: Ooh! The champagne.
Lily: Mama's done with this drama. What drink can fix the headache these clowns are giving me?
Lily: Time is music the planets make. Music the planets make...
Lily: It is a great ass.
Lily: Thank you! (They hug)
Lily: I am doing great. This summer, best thing ever. San Francisco is so happening right now.
Lily: Oh, the art program, best thing ever.
Lily: But the best part of SF - oh that's what we call San Francisco - the people. Even just riding around on the bus all summer, it was like a human tapestry.
Lily: But I need the freedom to really chase my passion, which was painting but now, I think it's music, or spoken words. Maybe both. God, isn't life amazing.
Lily: It is so great to see you Ted. Ah! I'm gonna get the key for the lockbox.
Lily: And then I discovered this area, North beach. Best beach ever! Oh, I've been blabbering on about my summer. How are you guys doing? And hey, how is Marshall?
Lily: That is so good to hear. (Lily's phone rings). Oh, hold on. This could be about he apartment. (She leaves the room).
Lily: I didn't get it. That first apartment. I... I waited too long and somebody else got it. (She starts crying).
Lily: The apartment is a metaphor for Marshall! (Robin gives back Ted his five dollars)
Lily: Shhh! Bring me the dirtiest, greasiest tuna melt you got. And a milkshake.
Lily: What are you charpy about?
Lily: I was dying to ask. I was just trying to play it cool. But really...
Lily: Say something about Marshall. Where is Marshall? How's Marshall? What's Marshall doing right now? (They are now with Ted in an other building) Shut up and talk about Marshall. Shut up and talk about Marshall! Shut up and talk about Marshall! Marshall! Marshall! Marshall! Marshall! Aaah I gotta ask! (Then, the three of them are in Robin's apartment) And, hey, how is Marshall?
Lily: It was such an awful summer! I just wanted to get back here and see him.
Lily: Not exactly...
Lily: Yeah, um...
Lily: I never got in touch because I was too embarrassed. I screwed everything up. I have no job, no place to live. I lost the love of my life. Look, I know I have no right to ask this but do you think Marshall would take me back?
Lily: Wow. So, maybe I should call him?
Lily: Oh, I-I was just walking by. I wasn't... Oh, you mean, New-York? My program ended. It was just great. Just lots of fun. It was awful. It was the worst mistake I ever made. I'm so sorry Marshall. And, hello.
Lily: I know. It was the worst summer of my life.
Lily: Can we please get back together?
Lily: Can we please get back together?
Lily: Wow. OK. Yeah. Wi... Will we still see each other?
Lily: Thanks. I, uh, figured, new city, new color - uh, old color. (Music 'It's gonna be different this time' / Later). And the pizza there. Worst pizza ever! I'm so glad to be back in New-York.
Lily: Listen, if there is anything I can do to even begin to make things up to you.
Lily: You gave me Chlamydia, you jerk! (She throws a drink at his face and leaves)
Lily: You gave my twin sister Chlamydia! You slime! (She throws a second drink at his face and leaves, following by the twins).
Lily: All right, what's the message? 'Cause if it's another hypothetical yet eerily accurate drawing of my boobs...
Lily: Damn it.
Lily: Yeah. It's why in our apartment: If you're a-hopin' to score, don't leave your socks on the floor.
Lily: I know you're only just getting started, but this is already gross.
Lily: Wait. She's gonna let you name your kids Luke and Leia?
Lily: Okay, what does Barney do at GNB?
Lily: Tree?
Lily: I've got to say, I'm with Ted on this.
Lily: I mean, yes, this is a huge, divisive issue for them. Which means no matter what happens, there's gonna be a lot of resentment. Probably lasting for years... infecting every single moment of the rest of their relationship. So, in conclusion, I'm with Robin on this.
Lily: Just stop it! No one's buying a bar. Right now we have a little problem. Let's just think of a solution.
Lily: Okay, first hear my demands. One, Ted and Barney keep their jobs. Two, when you guys do finally blow up The Arcadian, one of them gets to push the button.
Lily: Well...
Lily: Fort Lau-ger-Dale! Get it?
Lily: Aspen Yards Ale! Get it?
Lily: I do not either. I was hoping that you find.
Lily: Marshall?
Lily: But this time, I'm not back pack. Because... when it matures, the relationship matures with us.
Lily: It was said not this time.
Lily: I drink beer.
Lily: You? Great! I'm coming. (She hangs up his phone) Ranjit?
Lily: That's the problem. I must be Brunivers in East Meadow in one hour.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: A little bread, chicken, celery sticks and a spoon of peanut butter. We f*ck like rabbits?
Lily: You know what I miss? The call for lunch.
Lily: Baby, it's lunch and I love you.
Lily: No, I love you even more.
Lily: It was New Year's tradition But you know what we did this year?
Lily: No.
Lily: It was earlier called for the drink of Seattle.
Lily: It is rather a hurry, so we'll take the beer.
Lily: We're not a couple.
Lily: No. It is a drum. I want a six pack.
Lily: You take the barrel.
Lily: Sorry, Ranjit, but it is a ritual, and I back this beer. If you could put it in the car. I'll give you $ 50.
Lily: Baby, it's me. My flight was canceled because of a snowstorm and I will not fly until Thursday, I'm still stuck here for two days. It's lunchtime and I love you.
Lily: Yes.
Lily: Yeah, normally I wouldn't wish one of his dirty diapers on my worst enemy, but now I kind of miss popping the hood in the morning and finding that first big juicy, black...
Lily: I hope not.
Lily: These look kinda like blood.
Lily: I'll say, she's going out with a billionaire.
Lily: Yeah, $2000 a plate.
Lily: I think my soul just threw up a little bit.
Lily: Bye.
Lily: Garlic fries.
Lily: Guys, you are being immature and moronic and drink, drink, drink
Lily: No dibs. (Lily puts index finger on her nose)
Lily: Who are you calling?
Lily: Says every girl you've ever slept with.
Lily: Friends don't let friends drink and dial.
Lily: You'll get this back at the end of class.
Lily: Was that necessary? He is not making smart decisions. Barney: Exactly. It's like, what's he gonna do next. I don't know, but I want to find out.
Lily: And then we brought you home and put you to bed.
Lily: There's a girl in there.
Lily: Who is she?
Lily: That girl in there is alive, right? Ted: I should call Barney, maybe he knows what happened.
Lily: Wait, were you here when I went to the bathroom in the middle of the night?
Lily: Good night, Ted.
Lily: (reading what's on Ted's arm) Hi, I'm Ted, if lost, please call...Who's number is that?
Lily: All right, right over here.
Lily: You know who might have something to say about Ted's future with Robin? Robin. Go wake her up.
Lily: Wait, this is killing me. We have to find out who that girl is.
Lily: Hi Robin.
Lily: Let's go get a snack.
Lily: A Turturkeykey?
Lily: The Gentleman!
Lily: Oh, you had to be there, Blitz. Yes.
Lily: Sorry, Ted. We can explain. After you Blitzed out last night...
Lily: Oh, my God... That's Zoey! That's Ted's enemy. Which means she's our enemy. Let's take this bitch down.
Lily: Huh? Huh? Who's got your back? Now let's have dinner!
Lily: Okay, well, we all started brainstorming ways to mess with her. There were a lot of different ideas kicking around.
Lily: Okay. Wh...? Well, I got it. You see that silk scarf? I'm going to steal it.
Lily: Yeah. Yeah! My name is Lily Aldrin. I'm a friend of Ted Mosby's, so you better...
Lily: Well, yeah.
Lily: (gasps) That was you?!
Lily: Oh! Thanks!
Lily: And then, the craziest thing happened.
Lily: Yeah, but that wasn't the crazy part.
Lily: I tried.
Lily: Hey, I will hate her until I get my money back for You, Me and Dupree!
Lily: Oh, yeah. That's who I hate. Guys, we hate Kate Hudson.
Lily: But if it helps, I reached 4G.
Lily: Ted, you're not gonna like this, but we do have one other option.
Lily: Could we bring Ted?
Lily: Come on. Give her a chance.
Lily: Best friend alert!
Lily: It's a boom-a-wang.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: You missed it!
Lily: Ted, give her a chance.
Lily: Aww. You've got a little crush on Wang Guy, don't you?
Lily: Just stop it! God, can't you two just stop fighting for one day? Like, when the Roadrunner and the Coyote clocked out and had a beer together? Or-Or-Or Tom and Jerry shared a cup of coffee.
Lily: But it's Thanksgiving.
Lily: I don't get it. Why'd she just kick us out like that?
Lily: Oh. When Zoey booted us, it made me want to steal something of hers again. Apartment full of designer labels, and what do I grab? "Happy Turkey Day, Hannah. Love, Zoey." I wonder who Hannah is.
Lily: Hi, baby. Good workout.
Lily: I could not resist. I wanted to see Marshmallow coach at work.
Lily: Marshall, you can avoid the attack today?
Lily: Winning? There are no points.
Lily: There are no points.
Lily: I was training.
Lily: That's my little angels. You are luminous beings of light.
Lily: Gender: joy joy!
Lily: Because that's the point of playing, having fun.
Lily: Everyone. This is a participation trophy, everyone has one.
Lily: Marshall, they were in kindergarten. It teaches not basketball like that.
Lily: Are you kidding? What kind of sociopath told you like that?
Lily: Your father was hard on you. It's ugly, but you do not have to be like him. You can learn from mistakes.
Lily: OK, enough. This is not how we will raise our children!And that's not how you gonna lead this team! In tomorrow's game, if you're anything but a teddy bear with the cotton candy and rainbows, I foudroierai gaze so hard that you bruise! The times I've found your internet history, it was a mere side! Is that clear?
Lily: Is that clear?
Lily: Do not look at me like that.
Lily: Stop yelling at me!
Lily: OK, but I'll do it my way too. With the guitar.
Lily: They look different, the children, but make sure they feel surrounded.
Lily: I understand that you like it not.
Lily: I know, baby.
Lily: Thank you. Yours is.
Lily: Hey, guys.
Lily: She's right baby, if you had worn it in college, even I would not have slept with you. And if you remember, I wanted to.
Lily: Oh my God, good evening.
Lily: Target secure.
Lily: Let's go to the table all together.
Lily: I just remembered how Ted is awesome.
Lily: No problem, you just described your mother.
Lily: I remember in college, Maggie wanted to be a marine biologist by day and tutor children in difficulty at night. What you ended up doing?
Lily: Baby, where you going?
Lily: Oh no, I think he'll resign. Sorry Maggie, I have to go stop him. (Lily comes out in pursuit of Marshall, leaving Maggie alone. A man turns to Maggie) Ted I had to leave the bar but it's good she is with Robin.
Lily: Hey baby! I thought you came here to resign... I forgot the basket.
Lily: Do it helped you feel better?
Lily: Maybe you can not dunk now. But you did more in 30 years that this 15 year old could have dreamed. You are a graduate of law. You had the good sense to cut you that stupid ponytail. And, you married this super bomb that is unlike any points to your mother. This entitles you to 30 cm less to dunk. (She drops a little basket) Go ahead Thunder vanilla!
Lily: Oh, Baby! And if instead of going to dunk on your desk... you allongeras and I'd put the banana oil everywhere?
Lily: Sure baby.
Lily: Someone sent these chicken wings because they were too hot. I do... too hot, you're crazy? So chicken wings free.
Lily: Oh, congratulations!
Lily:... never...
Lily: Seriously, Ted is fine? I mean, I know that the weekend was hard, but hey... it's weird radio silence.
Lily: Ted, where were you?
Lily: Yeah, but where we're going to end?
Lily: We do not want to know what you do on the internet when you feel alone.
Lily: What, are you saying that you bought the house?
Lily: Ted, you're barge. It will take years and a small fortune for it to be liveable.
Lily: Ted, you can not go on like this where you will make your life. It does not work like that.
Lily: Bourre.
Lily: What?
Lily: Ted, stop that. You can not keep this house. This is a huge mistake.
Lily: You see, you should have waited to see all the problems that home.
Lily: Boy, you've almost had us still.
Lily: Oh, stay there. Huge hole on the second floor. I just want to be sure the report is accurate.
Lily: Listen, Ted... Usually in life, when you make a huge mistake, you must learn to live with. But how many times you got the chance to take a mass break out and all?
Lily: A Ted Mosby, owner, friends, and if he can rent it, Slumlord.
Lily: Hey, that looks familiar, where did you get it?
Lily: Why do you guys put yourselves through this? You lose every year.
Lily: You okay, Barney?
Lily: You could not be more evil.
Lily: Ooh, ooh, ooh!
Lily: You pretend to be a struggling young artist who needs a new muse.
Lily: Maybe you're not as good a liar as you think you are.
Lily: You never gonna believe what just happened.
Lily: Alan Alda?
Lily: She must have left. She...
Lily: She didn't say her name, but she had blonde hair, boobs. Kind of trashy.
Lily: Yes!
Lily: It's karma.
Lily: I don't know, Barney. I only saw her face.
Lily: Oh, Barney, you're never gonna figure out which one of these is the mystery woman. All of these women have a right to hate you.
Lily: I don't know, Barney. I don't recognize any of these women. I mean, some minor celebrities, one government official, and what appears to be a national fast food chain mascot.
Lily: Absolutely not, Barney. We are not going to make a game out of the women you've tricked into sleeping with you. No way!
Lily: The girl who thought he had 12 hours to live has way more cause to ruin his life than the girl he faked proposed to.
Lily: She bought Yankees season tickets to watch him play!
Lily: Fake baby!
Lily: Is that the blackboard from my classroom?
Lily: You guys stole my blackboard!
Lily: No.
Lily: That woman, like every woman in your Final Four, deserves an apology, and I'm not telling you if she's the one until hear you say, "I'm sorry."
Lily: Barney, you're doing this.
Lily: Okay, here's what we're gonna do. Hey, Meg! Over here! Look who it is! Yo old friend Meg: Barney! Barney?
Lily: No! What's the matter with you? Get off of him! Look, she's not the one, but you still owe her an apol...
Lily: Yes. You told her you were Ted and that you were an architect.
Lily: Yeah, I know, Barney, you showed me. And that still doesn't count as a Christmas present. So go over there and apologize.
Lily: Ooh and she's holding hot coffee. Maybe she'll throw it in your face.
Lily: I'm making a scrapbook.
Lily: Okay, which one is this again?
Lily: Smile.
Lily: That is the worst thing you've ever done. That's the worst thing anyone has ever done.
Lily: She's gonna kill you.
Lily: So you're not mad at Barney? Don't you want an apology? An admission of guilt? Your truck back?
Lily: We ruined their lives. And the worst part of it is that you didn't apologize to any of those women.
Lily: Oh, Barney! Oh, I'm so proud of you. That's not her. I'm so sorry.
Lily: Yes, but it was a great apology. And a perfect way to end my scrapbook. I'm going to call this photo "Barney's Redemption." Could you stop giving me the finger?
Lily: I wish your face would melt off.
Lily: I hate you.
Lily: Hi, Mr. and Mrs. Mosby.
Lily: I was just stopping by to pick up some of my things.
Lily: Me begging Marshall to take me back and him rejecting me?
Lily: Well, I-I don't want to go if it would make you uncomfortable.
Lily: Well, I mean, yeah, we're... We're good, but you got to admit there's that stuff between us.
Lily: "Brother and sister"?! Okay. Fine, yeah, I'll see you at the restaurant, bro. (She leaves)
Lily: Hello, everyone.
Lily: Hello, Marshall.
Lily: Oh, thanks. It's kind of revealing, but I thought, "Hey, we're all family." Right, bro? Ooh, ah...
Lily: Oh, I, I hurt my ankle in yoga today. The instructor told me to just take deep breaths to get through the pain, just... (She breathes deeply while Marshall glances at her low neckline) Are you all right? You're kind of sweating.
Lily: Hey. How are you feeling? You looked kind of feverish last night.
Lily: Oh, I don't know, if anything, it's kind of... (Marshall starts unzipping his knee zips) What are you doing?
Lily: Take off the rest of your pants.
Lily: I really wasn't expecting that to happen.
Lily: Yeah, it does. Why did you have to throw your magnificent calves at me? You know you have a punter's leg.
Lily: Just admit it, you came here trying to seduce me.
Lily: You sat down next to me and took most of your pants off.
Lily: How is that seducing you?
Lily: All right, that's it - I want The Beatles Anthology.
Lily: You are evil.
Lily: Whoops. I think I dropped an ice cube down here. Ow, it's so cold.
Lily: Me, too.
Lily: Thanks again for letting me have the U2 box set.
Lily: Just a minute.
Lily: Marshall, your zipper.
Lily: I wish your face would melt off.
Lily: Me, too.
Lily: It's the same for me. I think we're probably both better off trying to keep some distance for a while.
Lily: Did you Mystic Tan your calves?
Lily: That's why you brought these guys.
Lily: Whoo-hoo!
Lily: Hey, Barney... love the new identities. Little thing... instead of being a naked super ninja, can I be Meryl Streep in The Devil Wears Prada?
Lily: Well, most nights. Mama don't let no ring get in the way of a good time.
Lily: Where's where Was was, isn't it?
Lily: I thought Focus was closed.
Lily: Guys, shut up.
Lily: Mila Kunis?!
Lily: Okay. Well, after a long day of style meetings and photo shoots and being way too mean to my assistant, I sometimes bang an underwear model.
Lily: Oh, uh, only 'cause you have nothing to do all day.
Lily: I work 90 hours a week subsidizing your "real job."
Lily: I brought French cooking to America!
Lily: Hey, you do better than me at a lot of other things, like digesting dairy... and reaching for stuff.
Lily: So our usual wager. Deal.
Lily: I won that race. My prize... s*x in the bathroom.
Lily: Aw, sorry that secret crush didn't work out for you.
Lily: Why are you smiling?
Lily: Hot off the presses!
Lily: Fine. It's a flyer from my play.
Lily: Oh, no, no, no, no, no, no!
Lily: No! Seriously, stop!
Lily: No, it's not.
Lily: It was probably Carla's. Her face was a train wreck.
Lily: Ah, the age-old question: after you break up with someone, what do you do with the stuff?
Lily: Yes!
Lily: All right, well, let's hear the arguments. Ted, you go first.
Lily: Order! Order! I got to side with Robin. She's your girlfriend, and if the stuff upsets her, you got to get rid of it.
Lily: I am Rage... Envy!
Lily: This is the face of Consumerism!
Lily: No, friends make each other feel good. They build each other up and support them. That's what being a good friend is about.
Lily: You know if you did a play, I would sit through the whole thing and I would compliment you on it afterwards.
Lily: Yes.
Lily: What's the matter with you?
Lily: You can ask somebody to get rid of their iguana after it poops in your hair, but not their dog.
Lily: Very funny.
Lily: Oh, we'll be there.
Lily: Never.
Lily: Oh, he's really having trouble dealing with this, huh?
Lily: You're gonna kill your dogs?!
Lily: Oh, thank God. Aw, you know, if I were five dogs, I'd rather live on a farm than in an apartment in Brooklyn.
Lily: Oh, that's perfect. They love dogs.
Lily: Uh... uh.... uh... People upstate. Oh, look, it's starting. Shh!
Lily: I know, but I'm gonna sit through the whole thing, and I'm gonna say something nice about it afterwards. You know why? Because that's what friends do.
Lily: Okay! Stop! You win. Fine. Barney, I'm sorry I made you come to my show.
Lily: No. No, I have nothing nice to say about your show. You were right, Barney. Let's go to the bar.
Lily: Well, I imagine it was pretty awful, so let's go.
Lily: Yeah, well, anyway.
Lily: Then, after I saved you from destroying
Lily: Surprise.
Lily: Oh, it goes back and forth. It's sort of a tranny car.
Lily: Barney. That's like the third one in a row that you've screwed up.
Lily: Look. You fold twice to the middle, fold back and forth, pull the ends out, flip over, open the flaps, fold the edges, crease the front, fold in half, fold the wings down, push in the bottom corners, and fold the wings back out. Or would you like one of my kindergartners to show you?
Lily: No. Forget it; the paper's too expensive. You're out.
Lily: You said you were gonna marry me that long ago? That is so sweet.
Lily: The car's on its deathbed, Robin. I have to clear my conscience.
Lily: Okay. Shortly after we met Robin, she and I were jonesing for Thai food from this one place.
Lily: I wish we could take the Fiero, but Marshall has this insane no-food rule.
Lily: Oh! You're just saying random syllables, and it still sounds delicious. Okay. Here's what we'll do. We'll drive over, pick it up, have them double-bag it, very carefully drive it back here with the windows open, and he'll never know. (Lily slows down the car and knock down the food). Wow, these brakes are really sensitive. Oh, Marshall is gonna kill me! This and the difference between "affect" and "effect" are the only two things he's really serious about.
Lily: No, it's not. Marshall's gonna freak. Oh, God, oh, God. What are we gonna do? Oh, God, oh...!
Lily: There's two in the glove compartment, but he's been saving them.
Lily: These cigars aren't helping at all.
Lily: Now it just smells like a homeless guy threw up in here. End of flasback.
Lily: We had to make it look realistic.
Lily: Marshall, I'm so sorry, but sharing that secret-- that's when Robin and I became best friends.
Lily: What? Why?
Lily: So you made a life-changing decision to not change your life at all.
Lily: That's so sweet. The first car our two kids remember.
Lily: Oh, my God!
Lily: You want to have our wedding in two months? No. It's impossible.
Lily: No, there's just not enough time. There's no way... Oh! Mini-vomit.
Lily: Todd and Valerie?
Lily: Oh! Kids, color!(Lily runs out of class, Marshall runs out pf the appartment, they join in the street) Come on, baby.
Lily: I can't believe it. We got Van Smoot House.
Lily: Division of labor. Everyone's got a job to do, so listen up. Okay, Robin, you and Ted go to the florist.
Lily: Or, actually, Robin, why don't you go to the florist? And, Ted, I could use your keen architectural eye on... on the invitations.
Lily: Okay, your job is very simple. At the wedding, do not sleep with anyone even remotely related to me.
Lily: Crap! Band! We forgot a band! It's just gonna be silence and then people chewing.
Lily: Who?
Lily: John "Bonzo" Bonham from Led Zeppelin?
Lily: Look, I... I can't sign off on a band I've never even seen. We... we don't even know if they can play our song. They're... they're going to have to come over here and audition.
Lily: Well, then... I have to say no.
Lily: Well... well, are they playing anywhere this weekend?
Lily: What?
Lily: Intense? I have a wedding to plan in nine weeks for 200 people. Even if a dinosaur should poke his head out of my butt and consume this coffee table, I need you to roll with it, okay?
Lily: We already have a caterer.
Lily: A prom? Can... can we go to that?
Lily: Yeah. No, they won't.
Lily: 'Cause it turns out we're not in high school.
Lily: Yes, we are. It's the only way.
Lily: It's nine weeks till the wedding. At this point, I'd say yes to just about anything.
Lily: No, Barney.
Lily: Really?
Lily: Do you think we look young enough to blend in at a high school?
Lily: All right, what do you think?
Lily: You're gonna make such a great dad.
Lily: Well, we have to get in. I have to see this band, 'cause we have to make a decision by Monday, 'cause I'm getting married in 71 days, and we still don't have...
Lily: All right.
Lily: I didn't know I still had this.
Lily: The dress I wore to my actual prom.
Lily: Aw, you look great, too, Scooter.
Lily: Oh, disco! I am so happy for you.
Lily: Scooter, you're gonna be an umpire someday.
Lily: Aw. Sweet. Thank you.
Lily: We got to go. See ya.
Lily: Wow, a lot more security than when we were kids.
Lily: Yeah. Look, when I was 17, I used to sneak into clubs all the time. It's all about confidence. Follow me. Whee-hoo! Happy prom, everybody. Going to prom-- whee-hoo!
Lily: Okay, bye. Okay, look, I just need to see the band. I'm getting married in two months, and...
Lily: Wow. "Ma'am?" Check and mate.
Lily: Hi. Shall we?
Lily: We're in!
Lily: Oh, you're kidding me.
Lily: Hi. Excuse me. I was wondering if you guys could play "Good Feeling" by the Violent Femmes. I know it's probably not in your repertoire, but I'm getting married and my fiancé wants to hire you guys as the band, but I can't sign off on it until I hear you play "Good Feeling" because that's our song, and what kind of wedding band would you be if you couldn't play our song, right? Right?
Lily: There's just so much to do for this wedding. My head is swirling. It's just all moving too fast.
Lily: I just... I just don't want everything in my life to be decided already.
Lily: Scooter, when I go off to college, that's the end for us.
Lily: There's still so much I want to do. I want to travel, live overseas as an artist, maybe have a lesbian relationship. Plus, I think I was just dating you 'cause you look a little bit like Kurt Cobain.
Lily: Please don't put that kind of pressure on me! It's too much!
Lily: What?
Lily: Yeah, sure, okay. So Andrew, what's your big plan? What's life going to be like after tonight?
Lily: No, you won't.
Lily: No, you won't accomplish anything you set out to. You'll get a girlfriend the first day of college and you'll give up your independence and you'll never live abroad and you'll wind up old before your time wondering "Whatever happened to my hopes and my dreams?"
Lily: I can't believe I unloaded like that on a high school senior.
Lily: Yeah. But not about Marshall. About me. I just keep thinking about the girl I was ten years ago and wondering what happened to her.
Lily: I don't want to be tied down. I want to live in France and Spain and Italy and just soak up life and put it on a canvas, even if it means being a waitress in crappy cafés for five years, I don't care. I'm going to be a painter. And I can't do any of that with a, with a boyfriend shackled around my neck, you know? But anyway, I'm blabbering. Way to make new friends, Lily. I'm sorry. What was your name again?
Lily: Nice to meet you, Marshall. Guess we're hallmates.
Lily: It works.
Lily: Me, too.
Lily: I didn't have any of the experiences I set out to. The travel, the bohemian art life, my big lesbian experience. I didn't do any of it.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Yeah. So field hockey, huh?
Lily: Yeah, it's good.
Lily: Two months.
Lily: SUCK IT LOSERS! (Burps)
Lily: You know, quiet time with the fiancé.
Lily: I don't know, I just felt embarrassed. Claire is my age, and she and her husband do all these classy grownup stuff. Maybe we should start doing some grownup stuff.
Lily: (Laughs) Yeah, but it wasn't classy. Maybe we should have a wine tasting party.
Lily: Oh, no, Ted, your blazer!
Lily: Somebody spilled gorgeous all over it. Love it!
Lily: Hey we're wearing the same shirt! Oh, wait no that's just my shirt reflected in yours.
Lily: Marshall and I are just growing up.
Lily: Why, you'd rather be out at some dance club, all noisy and sweaty with the... (Imitates music beat). Is that what you want? (Imitates music beat.)
Lily: (to guests) Let's start drinking!
Lily: Come on, it's not that bad. We're really starting to click with these guys. Claire and Austin just invited us to their fondue fest next Saturday night.
Lily: It's dipping stuff in hot cheese, what's not to love?
Lily: Marshall, it's time for us to grow up.
Lily: Please tell me we can drink the wine now.
Lily: Freaking tannins.
Lily: Marshall, are you okay?
Lily: Taxi!
Lily: Hey.
Lily: Marshall just ditched out on our own party. Can you get me in there? I kind of need to kill him.
Lily: Know something; I'd take a pee in the gutter over Julia Roberts any day. (They realize it sounds gross and laugh)
Lily: He just left, in the middle of our own party, you don't do that. Unless, of course, you're chasing after someone who's already done it, and then I think it's okay.
Lily: Don't check your email.
Lily: Once on a dare. The other times were just for fun. I'm not in college anymore. I'd love to go back and be that person again, but you can't move backwards you can only go forward.
Lily: I want to go into this club and find my fiancé.
Lily: Wanna bet? (They get up) Follow my lead. (To doorman) Hey, big guy. (Flashes doorman, geeks watching.) I said follow my lead.
Lily: Oh, my god...I'm going to barf. Where's my purse, where's my purse? (Sleeps) I'm okay.
Lily: Do you think they've been in there the whole time? I don't know whether to be proud or concerned.
Lily: Wow, your room must smell like a monkey cage!
Lily: What?
Lily: Burn!
Lily: No, no, we can't, it's our nine-year anniversary.
Lily: Thanks. We're going to the Berkshires for the maple syrup harvest.
Lily: Hell, yeah. Nothing better than a weekend at a good bed and breakfast.
Lily: Complimenting the odors and their collection of needle-point geese.
Lily: Yeah, well, we'd better get going, it's like a four-hour drive.
Lily: Or we could just stay home.
Lily: Order in some Chinese.
Lily: Hell, yeah.
Lily: I'm so glad we decided to just stay home.
Lily: And yet we'd feel obligated to have s*x.
Lily: Oh, my God, what are they doing home?
Lily: But we didn't go away, we're in the bathroom.
Lily: But I don't want to hide out in here.
Lily: Okay, fine. I guess I'll actually floss.
Lily: Ugh, that is bad. That is, like, high-school-literary-magazine bad.
Lily: It's actually working.
Lily: Yeah, try five.
Lily: No way! We can't go out there now. They'll know that we've been sitting in the bathroom the whole time. It'll be too weird.
Lily: Honey, could you hold my hair back, I think I'm going to hurl.
Lily: I don't know, we used to be even more nauseatingly into each other than Ted and Victoria. Now look at us.
Lily: No, I'm serious, Marshall. I mean, we couldn't even get it up to go on our big trip. And now we're celebrating our anniversary stuck in a bathroom.
Lily: Yeah, but we could still have some more romance. Now, you just say, "Want to do it?" And I say, "Yeah."
Lily: No! Maybe we're just out of firsts.
Lily: Yes!
Lily: Yes!
Lily: No! Do her! Do her now!
Lily: I need a drink. Do we have any cough syrup in here?
Lily: Marshall, what happened to us? We used to just stare into each other's eyes all night long. Have we lost that?
Lily: Okay, well, get ready for my sex-ray vision. Did you remember to pick up the dry cleaning? Oh, damn it.
Lily: Let's just hold hands. This is nice.
Lily: All right, we totally suck at this. We really, really need to get out of here.
Lily: Baby, there's something I have to do, and if I do it in front of you, it'll change the entire nature of our relationship.
Lily: I have to pee.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: Look at us. We're basically an old married couple, and we're not even married yet. The flame of our romance is flickering, and if I pee all over it, it might go out forever.
Lily: I drank a Big Gulp of Mountain Dew during that Quantum Leap marathon.
Lily: Oh, my God, I hate Ted. I hate him so much.
Lily: No, but we haven't, because I want to keep some of the mystery alive.
Lily: Yes, but I always cover it with a cough.
Lily: Baby, I can't hold it in any longer. It's time.
Lily: I love you, Marshall.
Lily: I'm okay. You okay?
Lily: I'm happy for my bladder, yet sad for us.
Lily: Yeah. I guess our relationship had to take a hit so a new one out there could blossom. Oh, crap!
Lily: Well, I guess we can come out now. I don't believe it. They're gone.
Lily: Not making me feel better.
Lily: It was, wasn't it? We still have firsts.
Lily: Marshall, what makes you cry?
Lily: Oh, just grab my boob already.
Lily: Bait?
Lily: It was the first week of college. I was way into Wu-Tang Clan.
Lily: You got a mini pig?
Lily: Who would buy a can of chili for not eating it away?
Lily: Whore posting!
Lily: I think my high school boyfriend Scooter, is a little to my hook.
Lily: It's weird when I see him at work.
Lily: Scooter works in the Ikea cafeteria 'school. We talked.
Lily: But if. I talked to full time. "Scooter canteen."
Lily: It explains a lot.
Lily: Scooter canteen was still there today.
Lily: No!
Lily: Are you jealous?
Lily: I tried!
Lily: Let me be clear, Scooter. There is no way that you and I are together. For now.
Lily: You're right. Tomorrow, that's what I'll do.
Lily: I can not spoil the Tijuana Tuesday.
Lily: Mini Pig, it is impossible that I may one day with you. For now.
Lily: I'm sorry, but it is just so cute. I just want to cuddle him all day. Oh, yes.
Lily: I still do.
Lily: And tell me, would you have accidentally made this chocolate cake?
Lily: There's no shame to admit it. We were all hooked and we all hooked someone.
Lily: Mini pig... I do not wanna be with you. For now.
Lily: Mini pig... I do not wanna be with you. Ever.
Lily: It will never be together in any sexual way again.
Lily: Really bad.
Lily: I can do it alone.
Lily: Listen, Scooter. There is no way we ever be together.
Lily: Listen. I want to be with you.
Lily: Aw... That's actually really sweet.
Lily: That's it! You know what? Five-minute time-out! Corner booth! Now.
Lily: Dude, everyone sees Maury Povich.
Lily: A boat! Oh, wait, that is how you say it.
Lily: No, you're not a real New Yorker till you've cried on the subway and not given a damn what anyone thinks.
Lily: A real New Yorker would know the subway's faster. You just take the one, and transfer to the two-three.
Lily: Oh, my God!
Lily: Negative.
Lily: Everything's fine. These things take time.
Lily: You know what? Just to make sure, I'm gonna pee on this again.
Lily: Track maintenance? 20-minute delay?
Lily: I grew up here, I speak conductor. Damn it! (she gets off the train) Damn it!
Lily: Sweetie? Are you okay?
Lily: You've had a rough year. But you're tough. And I love you like crazy. If you left, I'd have to follow you. And Marshall would follow me. And Ted would follow him. The only upside is that we might get rid of Barney. Bring it in.
Lily: No clue. Hey, is that Maury Povich?
Lily: Sorry, sweetie. I swear I'll be a great friend at the finish line, but the conductor just said you're going express to Borough Hall, which means you're screwed, sweetie. So long, sucker. (the doors of the train opens) Damn it. (she makes a phone call) Hey, it's Lily. Help me.
Lily: Marshall! Marshall, get in!
Lily: Okay, he's in. Go. Go. Gun it.
Lily: Run him over.
Lily: Nothing. I just want to win this really badly. So badly that I just ditched my best friend when she needed me.
Lily: Why did I get so crazy about this?
Lily: Oh, thank God. I keep thinking there's something wrong with me.
Lily: It's only been two months.
Lily: We're totally crazy.
Lily: We gotta go back to Paris.
Lily: And really learn how to ski. Not just up and get faced in the lodge.
Lily: Oh, a cradle list.
Lily: It isn't a race.
Lily: Oh, my God.
Lily: Well, I guess we should go, right?
Lily: Mark.
Lily: Mark.
Lily: We are not fast-forwarding through the commercials.
Lily: I know. He was so young.
Lily: Oh, let's face it, we're not going to get to watch it. We should just find out the score.
Lily: Oh, commercials!
Lily: Oh, so lame. Nobody even pays attention. I mean, Janet Jackson, who cares?
Lily: I'm in.
Lily: And he's a little bit double-jointed... And his favorite animal is the Loch Ness monster.
Lily: Well, I think we can all agree, he is much more interesting than Sally's one-eyed goldfish. Three weeks in a row? Come on, Sally. Okay, well, that's all the time we have. Arts and crafts, everybody.
Lily: Okay, now who did this?
Lily: Well, Marshall's a grownup, so...
Lily: Sorry. Marshall gets a time-out.
Lily: Didn't find out.
Lily: Yeah. Thanks a lot, Barney.
Lily: Well, at least the commercials aren't ruined.
Lily: Ooh, you go first.
Lily: Yeah, go ahead, Barney.
Lily: How did it go with Dale?
Lily: Robin, this is not because a guy talks a lot about a fictional character for your first date it can not be your future.
Lily: How it happened at school today, Ted?
Lily: We will not make jokes, Ted. I mean, this girl must really be in the hole.
Lily: Wow, two in a row, Barney is thoroughly.
Lily: It is everything I love that Marshall either.
Lily: You're yucky.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: Of course not!
Lily: It is perfectly normal.
Lily: It was a great day out at 4 it was cool, we were relaxed, it was not freaked out.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: That's weird?
Lily: Wow. 3 girls in 3 nights. This is gross, even from Barney.
Lily: Wear what bad luck?
Lily: Wait a second. Want it called?
Lily: We kept her in the bathroom.
Lily: Oh, it's weird. He said nothing.
Lily: I'll go talk to him.
Lily: Come on, it's his career. This is much more important than a stupid without...
Lily: It must go talk to him.
Lily: So what did he say?
Lily: You were supposed to talk about his loss of job.
Lily: And why ignore it will fix things?
Lily: Jen Coulin!
Lily: Barney, we know that you are going you may get fired. Wait, you ought to speak. You turn away from reality, kissing unnecessarily on all sides.
Lily: God forbid, if you manage to find a job, sell your apartment.Marshall and I, we have a free room. You can stay as long as you want.
Lily: I talk to my friend who is going through a difficult period.
Lily: Try to sleep with seven women in seven nights, that's not what I would call "very well get out." It is a cry for help.
Lily: What? Without fault? Flawless, faultless, flawless! Grow up a little!
Lily: Ok, I have a question. If I ruined everything, why is it that Barney is in the process of hanging the girl three martinis in there?
Lily: Yeah, you know? Doors-jinx, it does not exist.
Lily: Ok, let me do it the Canadian So how do you react if one of those guys with skates and sticks came back here?
Lily: Yeah, sorry. I'm so clumsy! Oh, thank you. I think I twisted my ankle. Do what you can bring me some ice?
Lily: In commemoration, at the entrance to the Barney legend, this tie, worn during his seventh night of her flawless, freshly removed.
Lily: And my dress. And your dress. You put a dress at one point.
Lily: What happened to your leg?
Lily: Let us be clear... this woman is angry against you because you lied to him. So your solution is to claim that you broke your leg?
Lily: That's great, Ted.
Lily: Wait a minute. You're going to handle two girls at once? You do not think you should pick one before it gets too serious?
Lily: Well, it's complicated. I think it would be when you have expectations, emotional involvement...
Lily: Well, it could be anyone. And thin, I had forgotten this story Biercules.Who made this site first?
Lily: I knew it. Ted, left or right?
Lily: Well, it looks like Jessica wins in the first four categories.
Lily: Oh, dear. You're still drunk. I can not believe that I made the bet.
Lily: What does it therefore reference?
Lily: Well... it could be anyone...
Lily: Pete, it's Lily Aldrin. I'll be brief. You're going out this video of Marshall. You know why? Because I am friends with three girls with whom you came to school, and girls say it all together. Every small detail.Huh. So... tick, tick... Pete so goes the clock in the little dick.
Lily: I have no idea. Well, what do you take?
Lily: But if he did, you would love all the same. And to be honest, you do not love to come across a video of him running down the street naked shouting, "Hey, Marshall, look at me! I have a stalactite on the head! "
Lily: Yes, the stupid thing that makes us turn the head, pretty cool.
Lily: Yes!
Lily: Saw what? Maybe the video is not so bad after all.
Lily: Yes. Even the side where you route the East Village naked.
Lily: It's a good idea.
Lily: Ted, you can't let him treat you like that.
Lily: I knew this day would come.
Lily: Because I didn't hide it very well.
Lily: It's for class, and it's just that weird kid Hunter from my freshman hall.
Lily: No, he's actually a little husky...
Lily: Okay, just forget it.
Lily: Well, then you'll have to do it.
Lily: We're not in high school anymore. People don't make fun of you for posing nude for a painting. We're adults now.
Lily: You know, I wish everyone didn't have to make fun of that painting.
Lily: Are you serious?
Lily: Well, thank you. You know, seeing it again makes me miss painting nudes. What?
Lily: What?
Lily: Oh honey, you're awake?
Lily: Yeah. I've kind of been wrestling with something. What if I told you I had a way to pay for our honeymoon?
Lily: Well yeah, but-- but what if we didn't want to spend our honeymoon in a cave?
Lily: Well, what if I found a way to make a little extra money so that we spend our honeymoon not in Howe Caverns, but in Scotland?
Lily: Yeah. And you know, Edinburgh and the Highlands and Glasgow...
Lily: Maybe we can.
Lily: Okay, I don't get this. You've been making fun of that painting all this time and now you want me to paint you?
Lily: Yeah, that's not the gland I'm worried about painting.
Lily: Forget it. I promised Marshall he was the only guy I would ever see naked.
Lily: Yeah!
Lily: Okay, let's get this over with.
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: I don't think your sword will fit.
Lily: Hold still. Hold still. Hold still!
Lily: Okay, I guess it's time. Drop your shorts.
Lily: Oh, just drop them!
Lily: Okay, it's done. I'm gonna step out, so you can admire it.
Lily: Marshall, do you have the money?
Lily: Let's get out of here!
Lily: What's going on? There are queuing outside the McLaren's.
Lily: Look at all these guys. The sidewalk will feel the pee now.
Lily: It will never happen. She will pretend to enjoy yourself in the same way she has mesmerized all these geniuses.
Lily: A new super sexy barmaid.
Lily: If he thinks. Do not bother to pretend that other women are not attractive just for my own good.
Lily: Baby, you're an angel, but compared to this woman, I am a big trash bag 3 days.
Lily: You see, it's really annoying.
Lily: Now that you have been looking more closely, admit it: the bartender is the sexiest of the Bar.
Lily: Baby, how can you not want you to do? I want to do it. If you do not wanna do it, sorry, but you must be gay.
Lily: Why?
Lily: And thoughtful. If the rules are so strict, you could put your work in.
Lily: Of course, I listened carefully when you spoke.
Lily: Who, the guy who kisses an urn full of ashes costume. This guy?
Lily: Admit it, she is sexier than me. It will not hurt me.
Lily: That's a goddess! Her skin glows. Her legs are super long.And that ass? I do not mind having it, even on the head! That night, I admit, I thought about it a little more than once.
Lily: I never said that.
Lily: It's not comparable. She is younger than you.
Lily: And a world at peace would be within your reach?
Lily: Yeah, and it's not like you can screw up a hot dog. Oh, God. This is so good. I'm gonna finish it in the bathroom.
Lily: Yeah, who called this intervention?
Lily: Finally.
Lily: Are you sure it's love?
Lily: Harsh? Robin, a single guy and a married woman cannot be friends if one's in love with the other.
Lily: And seriously, mouthwash after coffee.
Lily: We hate Ted now. Get on board or the sexting stops.
Lily: Oh, I know. But did he tell you the whole story?
Lily: That's crazy. I don't hate you.
Lily: He... Oh, really? And-And what did Ted say, exactly?
Lily: Oh, he... Oh, yeah. Yeah, okay, well, I- I guess there's no use hiding it anymore. I- I hate you. Bitch.
Lily: I don't know.
Lily: Not entirely.
Lily: Zoey, wait! I don't hate you! We just can't be friends anymore because... Robin hates you.
Lily: Oh, well, I'll let you take that. Love you, baby!
Lily: So guys, Marshall and I wanted to invite you to our place for a little couples' night.
Lily: Welcome.
Lily: This is great. We're having fun. You're having fun, right?
Lily: Our parents really want to meet you!
Lily: (blocking their way) There's still pie.
Lily: (flashback when she saw Robin and Barney kissing) Wohoo!
Lily: Marshall and I wanted to invite you to our place for a little couples' night.
Lily: Okay. Game time. Let's review the flow of the room. (moving in the room) Barney and Robin enter here. Stop here for margaritas. That's a great conversation starter. We can tell them about nour trip to Cabo.
Lily: Then we'll move on to the hot apps station. And, depending on how things are going, Some lively pre-dinner charades.
Lily: Sounds like?
Lily: Oh... Baby, we can do this.
Lily: Welcome.
Lily: Take care. Bye.
Lily: Nailed it!
Lily: Hey. Come on in. Would you like a margarita?
Lily: That's prosciutto-wrapped melon.
Lily: That's seared scallops with a mango chutney.
Lily: And that's Lobster ravioli in a black truffle oil.
Lily: What do you mean, the egg timer is broken? What are we going to use for charades, sweetie?
Lily: Now, Robin... You work in television. We're experiencing some technical difficulties. ( she laughs): You get that? We're still laughing. Right? Laugh,Marshall.
Lily: Hey, guys. Good news. First of all, you can ignore all the e-mails and texts we've sent you.
Lily: Because we went ahead and booked that couples' weekend for all of us inVermont!
Lily: Check it out. Saturday we've got apple-picking, antiquing, then a hated hay ride.
Lily: Wow, Barney. That kind of sounds like the stuff you say to girls when you're too much of a coward to dump them.
Lily: What's going on?
Lily: Come on,Marshall.
Lily: We're so lovable.
Lily: I thought we did everything right.
Lily: Oh, dear god.Marshall, we've been over and over this. You have to stop sending those to people.
Lily: I can't believe you sent them one of those. They think we're insane now.
Lily: Oh, what about you forgetting to check the egg timer for charades? I gave you one thing to do,Marshall. One thing.
Lily: You're a sturdy, cheese-bearing cracker!
Lily: Oh. I wish you had called.
Lily: Um, listen, now's not a good time. We'll call you.
Lily: Oh, we can't. We're here with Py and Shea.
Lily: Oh, it might be weird. We're kind of on a double date. Wouldn't want you to feel like a fifth and sixth wheel.
Lily: They just moved here fromHawaii. Py is a total foodie
Lily: And Shea, well... She's...
Lily: Anyhoo, we can't stay long. We're just gonna grab a quick beer and then take these kooks for a boat ride around the city.
Lily: I know! When I got that left-hand- yellow, I was like, "what?!"
Lily: How do we know you two won't hurt us again?
Lily: Damn it. Why is there something so attractive about a bad boy... And girl?
Lily: Come here, you two.
Lily: Robin!
Lily: Really? That'd be great.
Lily: Robin, you've got to get over this Ted and Victoria thing. You had your chance, and now he's moved on. Can't you just be happy for them?
Lily: Sold. Victoria, what's wrong?
Lily: Everything's so fluffy and white. It's like shopping in a marshmallow. How's Barney's tailor?
Lily: Well, good luck, baby.
Lily: Oh, good luck, baby.
Lily: Nothing too huge or-or poofy. I'm not really a girlie girl. But I would like to look like a beautiful princess.
Lily: Where does she get off? She doesn't know how much money I make.
Lily: Damn you Old Navy and your reasonably-priced three-packs!
Lily: Ugh. All talking and no s*x. Kill me now.
Lily: It's okay, guys, I hate it.
Lily: You know, Victoria, Marshall and I did long distance once. In college, I did an art course in Paris. I was the only American there. It was really lonely. I only had one friend, Gabrielle. She was kind of homely and strange-looking, and she was really self-conscious about this little moustache she had. Anyway, halfway through the semester, she just stopped talking to me, and I never figured out why. And then I had nobody. The only thing that got me through was knowing that my soul mate was back at home waiting for me. If Ted's your soul mate, then it may be worth it to hang onto him.
Lily: Maybe he's going to buy you one.
Lily: Oh, God, you guys are sucky liars.
Lily: Are you okay?
Lily: Okay. Just kind of seemed like you're trying to hustle Victoria out of the country.
Lily: Stop being sarcastic. It is a super-important dessert scholarship. Wow, that's hard to say without sounding sarcastic. Look... I know you're not Victoria's biggest fan, but she seems to make Ted happy. So think about that before you use your miles to buy her a plane ticket.
Lily: Oh, my gosh, it's perfect! Oh! This dress is totally going to get me laid on my wedding night.
Lily: Well, I'm always putting my career ahead of my relationships, and... to be honest, there's a lot of lonely nights in that job description.
Lily: Oh, I am so beautiful! Oh, don't tell me how much it costs. Just snap my neck now, so I can die this pretty.
Lily: Oh. Okay, okay, how much is it, on a scale of never to never ever?
Lily: Well, it's okay. You know, what makes a bride beautiful is that she's just happy to be getting married. (She sits on the cake, without noticing it) Oh, guys, I know I look amazing, but the important thing is that Marshall and I love each other, right?
Lily: It was like this when I found it?
Lily: Credit card... s.
Lily: No, I'm just gonna wait for the next time Marshall really screws up, and then, I'll just slip this in, and it won't seem so bad by comparison.
Lily: Yeah, but only, like, second base.
Lily: I destroyed an $8,000 wedding dress.
Lily: And hey, just think, one week from right now...
Lily: But other than that, things are good?
Lily: I guess, in a lot of ways, Barney doesn't stack up.
Lily: I mean, you've had some pretty incredible boyfriends.
Lily: What?!
Lily: Oh, come on, Robin. Barney's not the type of guy who would... Go on.
Lily: Well, that doesn't prove anything.
Lily: And what do you plan on doing with it?
Lily: No! Stop! Stop! Eye contact. Listen to me. Robin Scherbatsky is many things: friend, confidant, occasional guest star in some confusing dreams that remind me a woman's sexuality is a moving target. But she is no crazy, jealous stalker-bitch. (snatching the briefcase) Let go.
Lily: Oh, that's great, honey.
Lily: Marshall got it in college. He used it as a nightstand for years.
Lily: Just go with it.
Lily: (to Robin) Be cool, baby. Damn! (toMarshall who is leaving with his barrel) See you, sweetie. Good luck.
Lily: Now, can we please get out of here?
Lily: A college notebook?!
Lily: What do you know about this,Marshall?
Lily: (reading) "Class number two."
Lily: (reading) "Three Topics To Distract Robin From Being Mad At You."
Lily: "Immediately switch the conversation To one of the following, "unless you want Robin to start throwing her shoes."
Lily: Neither can you, sweetie.
Lily: I don't know. Check this out. This is actually kind of sweet.
Lily: I think 's nice that Ted knows you that well.
Lily: Oh, here's a good one. "Top Five Things Never to Do Around Robin."
Lily: (hugging her) Oh, sweetie. Can I get you some butterscotch?
Lily: So?
Lily: (sneezing): Kiss ass.
Lily: Oh, this store in the Village had one of those crazy sales. It was a footwear feeding frenzy.
Lily: I saw it first.
Lily: You just made the list, bitch.
Lily: You look fantastic in them, Robin. But don't you think they're a little high for that dress?
Lily: New girl? What new girl?
Lily: Oh, you don't know what you're talking about. Give it to me.
Lily: Are they friends? (Ted on phone)
Lily: Are they Betas?
Lily: Because they're all sluts and you can tell them right now I didn't wanna be in their sorority anyway.
Lily: OK, well, don't worry, I'll come down and help you figure it out.
Lily: It's me, I'm at the bar. Don't look, just call me mom.
Lily: What? What's the matter with you? Anyway, both of these girls are into you. Take your pick.
Lily: Yes, of course. They're playing with their hair and touching your arm. Class green light.
Lily: Positive. They both want you bad. It's a clearance sale and you're the boots, baby.
Lily: Oh, it's Robin. Good luck.
Lily: Hello.
Lily: What about the no-shave rule? What happened to your convictions?
Lily: No, I'm not doing it. The whole point to not shaving...
Lily: I'm on my way.
Lily: Well, he's right, it's a dead heat.
Lily: Neither one is giving ground. I could not tell who was the third wheel.
Lily: Well, I'll just say it right now, all sorority girls are sluts.
Lily: If I died, I'd just come back and haunt your pen1s.
Lily: Fine, sleep with your nurses. Tonight you ride the unicycle.
Lily: Hello.
Lily: Sorry, I can't leave now.
Lily: He's coming upstairs!
Lily: We know, we know, Ted. Well done, this is very impressive. Up top.
Lily: Oh, don't be gross.
Lily: Oh, you can use our bedroom.
Lily: I knew it. I had a hunch about that girl and I was right.
Lily: I saw it first.
Lily: You just made the list, bitch.
Lily: I cannot give up my bedroom to a boot thief. She should be punished, not rewarded.
Lily: No, never.
Lily: Thanks, enjoy our bedroom.
Lily: I'll get your coats? Ted: I don't know why I said that. Why did I say that? It's the opposite of what I meant. I wanna take clothes off them, not put more on.
Lily: What are you talking about? Barney: If you must know, it wasn't a freak beverage malfunction that stopped me from riding the tricycle that night.
Lily: I can't believe I'm gonna say this, but I'm actually moved. Bring it in, guys.
Lily: You have feelings for Ted.
Lily: Marshall was here yesterday. They just learned the word "fiancé."
Lily: Okay, let's have a big hand for Robin the reporter. All right, our next guest is another friend...
Lily: He has a job doing... What do you do?
Lily: Yes, she does! She likes you. She told me.
Lily: It's a big secret, so don't tell her I told you, but she's very vulnerable right now and you have a girlfriend. Go home, Ted.
Lily: Yes. So you see why it would be a very bad idea for you to go up there. Go home, Ted.
Lily: Go home, Ted.
Lily: Good. He's going home.
Lily: What do you mean?
Lily: No, he's not going up there. He has more sense than that.
Lily: Okay, it's time for bed.
Lily: Nothing good ever happens after 2:00 a.m.
Lily: We're going home.
Lily: Gonna?
Lily: Okay, but, but, as of right now at-at... 2:45 a.m. you still have a girlfriend. Ted, I love you. I love Robin. But if you do this right now, your entire future with her will be built on a crime. Just go home, Ted. Don't do this the wrong way.
Lily: It's my best and most annoying trait.
Lily: I think he just spat on me.
Lily: Okay, if we're at the "le," then I say we follow it up with a "t's go home."
Lily: Okay, seriously.
Lily: Right? I mean, just look at her. Yeah. She's clearly a...
Lily: Lisa.
Lily: Emily?!
Lily: "Rob"? No.
Lily: Hey, Rob. What are you gonna make? A turkey?
Lily: Not "Rob."
Lily: Not "Ryan."
Lily: Hey, where's the goldfish?
Lily: Not "Johnny." Or "Gil."
Lily: Jeremy, no!
Lily: Definitely not "Jeremy." His stuff was so derivative.
Lily: Oh, honey, I really try.
Lily: Short version.
Lily: You know, when you think about that, that phrase is really creepy.
Lily: Okay. Here's my list of baby names.
Lily: What about "Tara"?
Lily: What about "Esther"?
Lily: I know you think that's a compliment, but I'd rather you took your time.
Lily: Whoa! Baby, you're packing snowballs, and your breath smells like a mermaid fart.
Lily: Wait... hey, baby, why are you facing me north? You're trying to make us have a boy.
Lily: All my least favorite students have been boys. So I Googled "how to make a girl some really weird stuff came up but finally, I found this conception Web site that said you should point south at the moment of conception... eat a lemon......and heat up your lady parts to a balmy 105 degrees. (blow-dryer whooshing) Ooh... ah... Oh, that's not bad.
Lily: See that? Another boy expecting a woman to clean up his mistakes. That's why girls are way better than boys.
Lily: Oh, well, what about Chucky?
Lily: Oh, so you finally agreed on a name?
Lily: We're idiots.
Lily: Whoa.
Lily: I guess, but, dude, you're writing checks my v*g1n* can't cash.
Lily: Me, too.
Lily: Marshall... we just named our baby. Jamie.
Lily: Not Jamie.
Lily: Aw.
Lily: It was late August 1996
Lily: Don't be embarrassed, Ted, it was a long time ago.
Lily: Ted, what's going on?
Lily: Yeah, I know, I just told her.
Lily: Ted, what are you talking about?
Lily: Come on what?
Lily: Ted, I honestly don't know what you're talking about.
Lily: What? Ted and I never made out.
Lily: I only made out with one other guy in college before I met Marshall, and it was just some random dude. I don't even remember his name. I just call him too-much-tongue guy.
Lily: That wasn't me.
Lily: No, no no no no no no no no no no no.
Lily: Marshall, I need to talk to you. Can we go somewhere in private?
Lily: And I'm unreasonably-small-mouth-opening girl.
Lily: Baby, I am so sorry.
Lily: Are you sure? Marshall: If it wasn't, I peed in the wrong guy's shampoo, man.
Lily: I know.
Lily: Sandwiches are strong these days.
Lily: Dude, we're 42.
Lily: Ted, the wedding was yesterday. It's been 24 hours.
Lily: No, it is a mess.
Lily: A mess. And one must be there for him.
Lily: Hey, man.
Lily: Oh, the farm. I'm sorry, is that you have experienced something traumatic, and we try to be there for you, but do not you leave us, and it irritates us, selfish little whore. Sorry.
Lily: Super. Thank you, Ted.
Lily: Well, The Meatloaf Charlie?
Lily: This is ridiculous.
Lily: You can not live like this.
Lily: Someone told me of a tapas bar located in the white zone.
Lily: I actually remember it. Oh Oh!
Lily: I remember.
Lily: He is serious?
Lily: You're maybe Ohio, but you live in New York now. We do not bury our emotions in New York. We take our emotions and they are sent to the other side!
Lily: I dream! There's not one person on Earth to which I would hide under a table.
Lily: How dare you pronounce this name to me?
Lily: This is the last person I would like to see here. Michael purifier. This is a guy I was in high school.
Lily: Michael was next to me in Biology. It was a failure for the entire college, but the summer before the third, he grew 30 cm and joined the baseball team. It was becoming a cool guy.Until one day...
Lily: Are you kidding? It was the third. I had a choice.
Lily: Oh, my God, purifier! It gauze?
Lily: Of course purifier. Or rather Gazeur. Gazeur!
Lily: The Gazeur nickname stuck. He had so much ridicule, he had to change schools.
Lily: It made me always feel guilty. But if Gazeur... Michael...came now, as hard as it may be, I would go to Gazeur...Michael... and I should settle things between us.
Lily: That's not true?
Lily: Who is it?
Lily: From Robin's father.
Lily: Why?
Lily: You do not think you'd feel better if you talked to him?
Lily: You're gonna say what?
Lily: Wait, wait! Where it goes? His taxi has missed the exit for the Lincoln Tunnel.
Lily: She stops.
Lily: OK, wait. Wait...
Lily: Wait. Listen, Ted, it's great that you're angry...
Lily:... and that you face all that, but... you only have one chance. Take a moment and think about what you will say.
Lily: Okay, tell him that.
Lily: Yeah. It's just how I always pictured it.
Lily: So, we've decided on a small, outdoor wedding, just family and close friends. No more than 25 people in a beautiful garden somewhere, maybe an acoustic guitar playing while we walk down the aisle.
Lily: Great. Now my mom's making me invite the Lessners. This puts our numbers in the triple digits.
Lily: So it's not going to be an outdoor wedding anymore. Marshall's dad is convinced if we have an outdoor wedding in New York, he's going to get mugged, so it's going to be inside now. It'll be great. We're still going to have our acoustic guitar player.
Lily: So now, instead of an acoustic guitar, we're having a harp player. Yeah. My dad owes a guy, and... that guy's daughter plays the harp.
Lily: Well, it doesn't matter anyway. She's pregnant.
Lily: Wow. Andrea. You really are pregnant.
Lily: Robin, it's fine. So, so, when are you due?
Lily: Wow, that's soon.
Lily: Robin, I'm not going to freak myself out. I hate those women who say, "Oh, my wedding has to be perfect." Things go wrong. Sometimes the deejay screws up your playlist. Sometimes you slip on placenta during the recessional.
Lily: Bill?
Lily: Oh, no. Did he look like a guy who tried to be an umpire but failed?
Lily: That's Scooter.
Lily: His real name is Bill. My mom must have invited him.
Lily: Our families are really close. But my ex-boyfriend? Come on, Mom. I didn't invite that professional squash player Dad busted you with. Oh, I need a glass of wine.
Lily: Oh, thanks. Hey, how's Marshall doing?
Lily: Oh. I'm worried my cousin's going to cut it too short.
Lily: Scooter, what are you doing here?
Lily: You're really cute. Oh, no. Really?
Lily: I want... I want... Scooter!
Lily: Oh. Robin... My makeup looks perfect right now, and I'm about to cry. Do something.
Lily: Really?
Lily: Robin, stop. Stop. It's okay. I am not gonna let anything get to me today.
Lily: I'm okay.
Lily: I'm fine.
Lily: Totally cool.
Lily: Oh, it's okay, I'll just wear the ones I have on.
Lily: I'm marrying Marshall today. So it doesn't even matter that I'm gonna walk down the aisle without a veil in a room that has no flowers to the music of half a harp played by a woman who's crowning, as my high school boyfriend reads Guns N' Roses lyrics. But that's okay, because there's no photographer there to take any pictures of it anyway.
Lily: What do you think?! Of course I'm not okay! Everything that could possibly go wrong at my wedding has! It's ruined!
Lily: Oh, grow up, Robin! Of course I want a perfect wedding! Oh, God. I wanted... I wanted not to care about the wedding, but... I do. I... I'm supposed to feel like a princess today.
Lily: What could you have that could possibly make me feel better? God, I hope Marshall's having a better day than I'm having.
Lily: Oh, my God! Marshall...
Lily: What happened? Did Amy do this to you?
Lily: Oh, no, you didn't ruin the wedding, sweetie. It was already ruined. There's no flowers, no photographer. Oh, and Scooter's here, by the way.
Lily: My veil got thrashed, the harp player is in labor, and I'm not wearing my wedding underwear.
Lily: What happened? Remember the wedding we wanted, the intimate outdoor ceremony?
Lily: I love it.
Lily: Great. Wait, hold on. Excuse me, sir. Could we borrow your hat?
Lily: Thank you.
Lily: I don't have mine either.
Lily: My turn. Oh, thank you. Marshall, I love you because you're funny and you make me feel loved and you make me feel safe and for our anniversary you gave me a sweatshirt that says, "Lily and Marshall. Rockin' It Since '96." I kinda wish I was wearing it right now 'cause it smells like you. But the main reason I love you, Marshall Ericksen, is you make me happy. You make me happy all the time.
Lily: I'm good.
Lily: Slow down.
Lily: I do.
Lily: No.
Lily: Tired. I got married twice today.
Lily: What do you think? Bathroom, of course.
Lily: Yeah, he's been really... quiet.
Lily: No, it's more than that. It's like, all the stuff he used to love, he suddenly has no interest in anymore.
Lily: Excuse me?
Lily: It's been a while.
Lily: You should work at a carnival.
Lily: Yeah, I'll walk out with you guys.
Lily: Oh, baby, why aren't you in bed?
Lily: Mmm. Anything I can do to help you with that?
Lily: Man, I am losing my touch.
Lily: Is it over? I call on top.
Lily: Oh, that's too bad, 'cause I was going to make a little presentation of my own.
Lily: Deal. Come on, come on.
Lily: s*x now, we'll do the foreplay after.
Lily: No, sweetie, just-just put all that out of your mind and relax. Look, I got you a six-pack of tall boys from the deli.
Lily: Yeah?
Lily: Oh, I-I don't know. I threw them down the garbage chute. Let's just use the handcuffs instead.
Lily: Marshall, right now, I don't give a wat's ass about Garbage Island.
Lily: Cwap.
Lily: Okay, baby, what gives?
Lily: I hope this doesn't make me look desperate.
Lily: Okay, Marshall, seriously, what's going on?
Lily: What do you mean?
Lily: Are you avoiding sleeping with me 'cause you don't want to start a family?
Lily: Marshall, if you want to quit your job and go work for the NRDC right now, then you need to do that right now. And then, once you've cleaned up all the oceans and saved the planet... you know, like, a year from now... then we'll start a family.
Lily: Meeker doesn't hate you.
Lily: It's my birthday!
Lily: It's still my birthday!
Lily: A new camera! Thank you, Marshall. I love it!
Lily: There was not a knot.
Lily: Thank you. I will make great photos of our group with that.
Lily: I want the perfect group shot. Marshall put yourself between Robin and Barney.
Lily: You know... Light, color, balance, aperture...
Lily: Of course. You will not last! The photo is forever.
Lily: Okay, I am perhaps a little bossy, but I want to remember it all. Like tonight. I imagine no better birthday being with my 4 best friends only. (A knock at the door) And Ted's here.
Lily: And Amanda...
Lily: I'm really happy you make me my cake.
Lily: Pretty.
Lily: Come here.
Lily: I would say Amanda.
Lily: Tell me if you need help. (Amanda from the kitchen) Quick, group photo! All front of the fireplace.
Lily: No problem, it is occupied. The bother, come on.
Lily: Well, you know, auto focus, speed of obstruction, zoom...
Lily: Of course not. I let another of your bitches spoil my memories.
Lily: Ted, you always do that. You bring a girl knows that not all our evenings with us.
Lily: Really? So, let us walk bitch Street Shuffle.
Lily: Christmas morning, there was 4. Our first Christmas together, just us five. Here's another nice little game. It's called, Appoints This Bitch.
Lily: False. You think the Santa Claus, because it was Christmas.
Lily: Almost. This is Leilani. She had to come at Christmas because, you said, "Folks, this may be good." And this is not the only "maybe good". Eve 2007, Barney, Lily, Robin, Ted, Marshall and "It's good" Emily. The funeral of Uncle Cecil Robin, Marshall, Lily, Robin, Barney, Ted and... "It proves that you selected the eyes closed" Isabelle. My appendicitis, Robin, Marshall, Barney, Lily, Ted, and it... you've admitted, you just wanted to make. Compliance.
Lily: Group Photo!
Lily: Oh? So do I.
Lily: These girls have ruined so many things, or you forget Paris.
Lily: In the first year of college, I studied in Paris, and I had not seen Marshall since 2 months.
Lily: And Marshall came to me to spring break. And at the last minute, Ted decided to go with the girl he had just to get back, Karen.
Lily: But just before takeoff...
Lily: And so began the longest 7:30 of Marshall's life. When I went to look for...
Lily: It will not surprise you, but the rest of the trip was horrible. I did a picture of a romantic kiss in front of the Eiffel Tower, I actually had. It was just between Karen and Francis, our server yesterday.
Lily: Emily. Isabelle.
Lily: Leilani! What's your problem?
Lily: Here is another. More random bitch to my birthday! Hey, baby!
Lily: The drawer under the oven. I can not wait. You're the best!
Lily: You should listen to Robin.
Lily: Right.
Lily: Absolutely.
Lily: Yes, okay, Ted. This bitch has proved some nice, but except for bitches, not the rule of bitches.
Lily: Yes. We are a family. So why these parties can not they be us?
Lily: Like the time we celebrated the success of Marshall to the bar.
Lily: It's as if you had done.
Lily: Let us raise our glasses. During the last 3 years, Marshall has worked so hard, and I am so proud of you.
Lily: "Happy 42nd Birthday, Lori."
Lily: No, Marshall, it does not matter.
Lily: This is not true!
Lily: Yeah, but you were beautiful.
Lily: It's true.
Lily: Look at that one. This is the first picture of us three.
Lily: Hi, Marshall. Ready for the film?
Lily: Really?
Lily: I had totally forgotten that. Marshall and I were together for only a few weeks and you invited me in the photo.
Lily: We must bring back Amanda.
Lily: You believed in me. It's my turn to believe in you. As far as I know, this is good.
Lily: Come on everybody, come here. Let's make a memory.
Lily: Names that bitch.
Lily: No, it was my birthday.
Lily: Come on, everybody. Come here. Let's make a memory.
Lily: No, that's terrible, are you OK?
Lily: Oh, because they were buried in a shallow grave.
Lily: Ah, here we go.
Lily: We can't get anywhere with our wedding plans because I want it to be fun and Marshall wants it to be lame.
Lily: I thought so.
Lily: A little girl?
Lily: Yes, but I'm the bride so I win.
Lily: Right. But I'm the bride, so I win.
Lily: You're going. That's awesome. Oh my God, four days to find a dress?
Lily: Well, if we leave now, we can still have a fighting chance. Let's do it.
Lily: Hey.
Lily: Wait, two things. First of all, I've been laying groundwork all afternoon, totally subtle, totally cool, not pushing, not even nudging. Just the theme of today is Ted rocks. And she's picking up on it lying down.
Lily: Wait, no, thing number two. The dress, we got a dress.
Lily: Go.
Lily: So, the dress?
Lily: What?
Lily: Why didn't you check 'plus...
Lily: But Robin is so excited.
Lily: And the dress.
Lily: Oh. OK, OK, we'll, we'll sneak her in.
Lily: I wish we were ninjas.
Lily: You can always ask Stuart.
Lily: Sure, you guys have been friends for a long time, and it's 40% his wedding too.
Lily: Honey, this magazine says more and more couples are opting to have nontraditional weddings out in the woods.
Lily: Squirrels don't get married, Marshall.
Lily: Nice.
Lily: It may have been my idea.
Lily: What? Stuart doesn't get a say.
Lily: Oh, yeah, sure, on the stupid stuff, like who comes.
Lily: Sure, there's plenty of room in the woods.
Lily: What? Why?
Lily: But...but you're the guy...oh.
Lily: Ted's phone. Oh, hi Claudia. What?
Lily: They broke up.
Lily: (to Claudia on phone) Uh-huh, uh-huh.
Lily: Uh-huh.
Lily: Answer it.
Lily: Sweetie, just calm down. Do you wanna go somewhere and talk?
Lily: OK, meet me at MacLaren's. I'll see you there.
Lily: She said if there's no wedding tomorrow, you owe her father $400,000.
Lily: Oh, hell no.
Lily: Claudia is getting married tomorrow and so help me God, if I catch you even so much as breathing the same air as her, I will take those peanuts you try to pass off as testicles and I will squeeze them so hard your eyes pop out and then I'll feed them to you like grapes.
Lily: I'll give you the crab puffs. The crab puffs are good.
Lily: We should totally have them at our wedding.
Lily: Did we just start planning our wedding?
Lily: We totally have to get that brown dipping sauce.
Lily: My God, were you born without taste buds? (Marshall smiles and laughs)
Lily: What?
Lily: Hey.
Lily: He asked you out?
Lily: Oh, oh, oh!
Lily: Isn't there always a hotter girl?
Lily: Holding up your phone number on national TV.
Lily: Wait, Robin, what exactly did Don say when he asked you out?
Lily: Robin, Don didn't ask you out.
Lily: Oh well with the slight assist from the Wesleyan housing department.
Lily: Definitely. Ducks are better than rabbits.
Lily: YAY.
Lily: Pants.
Lily: Ted? No, he's not seeing anyone. Remember, he asked us to find...
Lily: (annoyed) I don't know what kind of architect? Houses, buildings, that kind of crap.
Lily: You can be choosey? You're in a bar on Valentine's Day, uh!
Lily: Man, Ted's right, it's tough out there.
Lily: Married.
Lily: Committed.
Lily: Bellevue.
Lily: Ted's her least favorite person in the world.
Lily: Yeah, yeah, tell him, tell him!
Lily: (whispers) She needs to get married.
Lily: It's hidden.
Lily: (drops the phone into a pitcher) Oops.
Lily: Barney, no offense to Robin, but that wasn't that funny.
Lily: Okay, what is so urgent that you called me and begged me to come over at 7:22 in the morning?
Lily: Barney, just say it.
Lily: I don't believe it. I thought you called me over here to uncuff you from your s*x swing again, but you're in love? That is so sweet!
Lily: Barney, you don't "catch" feelings, you just have them. And they're good.
Lily: You love her? Barney, how can you be in love, and still be sleeping with anything that moves?
Lily: Barney, you're going to have to stop screwing around if you want to be Robin's boyfriend.
Lily: Well, what do you want, then?
Lily: Barney, what you just described is a relationship between a boyfriend and a girlfriend. And a pretty clingy one at that.
Lily: I'm a kindergarten teacher. I see a confused, little kid in the corner trying to eat the lefty scissors, I gotta help the poor, little b*st*rd. But only if you stop sleeping around. Deal?
Lily: Robin just needs to see this new see of you.
Lily: Just call her up.
Lily: You left a voice, but it wasn't male. Barney, I don't get it. You've called a million girls a million times.
Lily: A question mark? You got laid off a question mark?
Lily: Rhinoceros.
Lily: Great. Now we need a new code word.
Lily: Just ask her something.
Lily: Something personal.
Lily: Just ask her out.
Lily: Gross.
Lily: I lied. They're not coming and I'm about to leave.
Lily: Because... they're not in love with Robin, and neither am I. I mean, she's great and sweet. I'm not going to pretend that I haven't noticed her body, but this is off topic. Good luck.
Lily: We both know you're more than that. Show Robin the Barney I met the other day.
Lily: Ted hit that for over a year.
Lily: I'm so sorry, Barney. You can't give up. You know, it may take some time, but once Robin sees the new you...
Lily: Damn it, Barney. I mean, for the last time, you can't... you can't be in love with Robin and still be sleeping with every bimbo on the planet. You have to choose right now.
Lily: What?
Lily: This is just a defense mechanism, because you're afraid of getting hurt. You're just confused.
Lily: See you, Barney.
Lily: Wait, wait. I will find. Left.
Lily: Wait, wait. Who is the fifth ticket?
Lily: I assume you're talking about cooking, otherwise I would have other issues.
Lily: I understand. You're right. We miss you much.
Lily: Tradition? It was never done.
Lily: Do not worry about a baby on our side. It is not yet started.
Lily: A small long road.
Lily: Very, very far.
Lily: Oh? I see it.
Lily: Open it.
Lily: I just got a text from Robin. It says...
Lily: It is certain that it is not English, though? Okay! I do. I go there. (A young woman arrives) Sorry. Go ahead.
Lily: Damn it then!
Lily: What do we do?
Lily: So... nobody saw The Young and the Restless?
Lily: Great! Who commissioned illustrated soap? Marissa Heller, I like your style.
Lily: No one? Do I understand that there is not one fan of soap in this elevator?
Lily: We tried, it's been 20 minutes. We are going. Where is Ted?
Lily: Miss Lily in the living room with the chancellor.
Lily: Sorry!
Lily: It means nothing.
Lily: Boy, Barney, stop with your abandonment issues. Ted has the right to have a life outside the group. As we all.
Lily: No.
Lily: No, silly. One day we all move forward in our lives. It's called growing up.
Lily: I can not.
Lily: I can not believe!
Lily: I know. Maybe not.
Lily: If being at home with a baby, tonight we have never seen a dead ringer for Ted. It would make you what, if we had missed it?
Lily: Right, for his daughter's life.
Lily: What do you say that? We agree that it makes no sense to have a child before he saw the five doubles, right?
Lily: So when we finally see a dead ringer for Barney, this is the message of the universe to tell us to do. And at that time, we'll try. Deal?
Lily: Guess what came in the mail today?
Lily: They rule. And yours is 100% wool so you won't get hypothermia like last year.
Lily: Mike? There's a Mike? You have a boyfriend? You haven't told us?
Lily: How about we go about a Halloween double-date?
Lily: Come on, Robin, trot our your new fella. Let us judge and evaluate him behind your back. It'll be fun.
Lily: Every Halloween Ted waits for the Slutty Pumpkin.
Lily: Kahlua and root beer
Lily: Happy Halloween.
Lily: Cher?
Lily: I don't know, but we have plenty of chocolate here.
Lily: Uh-oh.
Lily: Oh, on the off chance that that could happen, maybe we should stop calling her the Slutty Pumpkin.
Lily: (repeats like a parrot) So, what do you think? (squawks)
Lily: We are so gonna win the costume contest this year.
Lily: (like parrot) Each.
Lily: What are you going as? Oh, like I even have to ask.
Lily: Yeah, four years ago, but nobody remembers what the hell a hanging chad is.
Lily: All right, Polly gotta pee.
Lily: I'm a parrot.
Lily: Where's Mike?
Lily: Yes, it's weirdly hot.
Lily: Arr-gyle.
Lily: Arrr-by's
Lily: It's so nice to meet you, Mike. You guys are really cute together.
Lily: I think you won the dish-off tonight, baby. This steak totally bitch-slapped my pork chop.
Lily: Oh for God's sake. (Lily grabs Mike's hand and eats food from his fork)
Lily: Really tasty.
Lily: Do you like Mike?
Lily: It just doesn't seem like it. You won't share your food. You won't wear a costume.
Lily: OK, I know that stuff looks dumb from the outside, but it's kinda the greatest thing in the world when you're a part of it. If you just give it a chance, you might like it.
Lily: Robin, Mike likes you. If you don't start meeting him halfway, you're gonna lose him.
Lily: Look, it's Halloween. Just put on the girlfriend costume for the night.
Lily: How about you start by sharing dessert.
Lily: Take the damn picture. (squawks)
Lily: Thanks, Marshmallow.
Lily: Sweetie, I'm so sorry.
Lily: Oh, who cares, Marshall? We won!
Lily: I love you, Marshmallow.
Lily: Here's your sack lunch.
Lily: I love you, Marshmallow.
Lily: And how many have you sent her?
Lily: Hey! How was your first day?
Lily: What?
Lily: What makes them jerks?
Lily: Oh, screw those guys! We're adorable.
Lily: Sweetie... It would be cool to have some extra money, but, but, if you're unhappy, it's not worth it.
Lily: Change your personality? That is so awful, and not at all motivational.
Lily: It sounds kinda like peer pressure.
Lily: Yeah, I'm pretty sure it's peer pressure. We have an assembly every year.
Lily: All right, but if those guys try to pressure you to smoke, what do you say?
Lily: Good boy.
Lily: Okay...what do you think?
Lily: Steak sauce?
Lily: Look, you know, whatever anthropology you do at work is your business, but please don't act like that around here.
Lily: No, when Dr. Australia Birdbath-Vaseline came home from the gorillas, she didn't run around picking nits out of people's hair and-and throwing feces. I'm begging you just, just leave it at the office.
Lily: Because you're acting like one of those guys, and those guys are lame.
Lily: Okay.
Lily: You're right. They're delightful.
Lily: Oh, baby, they have our song. Let's do "Don't Go Breaking My Heart."
Lily: Well, actually, Marshall and I have this little dance routine.
Lily: Okay, that was gross. When were you going to tell me you changed your entire career path?
Lily: The package?! You've already given me the package. You've got a great package, Marshall. I love your package.
Lily: Your package has always been big enough. You may not realize this, Marshall Eriksen, but you've got a huge package.
Lily: *I couldn't if I tried*
Lily: *Baby, you're not that kind...*
Lily: You see that guy over there in diving suit? You think you're going to go talk to him?
Lily: Okay. This is certainly the biggest con on this planet.
Lily: This is one of my best friends.
Lily: It's a long story. You see, he just break...
Lily: You're not rush a little, then?
Lily: Yeah, I'm reading it.
Lily: Okay. Are you ready?
Lily: Three years ago, Shelly started working at my school.When I saw her, I said, "It's perfect for Ted."
Lily: He is. It is so great and attentive and intelligent.
Lily: I do not see it. It must be voluntary. So, another bar?
Lily: It still is. And you're ready.
Lily: I will fix it but promise me not to do anything stupid.
Lily: You should!
Lily: You should! You should!
Lily: And you met him at McLaren's?
Lily: What is the name there?
Lily: You... dirty b*st*rd.
Lily: Bluntly.
Lily: I had put aside for Ted Shelly for 3 years.
Lily: Exactly, yes.
Lily: What The Lorenzo Von Matterhorn?
Lily: It's horrible. You realize you've broken her heart? She is inconsolable.
Lily: It was all lies.
Lily: Lies!
Lily: Lies!
Lily: Men... Actually, that's true. I went there.
Lily: Lies!
Lily: What?
Lily: Me?
Lily: Do you believe? He says it's my fault. And by the way, Ted, I bet she go out with you again.
Lily: That must bother you a bit.
Lily: Well, Barney, you go out... You just get out of a sincere relationship. You're a big boy now. You can return to your towers to two euros.
Lily: Yes, we know.
Lily: No, you idiot. That was me.
Lily: An actress friend.
Lily: I'm almost to the point of taking this book and put it on the net for everyone to see.
Lily: No, as you stop scams and confidence tricks, deception, underhand, tricks, schemes and embobinages.
Lily: No more nonsense!
Lily: A few hours later...
Lily: It's good. I put the Book of Roles on the Internet. Baby, you can put the Book of Roles on the Internet?
Lily: Barney, no. You are...
Lily: It's good. You see that guy over there in diving suit?
Lily: And here we are.
Lily: So what does the diver? Claire and here, in passing.
Lily: I'm delighted that you stop it. And frankly, the real Barney is better than all the false Barney's Book of Roles.
Lily: Before refusing, you should know that in this neoprene combined with what appears to be a pair of socks...
Lily:... is an incredible kind. He's funny and it's one of my best friends. And he came out with this gun.
Lily: I had a message from Barney. "Look under the table." (She looks under the table and finds an envelope) A page from the Book of Roles.
Lily: You dirty b*st*rd...!
Lily: Ah! Sweet damn, that's a hot plate.
Lily: 28. Two more 'til the big one, three-oh.
Lily: Still, you know, another year older. Still single. You don't hear your Tedological clock ticking?
Lily: Well, what's perfect?
Lily: That's not hard. I know at least...
Lily: You're never going to find this girl.
Lily: Yeah, thought I'd whip up some pancakes.
Lily: He's still sound asleep.
Lily: I'm going shopping after work. I'll pick up some milk.
Lily: What's wrong, baby?
Lily: Hey, Ted, are you busy?
Lily: Oh, right. Soul mate. Forgot. Listen, could you take a cab out to Duchess County and change a flat on Marshall's Fiero?
Lily: Marshall can't know about this. Look, Ted, it's dark, I don't know how to change a tire, and I've stumbled into the beginning of a very scary campfire story. Can you please hurry?
Lily: Oh, my God, is that a drifter with a hook for a hand? No, drifter, no!
Lily: But you see my point.
Lily: Oh, thank God. I'm so sorry about this. Did you get ahold of your date?
Lily: And was she okay about pushing it back?
Lily: You can never tell Marshall.
Lily: Ever. Swear. Swear on the lives of your unborn boy and girl.
Lily: About a month ago, I started getting insomnia. Marrying Marshall had been all I wanted for a long time. But, now that it was really happening, it seemed kind of huge and scary.
Lily: He wouldn't have understood. He's not exactly nervous about tying the knot. So I spent my nights reading, painting, setting the high score on Super Bomber Man...
Lily: I know! I just got in the zone and... Not the point of the story. And then I started thinking about Victoria and how she followed her dream to Germany, and I found that art fellowship.
Lily: San Francisco. But it's not like I'm going to do it. The dates conflict with the wedding. But I love painting, and I've always wondered if I'm any good. This was a way to find out. And the interview is tonight. In New Haven.
Lily: Of course I want to get married. I... It's not like I was ever going to do it. I just... I just really wanted to see if I could get this.
Lily: Okay, I was... I was having second thoughts. But I'm not any more. I... I mean, this flat tire was a sign. I'm not supposed to do this. I'm supposed to go home and-and be with Marshall. You must think I'm so stupid.
Lily: I love Marshall.
Lily: But why am I the only one? How come Marshall isn't doing anything crazy?
Lily: Ted, let's go to New Haven.
Lily: I just need to know if I can get in. If I do this interview, and get into the program, then I'll know, and I can forget all about it, and get married. Come on! It's an adventure.
Lily: Okay, yes, it's a mistake. I know it's a mistake. But there are certain things in life where you know it's a mistake but you don't really know it's a mistake because the only way to really know it's a mistake is to make the mistake, and look back, and say, "Yep. That was a mistake." So, really, the bigger mistake would be to not make the mistake, because then you go your whole life not really knowing if something is a mistake or not. And, damn it, I've made no mistakes! I've done all of this-- my life, my relationship, my career-- mistake-free. Does any of this make sense to you?
Lily: Ted, I'm getting married in two months, and I'm freaking out, and you're my best friend, and you just have to forgive me for this.
Lily: Hi.
Lily: Yeah. Yeah, I-I got it.
Lily: No. Nope, I'm good. I don't need any milk.
Lily: Ah, sweet damn, that's a hot plate.
Lily: We can split a cinnabun.
Lily: Yeah, I agree with Ted. In a real relationship, you share everything. That's why Marshall and I don't keep any secrets.
Lily: Try me.
Lily: Doggie ate his pants. Yep.
Lily: Oh, when they had to pump out all the nickels from his stomach?
Lily: Trick question, Marshall's never been to the Pacific Northwest because he's afraid of Sasquatch.
Lily: What happened next?
Lily: I don't know, he could be right. She does have the fake orgasm noises down.
Lily: What? The walls are thin.
Lily: We're not getting married at the mall.
Lily: No, because before Robin moved to New York, she...What was she doing?
Lily: Except when she's talking about...
Lily: What do you think of this wedding cake?
Lily: No.
Lily: No.
Lily: What the hell's a slap bet?
Lily: Are you really gonna do that? That's so immature. Marshall: You can be Slap Bet Commissioner.
Lily: Oh, I love it. What are my powers?
Lily: You said you would respect her privacy so maybe you should just drop it.
Lily: I can't believe you told us Robin's secret.
Lily: No I didn't.
Lily: Please tell us, just tell us. I'm begging you. Tell us, tell us, tell us, please, please, please, please, please.
Lily: Yeah, well, you still shouldn't have told us. I mean, what kind of boyfriend are you?
Lily: Ted, even if she is married, it's a Canadian marriage. It's like their money or their army. Nobody takes it seriously.
Lily: Oh, right, like you need an excuse to watch p0rn.
Lily: Barney gets three slaps.
Lily: One because you lied. And two for being prematurely slapped. Three slaps.
Lily: Are you as terrified as I am?
Lily: This is the most amazing thing I've ever seen.
Lily: And yet a slap occurred without the permission of the Slap Bet Commissioner.
Lily: OK, I'm going to give you a choice. Either ten slaps right now in a row or five slaps that can be doled at any point from here to eternity.
Lily: So, just to be clear, you wanted everybody to go to the mall today?
Lily: Whoo!!!
Lily: Sorry. (slower) Whoo! It's just they kissed! They're finally a couple. Oh, my God, you guys! This is our first double date! First of millions! What if our kids get married?! Oh I love this!
Lily: Wait, what are you saying?
Lily: Is it something I did?
Lily: Sure, of course. As long as you're happy, I'm happy.
Lily: We were gonna take cooking lessons together and we were gonna go on camping trips together and then we were gonna sit around telling funny stories about our cooking lessons and our camping trips.
Lily: Whoo!!!!!!
Lily: So, how long has this been going on?
Lily: I knew it! I knew it! I knew it! You guys are boyfriend and girlfriend.
Lily: You've been together all summer. I don't get it.
Lily: You needs it. Guys, you can't just keep hooking up and not at least try and figure out what you mean to each other.
Lily: No, no, no (trying to hold Barney who tries to kiss Robin). You need to define the relationship. You ne to have the talk.
Lily: I think what Barney's saying is that definitions are important. You're their teacher, not their friend.
Lily: If people don't know their place, nobody's happy.
Lily: You have to make things clear.
Lily: Define the relationship.
Lily: You're not happy. You just think you're happy because you feel happy.
Lily: Of course not. You and Robin need to have the talk.
Lily: I'll give you 20...
Lily: I just thought of a reason.
Lily: Okay, seriously. We're at the point of physical violence. Now, will you please have the talk?
Lily: (sitting behind the door) Ted's not here, Robin.
Lily: I'd be glad to. Just as soon as you and Barney have the talk.
Lily: No. Sit down, define the relationship, write down that definition on a piece of paper, slip it under the door, and if I like what I read, you can go.
Lily: Then you'll die in there.
Lily: Well, guess what? I broughtMarshall with me, so maybe we'll do the same.
Lily: Just hanging out? Not good enough.
Lily: I'll tell you where things aren't doing... out of that bedroom. Not good enough.
Lily: Not... good enough.
Lily: 20 minutes late on your first day? That's rough.
Lily: That's awesome, Ted.
Lily: Really?
Lily: No, Ted, they don't realize they weren't lying.
Lily: Yeah. You're writing constantly. There's forms we have to sign, our death folders, thank you notes...
Lily: It's this thing they recommend you do in case one spouse died unexpectedly.
Lily: Yeah. Account info, important addresses, a letter to the other person, all that stuff. I'll get the next round.
Lily: Wow. It seems like a great trip.
Lily: Wow. There's a lot of nude people in here.
Lily: Just shoes and a shirt. That's a look.
Lily: Man, this is like "Where's Waldo" of exposed genitalia. Except that it's really easy to find Waldo.
Lily: Ooh, here he comes. Switched to big words.
Lily: So, Gael, huh?
Lily: Still going strong?
Lily: Ooh, that's one too many. What's going on?
Lily: Well, maybe you're just going back to the person you were before the trip.
Lily: Wow, it's a really nice blender.
Lily: I can't. I married you. That's how we got the blender. What's wrong?
Lily: How can you open my letter?
Lily: Marshall, wait. (He opens the door) This was our first fight as a married couple.
Lily: Oh.
Lily: Yes?
Lily: Wow. You really want to open this up again. Oh, I forgot, you open everything up, even if you're not supposed to until I'm dead.
Lily: Because, I can't bear the thought of not being with you, not even for long enough to write you a stupid letter.
Lily: Yes, really. Plus, I know as soon as I write it, you're just going to open it up and read it again.
Lily: Okay. I'll write you a letter for my death folder.
Lily: I tell you what. How about I make it all dirty stuff and slip in a little clean stuff?
Lily: Okay, I'm done... but I really don't want you reading this unless... you know, something happens. Can you swear to me you won't open it?
Lily: Marshall, I'm serious.
Lily: Okay.
Lily: Yes, you suck. You said you wouldn't read it and you did.
Lily: Oh, fine, I'll take the dirty pictures.
Lily: What is that supposed to mean?
Lily: Look. Three beautiful blondes drinking bad decision juice at 8am.
Lily: Seriously? They are blond and stuffed. This is not your type?
Lily: You noticed that Barney is weird lately?
Lily: Yes.
Lily: You think it is possible that Barney Stinson has a girlfriend?
Lily: Wait. Where are you going?
Lily: My God. He goes to see now.
Lily: Where is she?
Lily: Your girlfriend. You did not really like, huh?
Lily: So that's what we hide you? You did not want people to know that you're a momma's boy.
Lily: It's crazy. Did you actually cast your own son?
Lily: It sounds like your mother kept your child's room as you had left.
Lily: Wait. When you watch Karate Kid, you are the wicked little blonde?
Lily: I can not believe that there has never met you. Who knew that Barney's mother was so great?
Lily: I'm sorry?
Lily: Warm? Remember to marriage, I said we would be together forever? On our return down the aisle, your mother leaned over and said, "Not forever, darling. Marshall will go to heaven. "
Lily: She hates me, Marshall. But that's okay, because...Forget.
Lily: Nothing. You want to go do it again in the bedroom of Barney?
Lily: Really? I hate your mother.
Lily: No, not at all.
Lily: It may be time to tell him the truth.
Lily: And I just wanted to say, if I was never cold or distant, I'm sorry.
Lily: It mean a lot to me if we could be closer.
Lily: I love you...
Lily:... Mom.
Lily: Do like I was nice. I mean, it's really nice of you, Judy.You too. See you soon.
Lily: OK, and Breakfast Club?
Lily: Are you kidding? I have hated as soon as I saw them. So they are cannon. In fact, I've hated almost as much as Robin when I've ever known.
Lily: A max.
Lily: Yeah, really cute.
Lily: That may be a false alarm. It is perhaps not pregnant.
Lily: So if you have a baby, you think you can work less?
Lily: And for the money? It has a ton of debt.
Lily: Now?
Lily: Robin, would you mind not sleeping with Ted tomorrow night? I... prepares a special dinner for Marshall.
Lily: Marshall?
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: I know, hot bread, spicy pork? Stuff like that. You come not tonight, right? You shake your head for "no"? That's what I thought.
Lily: Thank you for coming so quickly.
Lily: Marshall and I, we took the decision to have a great...dinner. And I thought I was ready for a... dinner. But he called to cancel, and it got me thinking. Is it too early for us to make a... Dinner?
Lily: Dinner, it's a baby!
Lily: No, I need you to clarify a situation for me.
Lily: Are we ready, Marshall and me to have a baby? So, are we ready to have a baby or not?
Lily: Marshall is really excited. But I think he sees only the good sides of it.
Lily: The other day while playing with the little Jeremy, I was talking with his mother.
Lily: I will be as carbon copy Charlotte. Worse. At least, her husband works at home. Well, he deale of sh1t, but it is a caring father.
Lily: Marshall is always at work, and I'm afraid to hit all the work if we have one now.
Lily: Well, that's perfect. That's why I called you. Ted, you're for children. Robin, you're against. Councillors, please proceed.
Lily: You're a father too.
Lily: She's right. Perhaps you're single and childless, but you're really a redneck dad.
Lily: It puts you in the mash, then. Your only hope is to be negative.
Lily: Yes, I'm lovely, beautiful and brilliant, but it's enough?
Lily: The sock Jeremy. I will make a baby.
Lily: But sock.
Lily: But sock.
Lily: With small fish.
Lily: Put a baby in me, Marshall. I'm ready.
Lily: I'm ready. This is the big night. Removing your seed melon-headed in my belly.
Lily: Come on, come on. Make me a baby. I'm ready. Hey, look. The types of the other building make me cuckoo. Hello, gentlemen! We will make a baby!
Lily: I'm all out of "A" to "G".
Lily: I'm bored. Come and dance. Come fly a liquor store!
Lily: Let's dance! We gonna party all night!
Lily: No, you feel "pancake, I'm sorry for being such a stupid drunk" chocolate.
Lily: Of course.
Lily: I blame myself for last night. I was really painful. I just panicked at the thought of whether we are ready to parent. But you are so well taken care of me. I know you're gonna be a good father.
Lily: What?
Lily: Me too. When we're ready, I know you'll be fantastic.
Lily: You wanna make love, by protecting themselves now?
Lily: You want to finish your bacon first?
Lily: Sorry, Mr. Madsen.
Lily: You guys will never believe what just happened to us.
Lily: We were in Queens and we decided to stop by my apartment.
Lily: I could see how you would think that but I have to have my own place. It's an independence thing.
Lily: Three months ago.
Lily: What? It's like fat pants. You hope you never have to use 'em but you're glad to know they're there.
Lily: What the hell?
Lily: This is my apartment.
Lily: Right here.
Lily: What the hell?
Lily: No, no, this was my apartment. My dresser was right...
Lily: That's my dresser! And this is my closet.
Lily: Yes, you know me?
Lily: Yeah, I know, the bangs were a mistake. Where's my stuff? Waitress: It's all in the back. We could wrap it up for you. You want it to go?
Lily: This is my apartment!
Lily: When?
Lily: OK so I didn't have a written lease as such but, but go ask my landlady, Mrs. Conroy.
Lily: She may be 98 years old but she's still...
Lily: She's dead, isn't she?
Lily: My apartment is a Chinese restaurant. What am I gonna do?
Lily: Really?
Lily: Done. The painting's done.
Lily: I don't know. Um, over the piano?
Lily: OK.
Lily: Man, Ted's been acting weird. He started labeling all his food. He even carved "Ted" into that block of cheese.
Lily: He's not cool with me moving in.
Lily: So, what's he PMS'ing about?
Lily: Are you kidding? You guys never talk about anything.
Lily: He'll just let it fester under the surface until he does something big and passive-aggressive.
Lily: A sword fight?
Lily: On Monday, I'm gonna have to tell my kindergarten class who I teach not to run with scissors that my fiancé ran me through with a frickin' broad sword.
Lily: I'm sorry, is this a discussion of the degree to which you stabbed me?
Lily: Wait wait wait wait wait. I don't want that apartment. It's a boy apartment. It's full of swords and videogames, and kinda smells like dude. It's fine for now, but when we get married, I wanna start a new life with you in a new place.
Lily: I will too. We're not getting married for like a year.
Lily: Maybe it's the massive blood loss talking but I'm starving.
Lily: I know just the place.
Lily: I told you. OK, a toast.
Lily: Life is full of changes. One day you have an apartment, the next day it's a house of dumplings. But the important stuff doesn't change. To the important stuff.
Lily: And by the way, I bought these glasses. I bought them at Ikea. These are my glasses.
Lily: I'm pretty sure this is a mixed tape you made me in sophomore year.
Lily: Oh, oh, oh, you want us to say your name and un-jinx you?
Lily: Ooh!
Lily: Does it make you kind of sad that we don't share the same last name?
Lily: You know what we should do? We should come up with a whole new last name.
Lily: Lily and Marshall Hasselhoff.
Lily: Yeah.
Lily: I love you, Mr. Awesome.
Lily: Oh, help us.
Lily: We're starving. We planned this amazing meal with the caterers, and we haven't had a bite of it.
Lily: Thanks, Grammie, but we really need to...
Lily: Oh, yes, definitely.
Lily: Oh, that's great. Going on the list.
Lily: Horrible wedding clichées we're not going to touch with a ten-foot limbo pole.
Lily: Going on the list.
Lily: We've done it. A wedding with zero clichées.
Lily: Well, okay, one clichée.
Lily: No! They cleared our plates again!
Lily: Well, you still have me.
Lily: No, Barney, this is my wedding, and I will sit wherever I damn well...
Lily: Mini quiche. You're a mega-douche.
Lily: I had four strawberries.
Lily: Oh, look, more strawberries!
Lily: No, it's going to be so funny.
Lily: Whoopsy-daisy.
Lily: We love you. I love you.
Lily: Don't look at me. This morning Marshall said, "I have to pee." And I, "Don't worry, baby, I'll do it for you." Halfway through the pee, I'm, like, "This doesn't even make sense!"
Lily: Marshall's mom hasn't eaten, slept or sat down since we got here. Wait! That can be my role! I'll take care of Judy!
Lily: Okay, yes, Judy and I aren't besties, but today, whatever she needs, I'm there. I'm on Judy duty.
Lily: Wow, you really do have everything in there, don't you?
Lily: Yeah! It's positive racism!
Lily: What is it?
Lily: You have a voice mail from your dad?
Lily: Baby, are you okay?
Lily: Wait-- no, no, baby... Baby, I got it. Let me.
Lily: Guys, listen to what just happened.
Lily: Judy, do you need a break? I'm happy to cook for a while.
Lily: Listen!
Lily: Judy's finally sleeping and it's all because of me! Guys, I have a role: I'm Judy's bitch! Yeah!
Lily: Yeah! Robin gave me a little orange pill from her purse. I don't know what's in it, but things are flowin' pretty smooth right now.
Lily: We know, baby. But you'll always wonder, if you don't. Your dad loved you. It almost doesn't matter what he said.
Lily: Hello.
Lily: Fooled ya. Leave a message after the beep. We'll get back to ya. Beep.
Lily: I did it.
Lily: I'm from New York. We think getting minors drunk is funny.
Lily: That salad's the first food she's eaten in two days. Sure, it's mostly cheese, mayonnaise and jelly beans, but it counts.
Lily: You're up next, baby.
Lily: Baby, are you okay?
Lily: Hey, so it's a pocket dial. You have so many great memories with your dad. Who cares about the last one?
Lily: Looks like your dad came through one last time.
Lily: For what?
Lily: Any time.
Lily: Hi, Dad.
Lily: Oh, baby. No, no. Not the slipper socks with the rubber soles. I work so hard to-to set the mood, and-and when I see those, I feel the egg go right back up my Fallopian tube.
Lily: Traction?
Lily: Please stop calling yourself "Papa."
Lily: Hey, so I talked to Robin. I guess she and Max hooked up last night.
Lily: Yeah. He's a sweet guy. She feels really comfortable with him. They bonded over hockey. I guess he has a small pen1s, but they want to double-date next weekend.
Lily: So you'll clear your schedule.
Lily: Oh, the small pen1s thing?
Lily: That's insane. I mean, just because you know Max has a small pen1s...
Lily: Max has a small pen1s.
Lily: Size, shape, left or right leaning orientation...
Lily: You're kidding. Barney, every time I mention a woman you don't know, the first thing you say is, "Boobs?" Not the complete sentence, "Does she have big boobs?" Which also would not be great. Just: "Boobs?"
Lily: My friend Lori from work...
Lily: So why is it okay for guys to talk about boobs, but the moment we bring up a topic like Max's small pen1s... I'm gonna pretend this conversation never happened.
Lily: Um, I think you got that backwards there, Chief.
Lily: Damn, baby, be cool!
Lily: Are you suggesting that guys don't talk about s*x?
Lily: Oh, nothing. We don't talk about you!
Lily: Ugh, he thinks I like this...But it feels disgusting.
Lily: "Uh, is this working for you?"
Lily: Oh, you're bad.
Lily: Oh, I've had that a couple times. Just lean into it and let it fuel things.
Lily: Then he gets this panicked look on his face, says, "I can't do this," and storms out.
Lily: But here's the crazier part.
Lily: It was amazing. He was passionate, animalistic, a complete stud.
Lily: Yup. "'You're like a Greek god, I moaned, as the..." I can't read that, baby.
Lily: "As the musky scent of man and Marshall's sure-footed traction intoxicated and overpowered me."
